A 28-year-old chef who had recently moved to San Francisco was found dead in the stairwell of a local mall this week.
But the victim's brother says he can't think of anyone who would want to hurt him, saying, "Things were finally going well for him."
The body found at the Westfield Mall Wednesday morning was identified as 28-year-old San Francisco resident Frank Galicia, the San Francisco Medical Examiner's Office said.
The San Francisco Police Department said the death was ruled a homicide and an investigation is ongoing.
The victim's brother, Louis Galicia, told ABC station KGO in San Francisco that Frank, previously a line cook in Boston, had landed his dream job as line chef at San Francisco's Sons & Daughters restaurant six months ago.
A spokesperson for Sons & Daughters said they were "shocked and devastated" by his death.
"We are a small team that operates like a close knit family and he will be dearly missed," the spokesperson said.
Louis Galicia said Frank initially stayed in hostels, but recently, "Things were finally going well for him."
He was the brother that went with the flow.
"With everything else that's going wrong with the world, he was that diamond in the rough that was shining bright every day," he said.
Anyone with information is asked to call the SFPD Tip Line at 415-575-4444.
The Russians represented in qualifying were Anton Chupkov, Evgeny Koptelov, Alexander Sukhorukov, and Grigory Tarasevich.
Russian foil fencers defeated the Americans and made it through to the tournament final at the Olympic Games.
A Russian judoka has reached the 1/8 final at the Olympics
In the round of 16, the Russian will face the Brazilian, Rafael Silva.
Two of Russia's four gold medals at the Olympics have, in fact, been won by judokas.
Beslan Mudranov became the best in the under 60 kg weight class, and Khasan Khalmurzaev won the up to 81 kg class.
141 victims of the terrorist attack at Domodedovo received payments from the airport.
141 people received charitable payments from the Aviatsionny Foundation, which was created by management at Domodedovo airport to help victims of the terrorist attack in 2011, Interfax reports.
In 2011, a suicide bomber detonated an explosive device in the international arrivals area at Domodedovo.
An international team of biologists have come to the conclusion that the longest-living vertebrate is the Greenland shark, which can live for approximately 500 years, RT reports.
Female Greenland sharks only reach sexual maturity by the age of 150.
The oldest such specimen known to scientists was slightly older than 210 years.
Ivanov will now serve as Special Presidential Representative for Environmental Protection, Ecology, and Transport.
Deputy Secretary of the Council, Rashid Nurgaliyev, was excluded from the list of permanent members of the Security Council of the Russian Federation.
Sergei Ivanov is relieved of the post of chief of staff of the Presidential Executive Office.
If a person is healthy, but just burnt-out from work, should they bother going to a health resort?
In the setting of a health resort, a person can check the state of their body and receive recommendations from a doctor about how to live so that their health does not fall apart.
‘I'm just burnt-out from work’, is an important signal from the body that shouldn't be dismissed.
Wellness programmes are available for children, even the very youngest, which include not only diagnostic services, consultations with a paediatrician, and tests, but also therapeutic services.
So, there's no need to fear the weather outside, especially since the majority of procedures are conducted indoors and are in no way dependant on the season.
Their waters possess unique properties and act on different systems of the body.
New Yessentuki offers anti-inflammatory, choleretic, and diuretic effects.
The water at Slavyanovsky has the same effect.
When prescribing water treatment, the doctor must take into account the condition of the cardiovascular system.
Then there are constitutional walks along individually tailored routes.
They are especially popular in Kislovodsk, where there is the huge Resort Park (the second largest in Europe).
They are popular in Kislovodsk, which is located in close proximity to the Narzan mineral spring.
There, you can also take baths in wine, pearls, iodine-bromine, selenium, and sage-liquorice, depending on what the doctor prescribes for you.
Extending the fruiting period.
It's time to give those tall tomato plants a trim: remove the new shoots, cut off the top of the plant, and remove all the leaves up to the second-to-last cluster with fruit and blossoms with small young fruit – they won't have time to ripen.
At the end of summer, the only chemical products that should be used are copper sulphate, colloidal sulphur, and insecticidal soap.
In the greenhouse, we lower the long climbing cucumbers from the trellis so that the lower bare part of the stem (25-40 cm) is laying on the ground, then we water it with a warm water and Zircon solution, and cover the stem in 5-7 cm of compost.
Extending the fruiting period of squash is also easy: cut off the old leaves, water it with warm water and a multinutrient fertiliser solution, and add some nutrient-rich soil under the bush.
To protect against night-time cold, drape material over the garden bed.
What indicates that Russia is emerging from the crisis?
Economists have seen signs that Russia is emerging from the longest recession of the past twenty years.
As noted by the analysts surveyed by Bloomberg, Russia's GDP is showing improvement: in the second quarter, GDP declined by 0.8% in annual terms.
Slow growth ahead.
According to experts from the Central Bank of Russia, the Russian economic recession is a thing of the past.
‘The index rating of Russia's GDP indicates that the recession is behind us, and that slow economic growth is ahead’, says a bulletin from the Bank of Russia called ‘What the trends indicate’.
But over the course of the quarter, the decline stopped: it amounted to 0.2% in April, while in May and June, the change in GDP was within the range of 0-0.15%’, RIA Novosti quotes the spokesperson from the Ministry of Economic Development and Trade as saying.
The slowdown in the rate of contraction of the Russian economy over the past five quarters suggests that the ‘bottom has already been passed’.
Then, we'll factor in the colder than average annual temperatures in the first quarter.
If you look at the dynamic of the rouble exchange rate, despite displaying high volatility at the beginning of the year, it strengthened by 12% between the beginning of the year and August.
This is also one of the signs of recovery, which indicators in the real economy should follow’, underscores Yakovenko.
In spite of the favourable situation in the labour market, the issue of real disposable incomes leaves a lot to be desired.
In addition to weak consumption, the Bank of Russia's strict policy could also be mentioned in terms of other risk factors for economic growth.
The regulatory authority has held rates at 10.5%, which doesn't have the best impact on the real sector.
If former foreigners are also competing for Russia at the Olympic Games in Rio, then in the majority of cases, we are talking about natives of countries that were former republics of the Soviet Union.
Some were brought to a different country by their parents during childhood, leaving no choice.
In the German passport of the 27-year-old girl, it is written that her name is Lisa Ryzih.
The young girl didn't have a choice.
Just like her sister, Lisa chose pole vaulting.
If she had stayed in Russia, it is doubtful she could have ‘usurped the thrown’ of Yelena Isinbayeva.
Unfortunately, at the Olympics in Rio, Lisa will be the only one of our countrywomen, even if only a former one, in the pole vault event.
Her parents are religious proselytisers of an evangelical branch.
Lena already started to get involved in wrestling in school.
But then, at the World Championships that same year, she had a victory.
Prior to this, in fact, she managed to win silver at the World Championships in 2010.
After this, there was a bronze in 2013 and a silver in 2014.
26-year-old Maria was born in the city of Yaroslavl, where she first became acquainted with synchronised swimming.
However, it wouldn't be right to say that our coaches in Russia trained her.
Of course, she couldn't compete at the intensive international level of Russian synchronised swimming, but for America, her results were at the very top.
Kristen Shaldybin, which sounds odd in Russian, received her new name at 11 years of age, when her parents decided to continue the girl's training in rhythmic gymnastics overseas.
Having immigrated to the United States, she quickly joined that country's youth team, and later also pushed her way into the main national team.
At the Pan American Games, 19-year-old Kristen won gold and silver.
Of course, she wasn't in contention for first place on the world stage, but she staged a real breakthrough for the United States, taking the team of stars and stripes into the Olympic Games in Rio de Janeiro.
Another one of our former ‘rhythmic gymnasts’ is Jana Berezko-Marggrander, who competes for Team Germany.
It didn't take long before she was representing her country at the 2012 Olympic Games in London.
Truth be told, Ira still trains in Russia: she comes home specifically so that she doesn't lose her skills.
However, for quite a long time, she was competing under the Russian flag and producing some decent results: there was even a national record in the 200 metre butterfly.
In 2015, she received Swiss citizenship and started competing under the red and white flag.
In Rio, her best performance was 14th place in the 4x100 m freestyle relay.
The fact of the matter is that his parents emigrated from Vladivostok to New Zealand when the boy was very young.
In Rio, his best performance was 40th place in the qualification round on the parallel bars.
When Nastya, who was born in Moscow in 1985, was just 9 years old, her family immigrated to Israel.
In addition to high jump, Dmitry also does long jump and triple jump.
Khadjiev was born in Chechnya in 1994, and got stuck with his family in the midst of the war.
The original goal was Norway, but it wasn't possible to get into this northern country, and they had to go to France, to Nice.
And once again it's freestyle wrestling, and once again it's a former Russian citizen.
Tired of not making it onto the team, Taimuraz decided to change sports nationality.
The Chief of Staff of the Executive Office of the President of the Russian Federation is Aton Vaino.
He is a Class 1 Active State Advisor to the Russian Federation (this rank was assigned by a Decree of the President of the Russian Federation on 22 January 2008)
He received a Russian Federation Presidential Certificate of Honour (16 February 2012) for his service in support of the work of the government of the Russian Federation and many years of diligent work.
Why should the children of Cossacks have classes at schools?
According to Governor V. Kondratyev, 'Cossacks need to be educated not with campaigns and parades, but in a systematic manner'.
But so far this work, it seems to me, is being carried out as a mere formality, and, I suspect, primarily just on paper.
If Cossack classes incorporate everything positive that has been previously accumulated and take it to a whole new level, then I will be pleased.
If everything is done in a hurry and without knowing how to go about it, then this new idea will result in cheap populism.
There is evidence of misappropriation of funds that are earmarked for public utilities from budgets at various levels.
As a result, consumers in the region overpaid power suppliers by more than 170 million roubles.
The other day, the Prosecutor's Office for Krasnodar Krai also became aware of the fact that unjustified costs were included in the prices.
While the expenses of OOO IV-Consulting (supplies cold water) show that 4 million roubles were spent hiring cars at above-market prices.
The people are handing over their last rouble to ‘public utilities’ and, what's more, they are paying in a timely manner: according the Ministry of Construction, Housing, and Utilities of the Russian Federation, the average collection rate is 94% of the population.
The businessmen simply returned a large portion of the money to him.
Cases aren't opened or drag on.
And very complicated housing legislation ‘helps’ with this, figures Svetlana Razvorotneva, Executive Director of the non-profit partnership, Housing Control.
We don't have time to start working on one law, before we devise a new one that is necessary to get the previous one to work.
Refusals to initiate criminal proceedings and red tape during investigations are even reported in the Prosecutor General's Office.
In the rest of the cases, the investigations took on a protracted nature, and every fifth case was suspended in connection with failure to identify the accused party.
It is not uncommon that mistakes made by law enforcement officials are written off by them on gaps in the current legislation.
It means: a change in the management of the building, and financial and other issues that circumvent the opinion of the owners.
Primarily, due to the eradication of corruption, in and of itself, throughout the state, assures Anton Zharkov, a member of the Duma Committee on property issues.
Of course, not all regions are in such a sad state.
In particular, there are no signs of scandal in the capital.
Why are there no such scandals in the housing and communal services sector in Moscow, as there are in many other regions?
Well, because the city government has shown an iron will and has established order, Anatoly Vyborny, a member of the Duma Committee for security and combating corruption, told AiF.
Many people not only pay their monthly bills, but also keep a close eye on what is written on them, and how the building is being maintained.
The public's awareness about the rights of owners and the responsibilities of resource-supplying and property management organisations is very high.
Perhaps the weak-willed should change jobs?
The Turkish gambit.
‘Sooner or later, America will make a choice between Turkey and FETO (Fethullah Terrorist Organisation).
Either FETO, which organised the coup, or democratic Turkey.
His words were in response to a corresponding statement from Turkey’s Foreign Minister, Mevlüt Çavuşoğlu.
He is very much tied to the West both in terms of business and in terms of the military (Turkey is a member of NATO), so I think that Erdoğan will try to find a balance, while preserving the framework of relations with the West.
Although, of course, it would be more convenient for the Americans to have a completely obedient person in this post’, the expert explained to AiF.
Director of the Centre for Political Information, Alexey Mukhin, concedes that the President of Turkey will change his point of view on relations with Russia as soon as it's in his interests to do so.
For a very short time, the situation has been reversed.
I think that Erdoğan has entered a period of shuttle diplomacy.
‘It was then, from a position of "zero problems with neighbours" that Turkey began to actively develop its relations in the Middle East and Asia’.
Glazova believes that it would be incredibly difficult for Turkey to return to the previous relationship with EU; the question right now is whether or not the EU will start to get tough in response to Turkey, which could resort to opening the borders to migrants and, as such, create serious problems for Europe.
The Junior Doctors Committee (JDC) of the British Medical Association (BMA) is to ask its full council to back more industrial action from early September.
It was rejected by 58% of its members who voted in the ballot.
In a letter to members released on Twitter on Thursday night, the JDC's chair Ellen McCourt said the government had remained "persistently silent" on issues which, she said, had resulted in the contract being rejected.
She said: "In light of this, the JDC Executive has voted to reject the proposed new contract in full and to call for formal re-negotiations on all of your concerns."
In response to the government's silence, JDC exec has today made a formal request for a special meeting of BMA Council to authorise a rolling programme of escalated industrial action beginning in early September.
The dispute has led to junior doctors taking part in six strikes this year, including the first all-out stoppages in the history of the NHS.
The BMA's junior doctor leader, Dr Johann Malawana, resigned following the vote to reject the negotiated terms of the contract, which the BMA had recommended.
I lost count.
The next day one newspaper here described Mr Erdogan as acting as if nothing bad had ever happened.
But a lingering coolness emanating from Mr Putin showed that Russia's leader has forgotten nothing.
Mr Putin lashed out, accusing Ankara of stabbing Moscow in the back.
The offence was even greater, coming from a supposed friend.
Rebuilding real trust will be hard, perhaps impossible.
All of a sudden, it seemed like Turks were to blame for everything.
Russia could claim a victory of sorts.
For Ankara the benefits of calling a truce are clear.
First and foremost, Erdogan needs all the friends he can get after he was nearly ousted from power last month in a failed coup.
Repeat terror attacks on Turkey have clearly shaken him too.
Russian sanctions have hit hard - particularly the ban on charter flights, which usually carry several million Russian tourists to the Turkish coast each year.
As for Russia, tour operators and charter companies here will certainly be relieved when flights eventually resume.
They're banking on a late-season rush to the Mediterranean.
And even this week, state TV has been predicting cheaper fruit and vegetables once Turkish agricultural imports are permitted again.
"Tourists that way, tomatoes back here," as a report in Vedemosti newspaper phrased it.
Add to that its long-standing grudge at the snail's pace of talks to join the EU and step in Mr Putin - who is keen to capitalise on the chill and chip away at Turkey's ties with the West.
The Russian leader certainly won bonus points with Ankara for calling in support of the elected authorities after the attempted coup.
There is no clear consensus on where they can seek common ground on Syria.
But after months of open hostility - and given the potential for utter disaster when Nato member Turkey shot down that Russian fighter jet - it is surely better that the two leaders are at least talking again.
The brand RBS is to be reduced to a back office role, according to the bank's chief executive.
It has retreated from them since it nearly collapsed eight years ago and had to be bailed out.
It was backed with millions of pounds in sponsorship of international sport, from Six Nations rugby to Wimbledon champion Andy Murray.
Royal Bank of Scotland will be used with Scottish customers, but will not be initialised.
In England and Wales, all RBS references, outside head office and the stock exchange listing, will be changed to NatWest.
There are other, smaller brands for private banking, which will get more prominence - Coutts, Adam & Co, Drummond, and Holt's Military Bank.
Mr McEwan was interviewed during a tour of customers and staff in Inverness-shire.
He told BBC Scotland: "The RBS brand will end up becoming our investor brand and the one that our staff are employed with, because we are now becoming much more a bank of brands."
Each one of those brands will stand for something quite different in their own communities, and our staff will work with customers under those brands.
RBS had already stated that it would not to continue its Six Nations sponsorship, and it has been raising the profile of different brands in its sports sponsorship.
"The time is right for us to move to the bank of brands, because underneath (we've been asking) how do we focus on making this a better bank for customers?" said the chief executive.
It would have been very cynical three years ago if we'd said we're going to be a great bank for customers and put those brands out there.
We can bring those brands back up again, so I think the time is right.
Frankie Dettori reaches 3,000 winners with victory at Newmarket on Predilection
Dettori sprays champagne after a double at Newmarket takes him to 3,000 wins
Jockey Frankie Dettori secured his 3,000th British winner at Newmarket on Friday.
He brought up the landmark with his second winner of the night at his local track - on Predilection, trained by John Gosden.
The 45-year-old Italian is the sixth jockey to reach the landmark in Flat racing.
Three-time champion jockey Dettori, who earlier won on Ghayyar, said: "It's special."
I'm very emotional because my family are here as well
It's not a big meeting, it's not a Royal Ascot - it's a mundane Friday night with 20,000 people.
I'm relieved and very humble.
Dettori soaks up the cheers as he brings in Predilection after victory
Two jockeys have reached the milestone in jump racing - champion jockey Richard Johnson and retired 20-time champion Sir Anthony McCoy, who had more than 4,300 victories in a record-breaking career.
Frankie is one of the best jockeys of the modern era and it is no surprise he has reached this landmark so few have achieved before him.
He is a fantastic ambassador for racing, his enthusiasm and charisma have been drawing fans to the sport for years.
I said to Frankie a few weeks ago at Epsom he'd have ridden 6,000 winners if he wasn't just a weekend and big-race jockey!
Seriously though, Frankie's been riding winners in the UK for the best part of 30 years which is great to see.
He's a lively character which is good for British racing but more than that, he's an incredible jockey.
Frankie Dettori celebrated the milestone with a trademark flying dismount
From flying finishes to flying dismounts, Frankie Dettori has been the poster boy of British Flat racing for two decades.
It has been a rollercoaster ride.
Stacks of big-race winners, including his famous 1996 'Magnificent Seven' at Ascot, but he also survived a plane crash and served a drugs ban.
And he may not be done for some time - Dettori has previously said he would like to carry on competing until the age of 50, at least.
Mr Putin told a Russian TV station on Friday that Mr Ivanov had asked to leave the post, and recommended that Mr Vaino should replace him.
This is a move that has mystified Moscow.
But the official claim - that a man once touted as a potential president, suddenly wanted to run Russia's environmental policy - has been met with great scepticism.
In remarks to Mr Putin, quoted on the Kremlin website, Mr Ivanov said "it's true that in early 2012 I asked you, in a conversation, to entrust me with this very complicated post, even - you could say - troublesome post, for four years.
Well, it turns out that I've been presidential chief of staff for four years and eight months.
When Mr Putin came to power, he named Mr Ivanov as one of the five people he trusted most.
It was once thought that Mr Ivanov might become president of Russia after Mr Putin's second term, as a third term for Mr Putin would have been unconstitutional.
Criminal Minds star Thomas Gibson sacked after hitting producer
Details on how Gibson's character will be written out of the show, which follows a team of FBI agents, is expected to come at a later date, according to the ABC Studios and CBS Television Studios statement.
"I love Criminal Minds and have put my heart and soul into it for the last twelve years," Gibson said in a statement released on Friday.
I would just like to say thank you to the writers, producers, actors, our amazing crew, and, most importantly, the best fans that a show could ever hope to have.
The show is slated to return for its twelfth season on 28 September.
Mystery as fish land in Banff garden
Kevin Bain thinks the 75 fish could be sand eels deposited by a waterspout.
Queensferry Crossing: Bridge now connected to Fife
Engineers have joined the Queensferry Crossing's north deck and viaduct - meaning the bridge is now connected to Fife.
It is the first of four closures between the "deck fans," which are now nearing completion around each of the bridge's three towers.
The bridge section from Fife is now 600 metres long and weighs 30,000 tonnes.
Economy Secretary Keith Brown visited the site today and was among the first to walk from the land on to the bridge.
He said: "This is a historic and symbolic moment in the building of the Queensferry Crossing.
We're all witnessing engineering on a truly epic scale on this project, with over 30,000 tonnes of concrete and steel used just to build this part of the bridge.
Despite the massive size and weight of the bridge completing the closure between the viaduct and bridge deck is a delicate operation involving extremely precise tolerances for fit up.
Overall, nearly 79% of the total bridge deck is now in place, the final section of deck is having its concrete deck cast in Rosyth today, meaning all the deck is ready to be lifted into place on the bridge.
Michael Martin, Forth Crossing Bridge Constructors project director said: "The first closure on any bridge project is always a significant milestone.
On this fantastic project, this closure represents leading edge civil engineering.
After installing the last road deck section and connecting it to the expanding North Tower road deck, we then had to close the remaining gap on the north - or landward - side.
This was done by pulling the northern approach viaduct 700 millimetres southwards.
Massive because the viaduct is 222 metres long, weighs approximately 6,000 tonnes and had to be pulled up a gradient of about 3%.
Delicate because the tolerances the team were working to were tiny - just a few millimetres either way.
Moelfre Bay rescue: Three men are 'lucky to be alive'
Three men are "lucky to be alive" after they were thrown from their fishing boat off Anglesey.
Moelfre RNLI lifeboat station raised the alarm at 13:20 BST on Friday after a crew saw the incident unfold in Moelfre Bay.
The three men struggled to swim to safety while their boat continued under its own power.
"We saw their boat circling close to them and imagined the worst," said Moelfre lifeboat helm Vince Jones.
"Fortunately, by the time we had launched, the strong winds had blown it clear of them," he added.
Two of the men were rescued by a local fishing boat, while the third man, aged 60, was found exhausted and clinging to a buoy without a lifejacket.
They were all taken on board the inshore lifeboat and brought back to the lifeboat station
The boat's engine had an emergency kill cord but it had somehow come detached from the person driving the boat when it capsized.
That teenagers and children do not get outside to play any more, preferring to spend their free time looking at screens, has been the lament of many for the the past decade.
I am of course referring to the craze that is Pokémon Go, an app based on the characters first created for video games in the 1990s (it later spawned a cartoon series, playing cards and other spin offs).
Like many pop cultural phenomena it had gone off the boil somewhat before this new game was made available in the US, Australia and New Zealand in early July.
So how does it work?
In a nutshell, players on smartphones go out looking for Pokémons, which are tracked with a GPS and, once found, can be 'photographed' (via a screenshot on your phone) or 'captured'.
A generation who played the game when younger have joined the craze, jumping off the couch for the search.
In the US, the game has led to a significant increase in the number of steps taken by the "average" person each day.
Cardiogram, an app for the Apple Watch that tracks 35,000 users, told the Washington Post recently that within two days of the game launching, the number of people it tracked who did 30 minutes of exercise each day jumped from 45 per cent to 53 per cent.
The company does not know who is playing Pokémon Go - it just sees raw data on exercise levels.
Many public health campaigns to get people to "find 30," "get off the couch" and "be active everyday" have fallen on deaf ears because most public health messages are boring and delivered by people who look miserable.
Those who exercise regularly reduce their chances of getting cancer or depression.
Activity helps with weight management, high blood pressure, diabetes and a long list of benefits too long to list here.
Thus you are covering three pillars of health - movement, fresh air and sunshine, and fun.
As usual there are po-faced killjoys looking for something to complain about.
And yes somebody might walk into a door.
So what?
A breakthrough has occurred.
For while smartphone apps like Fitbit could previously track our activity, they didn't give us a reason to exercise like this game does.
The novelty will wear off and use will subside in due course.
Simone Biles nails all-around gold in women's gymnastics
Forget the hype.
Simone Biles is immune to all of it.
Dynamic on vault.
Effortless on beam.
Jaw-dropping on floor.
Brilliant all over.
The 19-year-old American gymnast soared to the all-around title on Thursday, putting the gap between herself and the rest of the world on full display under the Olympic spotlight.
Her total of 62.198 was well clear of silver medalist and "Final Five" teammate Aly Raisman and Russian bronze medalist Aliya Mustafina.
United States' Simone Biles performs on the balance beam during the artistic gymnastics women's individual all-around final at the 2016 Summer Olympics in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil, Thursday.
Biles became the fourth straight American woman to win the all-around title and fifth overall while cementing her reputation as the best of her generation and perhaps ever.
The achievement puts her in the same league as once-in-a-generation athletes like Michael Phelps who have taken their sports to new heights:
One last test awaited in Brazil, a contest not so much between Biles and the rest of the field but between herself and the burden of oversized expectations.
Anything less than heading back to her family's home in Spring, Texas, with a fistful of golds would be seen as a disappointment.
Biles earned the first one on Tuesday while serving as the exclamation point to retiring national team coordinator Martha Karolyi's going away party.
While Biles insisted she's never looked ahead during her long run at the top, that's not exactly true.
A portion of her floor exercise routine - the one that includes her signature tumbling pass - is set to Latin music that would fit right at home in the street right outside the Rio Olympic Arena.
The girl adopted by her grandparents as a toddler and discovered by coach Aimee Boorman's mother during a field trip to the gym where Boorman was coaching has become a force.
She hasn't lost an all-around competition since the summer of 2013, a winning streak that should go for as long as Biles wants it to.
Though Mustafina took a small lead through two rotations, it was a mirage.
Balance beam and floor exercise - where Biles is the defending world champion - lay in wait.
She went back in front with a 15.433 on beam - and capped it with a 15.933 on floor.
Raisman hugged her gently as they awaited the final score - a mere formality - and tears appeared around Biles' glittery red, white and blue eyeliner when the vision she once wrote in a scrapbook became a reality.
Raisman's performance was a bit of revenge from four years ago, when she tied for third but lost the bronze to Mustafina on a tiebreaker.
This time, the 22-year-old team captain the Americans call "grandma" was well ahead.
She blew kisses to the crowd after her floor exercise, overcome by a comeback that at times seemed in doubt.
Two women and a 12-year-old girl who died in the deadliest attack in Phoenix's first serial killer case in a decade were sitting in a car talking and listening to music when they were shot, according to police reports released Thursday.
The gunman fired as many as eight shots from a handgun while standing on the passenger side of the car then fled in another vehicle, the report states.
Phoenix police spokesman Sgt. Jonathan Howard said the shooting prompted investigators to look at whether it was tied to four earlier attacks.
"It's occurring within a residential area in front of a home," Howard said to CBS affiliate KPHO earlier this month.
The suspect is believed to have used several vehicles, including as a late-1990s brown Nissan, a late-1990s black BMW and a white Cadillac or Lincoln.
Authorities also released a police report on a shooting that targeted an unoccupied pickup truck just a half-hour before the triple killing and is believed to have been the work of the serial killer.
Mother of 6-year-old with microcephaly: "It gets better"
But unlike most of his peers, Edmund has microcephaly, the result of a genetic disorder his mom Elizabeth Picciuto didn't know about while pregnant.
I didn't sign up for this.
Which is not true at all -- of course you sign up for it," she said.
"My first response was 'I didn't think people did that anymore,'" Picciuto explained.
Edmund didn't sit up or crawl until he was three, and he still doesn't talk.
But he's slowly meeting some milestones.
He also loves playing with his two brothers, and singing.
Elizabeth demonstrates the sign language Edmund made up for "please sing to me."
"We're teaching him sign language," Picciuto told CBS News.
Microcephaly can arise from a number of different conditions: genetic ones like Edmund's, and infections during pregnancy from viruses like measles and Zika.
Picciuto remembers the emotional toll of an uncertain future.
I kept saying, what's going to happen?
I actually haven't asked for a prognosis in forever, because I don't expect anyone to really be able to tell me.
But Picciuto has hopeful advice for the mothers of babies with birth defects from Zika.
Louisiana Gov. John Bel Edwards said state officials are in constant contact with local officials, and assistance is already on the move to affected parishes.
Mike Steele, a spokesman for the Governor's Office of Homeland Security and Emergency Preparedness, said requests were coming in for high-water vehicles, boats and sandbags.
Steele said Tangipahoa Parish alone requested tens of thousands of sandbags.
A flood watch remains in effect until Saturday across most of south Louisiana.
The weather service said in a statement that an additional 3 to 5 inches could fall over the area.
In south Alabama, a flood watch was in effect Friday as rain continued in the Mobile area.
The Comite River near Baton Rouge and Amite River near Denham Springs, both in Louisiana, were predicted to set record crests over the weekend.
He also said that flooding downstream in Ascension Parish is a threat, as those swollen rivers will be slow to drain into Lake Maurepas.
The Tickfaw River, just south of the Mississippi state line in Liverpool, Louisiana, was already at the highest level ever recorded at 9 a.m. Friday.
Rescuers were still plucking people from floodwaters in Amite and Wilkinson counties in southwest Mississippi.
Hansford, 62, says waters from Beaver Creek, which is normally more than 400 feet away from his house, rose quickly overnight.
He said another stepson who lives nearby alerted him.
It came up to my waist.
His wife told Hansford that it's the highest she's seen the creek in the 48 years she's lived there.
Hansford said he and his family members all have disabilities, and he's the only one who can swim.
Hansford said emergency workers rescued all three in a large military-style truck and took them to the fire station in Gloster, where they were sheltering Friday.
Krautmann says one observer near Livingston reported 13.75 inches of rain from midnight to Friday morning.
CBS affiliate WWL reports that an alderwoman in Tangipahoa said 200 homes flooded.
Parish President Robby Miller said authorities rescued 72 people and seven pets stranded by high water.
In the Tangipahoa Parish city of Hammond, close to two dozen streets were closed because of high water, and sandbags were made available for pickup by residents hoping to keep water out of homes and businesses.
This one is on track to be a similar event.
He said a handful of houses were reported as flooded Thursday, but none have been reported so far Friday.
"I've seen water in some places I have never seen before," Townson said, "and it's still coming down."
Mahaj Brown, 6, "riddled with bullets," survives Philadelphia shooting
The child's grandparents identified him to CBS Philadelphia as Mahaj Brown.
The grandparents say Brown suffered multiple gunshot wounds, including in his groin, leg, arm and abdomen, but was awake when he was transported to the hospital.
"He just took a lot, his little body was riddled with bullets," his grandmother Delores Melendez tells the station.
Family tells the station he is expected to recover.
Brown was among four people shot in the Germantown section.
The child was found shot in the front seat of a car along with the 29-year-old in critical condition, the station reports.
Assault weapon-style shell casings, traced to different assault style weapons, littered the scene.
It appears that this was definitely an ongoing battle.
There were casings in the street, on both sides of the sidewalk.
Another 6-year-old, a girl, was hit in her arm by a stray bullet Tuesday while playing in front of her home in the West Oak Lane neighborhood.
That's what I call this year's Women's Olympic Gymnastics Team and for more reasons than one.
And second: This team features three gymnasts, Simone Biles, Gabby Douglas and Lauren "Laurie" Hernandez, who have been inspiring so many young girls of color.
The make-up of this team, rounded out by Aly Raisman, who is Jewish, and Madison Kocian, who is Catholic, is making everyone proud.
For the past four years, the number one female gymnast has been African-American.
This is powerful.
Last Olympics, Gabby Douglas was a surprise Olympic champion, and America cheered.
On Thursday, Simone became the fourth straight American to win gold in the women's individual all-around event.
And teammate Aly Raisman earned silver.
We are witnessing the top of the sport, but it does not look like this at gymnastics classes across the country.
They are the "Final Five" because the next Olympic gymnastics team will only have four gymnasts on the team, and this is Marta Karolyi's last year coaching.
But the reality is that gymnastics is an expensive sport, and gymnasts primarily train in private gymnastics clubs that are maintained by parents paying the cost of the training, facility, travel, uniforms, competition fees, hotel fees (for the coaches and their gymnasts and families) and the list goes on.
Most of these gymnastics clubs are located in affluent suburban neighborhoods that can support the business.
These clubs are where the gymnasts get all of their training, and it's a costly and long-term commitment for the gymnasts' families.
We must bring more affordable and accessible gymnastics training to the communities of countless young girls who are inspired by Simone, Gabby and Laurie.
I founded my gymnastics foundation 20 years ago.
At my organizations, we have provided free and low-cost gymnastics, based in Harlem, for over 15,000 urban youth (primarily black and Hispanic) and have trained national and international champions.
In September, we will be expanding to Detroit (my hometown) to provide high quality gymnastics to the youth that deserve the opportunity to learn and benefit from this great Olympic sport.
To participate in sport is so important, especially for girls.
Thank you Simone, Aly, Laurie, Gabby and Madison for that serious showcase of "Girl Power" in winning the Olympic team gold and for motivating so many young girls of all backgrounds to begin their path to be healthy, strong and successful young women.
In July, Mr Hunt revealed plans to impose the contract saying the NHS was in "no man's land" and any further delay would be damaging for staff and patients.
The first junior doctors are moved onto the new contract, which includes changes to overnight and weekend working practices to improve care at unsociable hours.
With just eight weeks before the first group of doctors are moved onto the new contract, progress needs to be made and time is running out.
"Jeremy Hunt needs to act now, lift the imposition and address junior doctors" concerns.
If he does not then junior doctors are clear that they are prepared to take further industrial action.
The last strike at the end of April saw the postponement of nearly 13,000 routine operations and 100,000 appointments as nurses and consultants were drafted in to provide cover for doctors on the picket line.
The BMA wants better weekend pay for the 54,000 junior doctors who would be subject of the contract.
Mr Mortimer said: "Industrial action achieves little or nothing, but places pressure on already stretched teams and services and causes worry, distress and disruption for patients, carers and their families."
Over the last two months we have been talking with the Junior Doctors Committee and have, along with the Department of Health and others, responded positively to their concerns regarding the Guardian Role and Whistleblowing.
NHS watchdog NICE has advised that it should be given to people for four years, to further reduce the risk of cardiovascular problems.
But now NHS watchdog NICE has advised that it should be given to people for four years, to further reduce the risk of cardiovascular problems.
If the plaque breaks apart it can cause a blood clot, blocking blood to the heart causing a heart attack.
In provisionally recommending ticagrelor we are pleased to be able to increase the treatment options available to the many thousands of people who stand to benefit from it.
Because information on the efficacy and safety of ticagrelor - particularly the risk of bleeding - beyond three years is limited, the draft guidance does not recommend treatment with it beyond that period.
PC culture let vote fraud in Muslim areas flourish
Ex-Tower Hamlets mayor Lutfur Rahman was removed from office last year for corruption, prompting the government report
A culture of political correctness has led to a blind eye being turned to widespread voting fraud in Muslim communities, a devastating government report reveals today.
Ex-Cabinet minister Sir Eric Pickles lambasts the police, election watchdogs and town halls for ignoring evidence of electoral abuse because of "over-sensitivities about ethnicity and religion."
The report even suggests putting indelible ink on a person's fingers as they cast their ballot to prevent anyone being able to vote twice.
Last year a special election court ruled the sitting mayor, Lutfur Rahman, should be removed from office following a litany of corrupt and illegal practices.
Rahman, it was said, "ran his campaign on the basis that it was the religious duty of faithful Muslims to vote for him."
Up to 300 votes were dubious or the result of personation, where a person votes while posing as someone else.
Sir Eric made 50 recommendations to clean up the system, including banning political activists from handling postal ballot papers to stop "vote harvesting."
The report, being considered by Theresa May, also calls for tougher checks on registration to prevent the electoral register being used for immigration and benefit fraud.
Consider the options for requiring voters to produce ID before voting.
Use indelible ink on a person's fingers once they cast their ballot to prevent anyone voting twice.
Put a three-year limit on requests for an automatic postal vote.
Change the law to make it easier to charge people with intimidation under the Representation of the People Act 1983.
Make it illegal to take pictures in polling stations.
"The election court disqualified Lutfur Rahman and his agent for a litany of corrupt and illegal practices," he said.
He was found guilty beyond reasonable doubt - to a criminal standard of proof - on a series of grounds.
He also criticises the ineffectual "tick-box inspections" of town hall electoral registration departments.
Sir Eric said: "Last year's court ruling in Tower Hamlets was a wake-up call.
Our nation has a proud heritage as the mother of parliaments, yet the worrying and covert spread of electoral fraud and state of denial by some bodies threatens that good reputation.
Crazy for Kate's cyclist lookalike and other celeb doppelgangers of Rio Olympians
Fans of the Rio 2016 Olympics this week have gone wild for French cyclist Pauline Ferrand-Prevot, who has proven an impressive lookalike for the Duchess of Cambridge.
But the 24-year-old Olympian is far from the only athlete out fighting for gold this summer that boasts their own celebrity doppelganger - at least not according to social media.
The hunter and the wolf: U.S. Men's Archery Team member Brady Ellison, left, has been compared to Leonardo DiCaprio since he was a kid
Aside from Kate's doppelganger on the cycling track, many people online have been quick to point out how a certain archer could be the twin of A-lister Leonardo DiCaprio.
U.S. Men's Archery Team member Brady Ellison has caused a storm on Twitter after images of him looking eerily similar to the Wolf of Wall Street star surfaced.
And in fact, the archer became aware of the social media frenzy and admitted that he has been hearing that he looks like Leo since he was a kid.
'I personally don't see a huge resemblance, maybe besides the facial hair,' Brady told Huffington Post.
One of the most popular comparisons from London 2012 is undoubtedly going to be pointed out even more this year: the striking likeness between British long jumper Greg Rutherford and popular actor Neil Patrick Harris.
Russian gymnast Aliya Mustafina, with her large, expressive eyes, has been said to be a dead ringer for Cuban-American singer Gloria Estefan.
And over in the pool, South African swimmer Cameron van der Burgh has been getting compared to Glee star Matthew Morrison for years now.
Changing it up: This user reckons that Nathan is an 'athletic version' of the Inception actor
Another long-running comparison has been between tennis star Rafael Nadal and actor Josh Hartnett who boast a similar heavy brow and lips.
Tough women: Soccer star Hope Solo, left, and Dexter actress Jennifer Carpenter, right, have similar face shapes and eyes
Floating a theory: According to this user, perhaps there is a reason behind the pair's similar looks
One Twitter user took to the site recently to declare her happiness that 'the rest of the internet thinks that Hope Solo and Jennifer Carpenter are actually identical.'
Other popular comparisons have included Kerri Walsh-Jennings and her smile that is near-identical to that of actress Laura Linney, as well as gold medal-winning gymnast Gabby Douglas, who boasts her own beautifully broad smile that matches that of Bring It On star Gabrielle Union.
CBC Olympics commentator apologizes for saying Chinese swimmer 'died like a pig'
Byron MacDonald's analysis of 14-year-old Ai Yanhan's fourth place finish at the women's 4x200m freestyle relay outraged viewers of CBC's live Olympic coverage on Wednesday
Canadian broadcaster CBC has been forced to apologize after one of its commentators said a 14-year-old female Chinese swimmer 'went out like stink' and 'died like a pig' during a race.
Commentator Byron MacDonald thought his mic was turned off when he started to dispense some of his own opinions at the end of the women's 4x200m freestyle relay final.
MacDonald, who was brought on board CBC's commentary team to provide 'color' could be heard saying: 'That little 14-year-old from China dropped the ball, baby'.
Too excited, went out like stink, died like a pig.
Chinese swimmer Ai Yanhan, 14, swam the second leg of the relay in 1:57.79 - 1.61 seconds slower than Canada's Taylor Ruck, allowing the Canadians to close the gap on China.
Emmett Macfarlane tweeted, "Did the CBC announcer just say the 14-year-old swimmer from China 'died like a pig'"????
Ai Yanhan of China in the Women's 4 x 200m Freestyle Relay Final was described as: 'That little 14-year-old from China dropped the ball, baby.'
Criticism on Twitter came thick and fast against Byron MacDonald with many calling him out
Twitter users did not hold back when the heard how insensitive Byron Macdonlad was being
Another twitter user, Sarah Paradis, wrote: 'Wow #ByronMacDonald.
You represent the CBC and Canada and make us all sound like a bunch of racists. #disgusted.
Soon after, Scott Russel who was hosting CBC's broadcast apologized on-air for MacDonald's comment, saying: 'We apologize the comment on a swim performance made it to air.'
It was an unfortunate choice of words, we're sorry it happened.'
Fellow commentator, Scott Russel, had to make an apology on MacDonald's behalf
CBC then copied and pasted their apology to more than 90 other twitter users who complained about MacDonald's comments
The network was also quick to apologize and released a statement.
On Thursday afternoon, MacDonald apologized on-air and attempted to qualify his remark by stating he didn't mean for it to be construed as a personal attack.
'I was referring to a swimmer's performance, and not to them as a person.'
'Needless to say, there was no disrespect intended and I'm very sorry.'
Primark shopper outraged at woman who brazenly tried on underwear in the middle of the shop
Shoppers didn't know where to look when a woman stripped off to try on knickers on the shop floor in the middle of a Primark.
To make it even worse, she sized up how she looked in them, peeled them off and put them back on the shelf.
The Primark store in Bouverie Place shopping centre, Folkestone, where the woman tried on knickers before putting them back on the shelf
A mother-of-two, Jenny Davidson, who was in the shop at the time, said after trying on the underwear the mystery woman 'got dressed again and walked out of the store without buying anything.'
Standing in the middle of the shop floor, she took a pair of knickers from the display, stripped off her own tights and pants and put them on.
'She didn't try to find anywhere discreet to do it - she just stood there, bold as brass.'
'Everyone was staring as she took the knickers off again and obviously didn't like them because she put them back on the shelf.'
She did the same with three more pairs before finally deciding there was nothing she liked and she got dressed again and walked out.
'She didn't seem to care who was watching - or think about the person who would eventually buy the knickers she'd been trying on.'
Ms Davidson added: 'I gather the staff apparently tried to remove the garments from sale after she had left - which is just as well.'
'I'd hate to get home with a new pair of knickers and find another woman had put them on and taken them off again, and they hadn't been washed.'
How to defend yourself from gun attacks using Krav Maga
Whether you're approached from in front or behind, this video will show you how to turn the tables on your mugger.
If approached from behind, Mizrachi says, the first thing to do is turn around, so that you can see your attacker and 'clear the line of fire'.
You then grasp the gun between your forearm and shoulder before hitting them in the face with your free elbow.
A knee to the groin follows, and while the attacker doubles up in pain, you twist the gun from his hands, smack him in the face with the barrel and back up, keeping the weapon trained on him.
For gunmen approaching from the front, it's a similar technique - get your body out of the line of fire, grab the gun and twist it around so the villain can't fire.
At the same time, put weight on the gun and punch the attacker in the chest, then twist the gun from his grip before backing up and pointing it at him.
But remember that the safest way out of any mugging - if you're not a Krav Maga grandmaster - is to hand over your cash.
Traveller Ian Wright scrapes his tongue along Europe's dirtiest places for travel guide
A British traveller has put his immune system and gag reflex to a serious test - by licking some of the dirtiest and disgusting places in Europe.
Presenter and travel writer Ian Wright, 51, from Suffolk, scraped his tongue along a Euro note, a Piccadilly Circus hand rail, a train toilet's flush button and a Russian public telephone to prove the strength of his immune system.
Before licking each object, he used a luminometer to show himself, and us, just what he was getting in to.
But the experiment, which has be made into a film called The Lickhiker's Guide to Inner Strength, threw up some surprising results.
The thought of licking a train's flush button used by thousands of other may be utterly repellent, but in fact there are more bad bacteria in a kitchen sink.
Fortunately, nothing he licked left him with anything more than a bad taste in his mouth.
Mr Wright became known for testing the durability of his gut by travelling around the world and eating weird and wonderful things.
From public handrails in train stations to a toilet flush button the task definitely tested his immune system
In the movie made about it he said: 'Ever since I was a kid I have been fairly carefree with my health and I've put all sorts of things in my mouth from soil, eating worms and muddy water.'
The only thing he turned down was a filthy Russian public toilet.
His sample swab showed a luminometer count of over 4000 units.
By comparison, freshly washed hands should come in under 60.
But there was one Russian public toilet he refused to lick after his luminometer count was over 4000 units, when freshly washed hands are less than 60
Mr Wright and Finnish dairy producer Valio have produced the traveller's film called The Lickhiker's Guide to Inner Strength which shows the bacteria count in different place like in the bathroom
There's nothing more dirty than that!
I'm not going to lick anything because it's disgusting in there.
The Lickhiker's Guide to Inner Strength was produced in conjunction with Finnish dairy producer Valio.
The company provided Mr Wright with Valio Gefilus, which contain lactic acid bacteria as well as vitamins C and D to help boost people's gut bacteria and immune systems.
Growing interest in gut health is a global phenomenon and with the documentary we could provide consumers with more information about it in an interesting way.
Tom Hakala, who directed the film, added: 'Let's put it this way - I would have lost my respect for Ian if he had licked some of the things I asked him to, like the disgusting Russian toilet that's shown in the film.'
Naturally some things were easier to get Ian to lick, some were pretty tough.
I'm glad we got some of those dirty licks caught on tape.'
In a survey conducted in 2015 by Valio, 84 per cent of the respondents associated lactic acid bacteria specifically with the well-being of the stomach and gut and 58 per cent said they use at least occasionally products containing added lactic acid bacteria.
Family of yobs destroyed Saltash, Cornwall council house ahead of eviction
Tanya Skeldon and her partner Shaun Trebilcock have been kicked out of the property in Saltash, Cornwall, after a long list of complaints against them.
After they were forcibly removed from the property, shocked housing associations officers found the property in a state of disrepair.
The walls were left with gaping holes, floorboards were ripped up, rubbish was strewn over the floor and graffiti was daubed on the walls.
Donna McEvoy, housing manager at Cornwall Housing, said she feared it might be beyond saving.
There are a lot of things to weigh up because this property will probably be known by the not-so-nice element of Cornwall.
This family are notorious and their name is notorious.
The couple had three sons who lived at the property intermittently and police say the reign of terror the family inflicted included fighting in the street with baseball bats, intimidating nearby residents, drug use, drug dealing and excessive shouting, arguing and swearing.
Skeldon, 47, whose name was on the tenancy, was given an antisocial behaviour order in June.
Old rubbish was found in a number of the rooms of the house, which may be demolished
Floor boards had been pulled up in the property, from which drugs had been dealt in the past
Cornwall Housing evicted her and her partner forcefully from the property this week after giving them an extended period of 11 weeks to move on voluntarily.
The eviction was hailed by relieved neighbours who said their lives had been made a living hell.
One said: 'They didn't care about anybody.'
The amount of times we've seen the police down here is unbelievable.
'This morning, we couldn't sleep.'
We got up because it was so quiet here - we're not used to that!
Adam Fitzpatrick, Cornwall Housing's neighbourhood enforcement manager, said the family failed to cooperate with the local authority.
The family have lived in the house for 20 years, with police regularly called to the property
Rubbish and old toys have been thrown down the overgrown side of the council house
He added: 'It is a shame that the tenant failed to accept any responsibility for the behaviour of her and her family as eviction is always the last course of action that Cornwall Housing considers.
This was a very difficult case as the behaviour was extreme and their actions must have been terrifying for her neighbours to witness.
I hope that this development will give some comfort to the neighbours and sends out a message that antisocial behaviour will not be tolerated.
A dirty mattress left on the floor of one of the bedrooms in the house after the eviction
Housing workers will now have to clear away the piles of rubbish which surround the house
In 2014, police raided the property and found more than 70g in cannabis as well as scales, paraphernalia and £1,700 in cash.
The walls of many of the house's rooms had graffiti scrawled across them.
'This sends out to those who feel that they can behave without recrimination, as well as those blighted by such behaviour,' she said.
Tourists in Portugal are left terrified as a low-flying military jet flies skims beach
Tourists sun worshipping in Aveiro, Portugal, had the shock of their lives
A Portuguese air force P-3C Orion plane swooped in incredibly low
This is the moment terrified tourists start to panic as a low-flying jet swooped down over a packed beach.
Dramatic footage showed the military plane almost coming within touching distance of sunseekers on the stretch of sand in Aveiro, northern Portugal.
Holidaymakers rose to their feet as they became understandably concerned about the noise from the jet engines without being able to see at first what was coming their way through the clouds.
Daniel Fernandes, one of several holidaymakers who posted videos of the dramatic fly-by onto social media, said: 'It passed really low twice and there was a point when it looked like it was going to crash.'
Nuno Arroja added: 'I was surfing and swear it felt like the plane was going to fall on top of me.'
Tourists on the beach at Aveiro were terrified when the plane appeared out of the murk and flew at an incredibly low altitude
He said the jet had flown slightly lower than normal because of poor visibility caused by the smoke from nearby wildfires, but the air force insisted no-one's safety had been compromised.
Wildfires have devastated parts of mainland Portugal this summer as well as killing four people on the island of Madeira.
The Portuguese air force said today the pilot had to fly low because of the conditions - thick fog and smoke from wildfires - which obscured his visibility
For more than a year already, conformance with the Hazard Analysis and Critical Control Points system (HACCP, KhASSP in the Russian version) – an analysis of risks and critical control points – has been mandatory for manufacturers and transporters of food, as well as for companies in the field of food services in Russia, as a member of the Customs Union (CU).
Today, the system is used in all food enterprises, not only in United States, but also in Canada and in the European Union.
Businesses were given 4 years to develop and implement the system (the HACCP requirement first appeared in the technical regulations of the CU in 2011).
But this won't lead to a spike in demand, since the core market, families with children, are already getting ready for school, experts point out.
‘For many Russian tourists, selecting affordable, quality seaside vacations is still an unresolved issue, because, in the resort towns of Krasnodar Krai and the Republic of Crimea, the majority of accommodation facilities are already booked up until the end of September’, note the authors of the letter, while emphasising that the establishment of charter operations in August would not significantly affect existing demand for Russian seaside tourism products.
Charter packages can count on those who have the ability to spontaneously take a vacation’, says Pavel Rumyantsev.
Otherwise, there's no sense in counting on a buying frenzy; the majority of travel has already been planned.
Pavel Rumyantsev also believes that, because there is demand for scheduled flights to Turkey, charters will also be in demand, but there is no sense in expecting a buying frenzy.
‘For Turkey, the launch of charters right now is a rehearsal for next season’, says Pavel Rumyantsev.
‘The establishment of charters to Turkey is good news for the next season’, agrees Valeriya Rubtsova.
The tax code provides for an exemption from personal income tax as established in accordance with legislation on compensation payments within the bounds of established rules related to indemnity for damage caused by injury or another impairment to health.
A reasonable estimate of assumed risks, as requested by the regulatory authority, and a reliable picture of the value of the bank's assets, led to the emergence of grounds for the application of bankruptcy prevention measures at the credit institution.
A temporary administration has been appointed at the bank for a period of validity up until the appointment of the bankruptcy manager or liquidator.
JSC JSCB GAZSTROIBANK is a member of the deposit insurance system.
She was believed to have been killed by a Russian air strike in Raqqa, the group's stronghold in the country, ITV News reported on Thursday.
"One would hope that the only benefit out of this is - as a tombstone and testament to others, that these are the risks actually involved in going to a war zone - to dissuade people from ever making that choice really," Akunjee said.
Senate Republicans have blocked Garland's confirmation since President Barack Obama nominated him in March.
A spokeswoman for Reid later said he had not spoken to Clinton directly about whether she would nominate Garland and was speculating.
He praised Garland and said Clinton's team would not want to "rock the boat" with a new pick.
Reid said Republicans who are blocking Garland's nomination are "minions" and "enablers" of Republican presidential candidate Donald Trump.
Treats says nude calendar for 'women, as well as men'
But instead of famous naked people, they're setting out to find the next generation of top models for their 2017 NU Muses calendar.
Treats president Steve Shaw told us earlier this year that his nude-heavy magazine differs from old-school Playboys because "Playboy is for men."
Apparently he thinks the calendar is, too.
"We need to get back to showcasing timeless and classic nudity where women, as well as men, feel comfortable and inspired by these images of the female body," Shaw said in a press release announcing the calendar.
In Moscow, a notice is about to be released that will describe how to avoid falling victim to an online store.
At the moment, the notice is being finalised.
During the investigation, the FAS established that Google is only supplying manufacturers of smartphones that are sold in Russia with the Google Play app store on the condition that the corporation's other applications will also be installed on the device.
The New Book chain was fined for selling the book, ‘50 days until my suicide’.
As reported by Rospotrebnadzor, without specifying the amount of the fine, the text of the book can be seen as 'encouraging or motivating suicidal behaviour in children and adolescents'.
A source from New Book confirmed that the incident concerned Stace Kramer's work.
Unfortunately, not everyone will be able to say goodbye to Neizvestny, face-to-face, in the United States.
They noted that this is important to the sculptor's widow, Anna Graham, and to his friends throughout the world.
Close friends of Neizvestny have been invited to the evening event, including: the poet, Yevgeny Yevtushenko; the artist, Boris Messerer; President of the Pushkin Museum, Irina Antonova; the director, Mark Rozovsky; as well as Minister of Culture, Vladimir Medinsky; Head of the Department of Culture for Moscow, Alexander Kibovsky; and Deputy Mayor of Moscow, Leonid Pechatnikov.
Earlier, it was reported that Ernst Neizestny's relatives plan to hold a memorial service for the sculptor in New York, presumably before 14 August.
Vinyl destination: who is actually buying records?
Before you rush to litter the comments section with gnarly insults under the pseudonym NotAllLonelyMiddleAgedMen, this statement derives from actual data.
According to YouGov, the much talked-about record resurgence is driven not by a boom in millennials who want to embrace the novelty of a physical item, but by midlife nostalgia.
Those who have recently purchased a vinyl album are most likely to be aged between 45 and 54, apparently.
It is not just an act of hoarding by hobbyists, either - it has emotional significance: older vinyl buyers are slightly more likely to keep their feelings to themselves (56% versus 53%) and enjoy being alone (69% versus 66%).
But are YouGov's results true?
If this blog was a televised news report, the camera would follow me as I walked down the middle of a busy Soho street, wearing a modest grey suit and gesturing wildly before stopping, cupping my hands and saying something authoritative like: "So, let's take a look."
While the heart of Soho is slowly being drained of its charm and grot - hotels, Eats, Prets and Paperchases now fill the buildings once occupied by independent sellers - a handful of fantastic specialist record shops still remain.
I'd probably ask the camera to stop rolling for the next bit, in which I stand very close to various men in some of these stores and attempt to gauge their age and emotional disposition via observation.
Glaswegian Stuart, 55, whom I follow from Sister Ray (data count: two young women, three middle-aged men) into Reckless Records (data count: eight middle-aged men, one woman, probably in her 20s) is in London for the afternoon for a meeting and is perusing the shops to fill a few hours.
These records, pictured above (he emailed me the snap, I didn't follow him home), line his living room walls.
His reason for acquiring such a vast number of albums and singles is partly a result of his disposable income: he is now able to buy records he couldn't afford when they originally came out, and to repurchase items he sold when he was young and skint.
"A lot of the stuff I get is late 60s, early 70s, things that came out when I was 11 or 12, things I was probably a bit too young to get," he says.
He has, however, noticed a new wave of people influenced by the media hype, people who heard about the comeback and felt compelled to buy back their old records.
Customers who once sold their vinyl to buy CDs are now selling their CDs to buy their records back," he says.
That may explain a boom in vinyl revivalists of a certain age.
But what about the alleged emotional importance of records?
It takes a few seconds in a shop such as Phonica to realise that record stores offer a comforting community of likeminded types.
According to Wez, some older customers have taken umbrage with the contactless payment system in particular.
Some vinyl fans may feel overwhelmed by the digital world and choose to retreat to the stability of the familiar record sleeve, of items that recall halcyon teenage memories.
As a collector myself, I have that, and I think a lot of people do.
It's an easy way to occupy your headspace.
"We're like their social workers!" pipes up a co-worker from a stack of records.
The poll also found that 41% have a turntable they never use, while 7% of those who purchase vinyl don't own a record player.
At this stage of the news report, I would probably be looking gravely concerned while flicking through a stack of bossa nova compilations.
The "trophy" aspect of the revival is something that Jonny, 42, who works in Sounds of the Universe (data count: three midde-aged men) has noticed.
"Someone came in recently and said: "I don't have a record player, but I want to buy a Radiohead record so we can put it on our shelf,"" he says.
That's not a large percentage, but it's definitely happening.
More of the product side, less of the music.
That's younger people, not older ones, late teens who are just getting into it.
Fopp, which now dedicates almost an entire floor to vinyl, has a far more varied audience when I arrive.
While the atmosphere is less at ease than the aforementioned stores - Wild Beast's latest synth- and sex-fuelled pop, rather than noodling jazz, is blasting from the speakers - it is good to see diversity in its customers.
None of them look particularly lonely, but nagging psychological trauma is hard to ascertain by standing next to someone for 30 seconds.
Elanora, 27, has been walking around Fopp for a few minutes, looking at the variety of records on sale.
She is window-shopping, rather than on a spending spree.
She doesn't earn a lot, she says, so collecting records isn't really an option.
It's easy to listen to music by a computer or another way, but the beauty of vinyl is ..." she drifts off into a lovestruck sigh.
I don't know how to explain - it's really unique.
My last stop is a shop said to have inspired a fresh generation of vinyl lovers: Urban Outfitters.
While giving the illusion of perusing the denim hot pants, I observe a group of teenage girls, who cluster around the Polaroid cameras momentarily, before a dad and his daughter deliberate purchasing a Crosley record player.
To the left is a stairwell, a wall of which is stacked with records by Adele, Jeff Buckley, Amy Winehouse and Fleetwood Mac: a mix of contemporary and classics, the essential records for any average collection.
It is pure "art vinyl."
But, given that any attraction to these items could mean more money for the industry and send a few customers into the depths of Soho for more, there is little to complain about.
It is no surprise that a demographic more likely than most to have more time and money than most is also the one that spends the most on luxury items such as vinyl.
But while my findings suggest YouGov's results are accurate, in Soho record stores at least, they do not discount the huge number of female collectors and vinyl lovers that exist in reality, in record shops and on online forums.
They are certainly not spending their Thursday mornings loitering around the record shops of Berwick Street, flicking through records and avoiding the gaze of a creepy, 30-year-old fake television presenter who is looming over the shoulders of unsuspecting middle-aged men.
Greenland shark is longest-living vertebrate animal - video report
Scientists say the Greenland shark has the longest lifespan of any vertebrate on the planet.
Julius Nielsen, who has been studying the sharks, says record goes to a female thought to be between 272 and 512 years old and is five metres in length
Humanitarian groups had told the court the shops and restaurants were vital, saying the free meals offered by a state-backed association and other groups did not provide enough food for the growing numbers at the camp.
They argued the makeshift shops and restaurants often provided shelter and free meals to those in need.
One of the places that had been under threat from demolition was the camp's Jungle Book Kids" Cafe which is run not-for-profit and provides 200 meals a day, English and French classes, and asylum advice for the hundreds of vulnerable unaccompanied minors in the camp.
More than 170,000 people have signed a petition to protect the kids" cafe.
A letter sent to the Guardian said its closure "would be a catastrophe for these children, some of whom are as young as eight."
Two charities, Help Refugees and L'Auberge des Migrants, on Friday estimated that numbers in the Jungle camp have risen to over 9,000 people - the highest ever - after a steep increase in arrivals during the summer.
The programmes are oriented towards children, so for the most part, they will be play-based.
On 11 August, Library Branch No. 1 will hold a local history hour, ‘I live in this city; I know this city’.
On the same day, a multimedia lesson will be held at Library Branch No. 2 called, ‘The past fate of the native land’.
Britain settle for silver in rugby sevens after Fiji masterclass sees them take gold
Great Britain's impressive run in the Rugby 7s was brought to a crashing halt at the final hurdle by Fiji in the final on Thursday night when they were comprehensively beaten 43-7 at the Deodoro Stadium here in Rio.
Fiji gave a masterclass in handling, off-loading, side-stepping, support play, running lines and brute strength to win gold - their first Olympic medal of any colour.
Defeat came with the non-too shabby consolation of silver - Britain's third of the day - and they could be proud of their efforts in the inaugural Olympic 7s tournament in which they beat New Zealand, Argentina and South Africa along the way.
The bruising beating of the Boks, 7-5 in the semi-final earlier in the day, may have come back to bite them in the final.
But, regardless, Fiji on this form would have beaten a fit as a fiddle 15-man team.
It may be some consolation to GB - but probably not - that at least one Briton will have a gold medal around his neck tomorrow: Fiji's head coach is Ben Ryan, the former England boss from Wimbledon.
It has been some journey for GB.
Eight years ago, under Ryan, they lost every game at the Adelaide Sevens.
Here, they lost just one.
This hammering will hurt but the progress is startling.
Fiji started magnificently, bouncing off GB tackles for fun.
It was like running into a series of moving buses for captain Tom Mitchell and co and the World Series champions went 5-0 up when Osea Kolinisau dived over in the corner.
With four minutes on the clock Jerry Tuwai added another down the right wing, which was converted.
12-0 and GB had hardly touched the ball.
A superb Mitchell tackle stopped the man-mountain Leone Nakarawa from scoring a third but it was only delaying Fiji.
On seven minutes Jasa Veremalua touched down in the right corner and GB were 17-0 to the bad.
Nakarawa added another from the restart and there was still over a minute on the clock ... in the first half.
Vatemo Ravouvou then burst through some more limp GB tackling and stormed to the line to score.
The conversion made it 29-0 at the break.
It was as if Fiji had been born to play 7s, while GB are still learning the trade.
GB made wholesale changes at half-time and they plugged the Fijian dam...for all of four minutes, which by first-half standards was good, until Josua Tuisova went over after some brilliant Fijian interplay.
Dan Norton grabbed a try for GB, touching down in the left corner to make it 36-7 but the game was long gone the way of the South Sea Islanders whose fans sang, waved flags and danced in the stands.
It was hard not to admire Fiji's whole joyful approach.
Mata Viliame iced the Fijian cake that didn't need icing with another try in the dying moments.
The whistle went, the Fijians embraced and GB hit the turf, thoroughly beaten.
Earlier in the day, Fiji had beaten Japan 20-5 in their semi-final and GB edged South Africa in a tight semi-final of one try each - Britain's conversion the difference.
Kyle Brown put the Boks ahead in the first half but Dan Norton with some dazzling footwork broke the line and scored under the posts in the second half.
A brilliant late tackle from Marcus Watson, brother of England's 15-aside team, Anthony, secured the win - and ultimately the silver medal.
Helen Glover and Heather Stanning inspired to rowing victory by coach's cancer battle
There will not be a more emotive gold at these games, and that is saying something.
From the first stroke to the last, 220 punishing heaves into history, Helen Glover and Heather Stanning found added meaning in their golden moment at the Estacio da Lagoa.
Though they were the two pulling on the oars, there were three voices in that boat, the echo of coach Robin Williams ever present as they powered to a second successive Olympic gold in the women's pairs, the first females in the annals of British sport to scale such a height.
Their dominance was absolute, after all this was their 39th outing unbeaten, again unprecedented.
What we see, two brilliant athletes skating over the surface with the elegance of swans, does not wholly reflect the nature of the triumph.
Behind every rowing gold is a battalion of willing hands contributing the incremental gains that make the difference, and no hands were more instrumental than those of a coach who 30 months ago did not know whether he would live to see this day when diagnosed with cancer.
As he said, it was touch and go.
If they don't it goes everywhere.
The trio were fortunate that he was able to begin his treatment at the start of 2014 out of season, keeping the disruption to a minimum, if that is ever the right expression in circumstances such as these.
I needed to get paid so I had to get better quickly.
I was in hospital and I was walking around the ward - 20ft, 30ft 50ft at a time when they were saying a few steps is enough.
Rowing in itself is a journey but that makes it a bit bigger.
In the immediacy of victory their first thoughts were for Williams, who had spent a nervy morning talking a little more than usual in an attempt to process his own anxieties.
Stanning, a captain in the Royal Artillery regiment with a tour of Afghanistan behind her, said "I've been an emotional wreck this week, maybe that's a bit extreme, but it means such a lot."
It just reiterates how much this means to me, how much me and Helen have worked and Robin as well.
It's been a fantastic three years back with Helen and Robin.
Without Robin we would be nobody, so a massive thanks to him he's the best coach in the world.
I couldn't have asked for a better person to train with, or a better coach.
The pair set a punishing rhythm that their rivals could never match.
Even in the final 500 metres when the crews from New Zealand and Denmark began to close, Stanning and Glover had too much in reserve.
We were very much in the moment.
Helen was calling 'stay in the process, stay in the process'.
It's really important not to get carried away.
We weren't looking for fireworks today, we were just looking to do a good row and to go out and win that race, which we did.
The pair will take a year before deciding their futures.
Glover has a wedding to attend next month, her own to television adventurer Steve Backshall.
That would have meant too much pressure.
In London it took about six months to realise that I was an Olympic champion.
This feels so much better," she said.
The embargo against countries that have imposed anti-Russian sanctions over the situation in Ukraine was introduced in our country in August 2014.
Then, overnight into Saturday, there will be periods of rain in some areas of Moscow, with possible thunderstorms and wind gusts of up to 15 m/s.
Precipitation is unlikely for the upcoming workweek.
'This is the first time that the WTO has decided against Russia', says a statement on the official website of the organisation.
However, the arbitrators pointed out in their conclusion that the EU has not provided sufficient evidence that Russia's measures ‘were systematic' or 'were overarching in nature'.
Similar statements were made by Brazil, Japan, the EU, and other WTO members, because of the Americans' refusal to approve South Korean judge, Seung Wha Chang, for a second term.
Vladimir Putin carried out the reshuffling of the Executive Office of the President and expressed hope that the new head of his administration would facilitate the constructive work of the government and the Kremlin.
They note that the outgoing head had been working in the presidential administration for a significant period of time and had effectively organised the work of the Presidential Executive Office.
The state-owned Polish Oil and Gas Company, PGNIG, has not ruled out the possibility that, in a few years, the supply of gas from Russia could become unappealing to it, as a result of a reorientation towards fuel from Norway and other countries.
An auction for the allocation of Nord Stream 2 capacities will be held in 2017, and it is planned that an auction for its installation will take place in the autumn of 2016.
The deputy chairman of Gazprom added that the mere fact that Poland's PGNIG filed a complaint with the Stockholm Arbitration Court does not necessarily mean that negotiations have broken down.
In March, the representative of the Polish government for issues of gas and energy infrastructure, Piotr Naimski, stated that, in six years time, his country could opt out of deliveries of the ‘blue fuel’ from the East.
According to him, Warsaw is planning to build the Baltic Pipe, a new LNG supply terminal, which will connect the country with the Norwegian shelf.
This was announced by Principal Deputy Chief of the SMM in Ukraine, Alexander Hug.
According to the OSCE, the situation on the border of Ukraine and Crimea is calm, and there haven't been any reported incidents affecting security.
A video of a Yak-42 passenger plane, which landed at Ufa airport, skidded 400 m off the runway, and fell on its left wing, has appeared online.
They were quickly evacuated to a safe place, and there were no injuries.
The aircraft itself was transported to the apron.
The Volga District Transport Investigation Department of the Investigative Committee of Russia has begun the process of determining the reason for the liner's rough landing.
All parties to the conflict deny using chlorine gas, however, UN Special Envoy for Syria, Staffan de Mistura, considers the fact of what happened to be indisputable.
At that time, the opposition said that aircraft dropped bombs with a poisonous substance in the area where a Russian military transport helicopter had been shot down the previous day, but Moscow deemed these accusations to be utterly false.
Soon thereafter, it came to light that there were two bombs filled with toxic gas.
‘A few minutes later, I could smell the gas, my eyes started to burn, and it became difficult to breathe’, the publication quotes the witness as saying.
The prohibition of the use of chlorine gas for military purposes is spelled out in the Convention on the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons (CWC).
The situation in Aleppo is complicated by the fact that its districts are being bombarded on a daily basis, and the terrorists are preventing the withdrawal of residents from the city.
‘We have to send bulk cargo in convoys of trucks into an area where the roads are virtually destroyed and those that remain are mined’, reported Mr Egeland. But the Russian delegation has confirmed its readiness to sit down with us at the negotiating table’.
All at once, several explosions rocked southern Thailand on Friday morning.
None of the terrorist groups have taken responsibility for the incident yet, but the Ministry of the Interior was quick to declare that the Islamists had not been involved in it.
The Thai junta considers protecting the monarchy one of its main priorities, so the incident was most likely directed against it.
According to statements by Police General Sithichai Srisopacharoenrath, the bombs were remotely detonated within a half hour of each other.
Recall that, on 22 May 2014, a military coup took place in Thailand under the leadership of the commander of the country's army, Prayuth Chan-ocha.
The military created the National Council for Peace and Order, imposed a curfew and censorship, dispersed protesters, and dismissed the upper house of parliament.
In January 2014, in the heart of Bangkok, two explosions occurred at the Victory Monument, which was one of the main sites of the protest, and as a consequence, 28 people were injured and five of them were in critical condition.
The development of terms has begun in Sukhoi Log.
Kommersant has learned that the government has been asked to approve a proposal for the terms of an auction for the gold deposit, Sukhoi Log, while preserving two key restrictions.
It is proposed to bar from the auction companies that are 25% or more foreign-owned and those bidders whose capital will not consist of at least 25% state participation.
The representative in charge of subsoil use, Deputy Prime Minister Alexander Khloponin, told Kommersant that the official's administrative office has not yet received the draft.
The first is that bidders must have a minimum of 25% state participation in their capital.
The second is that companies under the control of foreign investors are denied access to the auction, based on an understanding of Federal Law No.57 on investments in strategic entities.
The requirement of state participation in the capital of auction participants was proposed by Irkutsk Region, the Ministry of Natural Resources and Environment told Kommersant in December 2015, which was later confirmed by the region's governor, Sergei Levchenko, noting that it had been sent to the Ministry of Natural Resources and Environment by his predecessor, Sergei Eroschenko, ‘who had an agreement on investment projects with Rostec’.
Kommersant's sources did not specify who lobbied for the restriction on the participation of foreigners.
On 1 August, Minister of Natural Resources and Environment, Sergei Donskoy, said that foreigners ‘can enter into a consortium’, if bidders invite them to participate ‘in the capacity of a financial structure and as technology partners’.
The industry front-runner for Sukhoi Log is believed to be a consortium of the largest gold mining company in the Russian Federation, PJSC Polyus (which is controlled by Suleiman Kerimov's son, Said), and Rostec.
As Kommersant wrote, in July, the partners established a joint venture, CL Gold, which gives Polyus 51% of the shares, and the structure, Rostec RT-Global Resources, 49%.
Rostec declined to comment, while Polyus told Kommersant that ‘definitely, they are interested in the asset’ and possess all the necessary expertise and resources for its development.
The largest M&A deal in the pension market has gotten underway: KIT Finance Pension Administrator has launched the process of combining four Non-State Pension Funds (NPF) under its control.
The launch of the merger of the four pension funds – KIT Finance, Promagrofond, Nasledie, and Gazfond Pension Savings – was reported yesterday by the 100% owner of the funds, KIT Finance Pension Administrator, LLC.
The merger is being carried out on the basis of Gazfond Pension Savings.
For example, NPF Future, under the control of O1 Group, absorbed Stalfond back at the beginning of this year.
In 2017, NPF Doverie will join them.
The pause in merging funds that KIT Finance Pension Administrator took could have been caused by several factors, experts say.
Until recently, NPFs could not redeem more than 40% of the volume of an issue of infrastructure bonds in which the group was actively involved.
If necessary, an entire issue can be redeemed by one big player’, says Yury Nogin, Director of the Financial Institutions Ratings Group at ACRA.
Several heads of the top-15 NPFs by assets named the division of spheres of influence, and, as a result, the appointment of staff in a single fund, which had to be agreed to by the owners of the group, as yet another possible reason for the pause.
Yesterday, Anatoly Gavrilenko could not be reached for comment.
Moreover, the successful experience of NPFs, KIT Finance and Promagrofond, in generating retail sales of compulsory pension insurance and in using more modern software, will be in demand.
‘The effect of cutting out duplicate functions will definitely cover the potential costs of the merger’, notes Mr Mitrofanov.
The kindest Disney film, ‘Pete's Dragon’, has been released in Russia.
The beautiful views of New Zealand, the adorable dragon, the sentimental story, and the country music songs are enough to make one believe in good old-fashioned magic once again, says ELENA KRAVTSUN.
The dragon finds the frightened boy, becoming both a gentle caregiver and loyal friend to the young human.
Pete calls his friend Elliot, in honour of a puppy from a book of fairy tales, plays tag with him, and falls asleep in his embrace.
Six years later, with a beard and in a loincloth, he is indistinguishable from that other clever forest rascal, Mowgli.
Even Gavin, who unleashes a hunt for the unusual inhabitant of the woods under his control, is far from an incorrigible villain.
The huge fluffy dragon also turned out to be anything but frightening, with the sweet muzzle of a bulldog, the wingspan of an airplane, and the power of invisibility.
The dragon amusingly grunts, purrs, and even snorts, but, thankfully, does not speak; although, the whole time, you want to be petting him, and it is in this sense that he has an obvious advantage over all the other known cinematic dragons.
The visual representation of Elliot and his mannerisms create such a high degree of emotional involvement that, in the most intense moments, it's not only the young members of the audience who start desperately bawling their eyes out, but also the adults.
While Robert Redford masterfully plays the iconic grandfather, whom literally every child would be glad to have.
How did Director David Lowery manage to shoot a fantastically lovable remake of the forgotten Disney film, ‘Pete's Dragon’ (1977), – which was mediocre from start to finish and only remembered for combining animation and live-action film – and turn it into this summer's most heartwarming film?
Nothing short of a miracle would have helped.
Lowry, in fact, only took two things from the original for his film: the orphan Pete and the dragon.
Of course, ‘Pete's Dragon’ is not as stunningly beautiful as ‘The Jungle Book’, and there is no cunning villain, such as Cate Blanchett turned out to be in the role of the stepmother in the new ‘Cinderella’.
But this simple-hearted film, in keeping with the best traditions of Disney, is no less successful in helping one to believe in miracles and goodness.
In fact, Director Lowry will get the keys to Disney's magic castle once again for an artistic film adaptation of the story of ‘Peter Pan’.
The tandem of David Lowery and screenwriter Toby Halbrooks, tried and tested during ‘Pete's Dragon’, has entered into an ambitious new project about the boy who never grew up from James Barrie's fairy tale by the same name.
We only learned that the prosecutor's office had made such a recommendation from investigators yesterday.
In June of this year, it was reported that the investigation excluded the RBC journalist from a charge worded as ‘undermining the stability of political environment’ and ‘overthrowing the government by illegal means’.
Kommersant-Boscosport correspondent, ALEXANDER ZILBERT, lived the life of an Olympic athlete in the Olympic Village, inspected Team Russia House, had lunch at the on-site cafeteria, and, after all of this, even passed a WADA test.
The last events sometimes end after midnight, after which the athletes still need about one and a half to two hours to return to the Olympic Village.
Furthermore, people are constantly checking-in and checking-out of the village, as some athletes leave Brazil after finishing their competitions, while others, on the contrary, have only just arrived here.
Well, it's only 7:30 a.m. and all of the heads of the Olympic delegations are crammed into one of the temporary tents.
One day there's a problem with the hot water, and the next day it's, excuse me, the toilets.
At first, no one was even showing up to clean.
Their floors, can't you see, are somehow innovative.
Supposedly you can't wash them like a normal person.
Sure, we know these kinds of floors: ordinary laminate flooring!
In sum, we successfully managed to switch cleaning companies and now everything seems to be OK with this.
The Olympic Village is like Yuzhnoe Butovo, a residential district fenced in by mountains on one side and on the other sides, there is an impressive ditch filled here and there with water.
Well, for security, there is also a two-metre iron fence around the whole perimeter, along which guards, armed with automatic weapons, stroll.
A massive Russian flag hangs on one of these 18-storey buildings: this building has been totally handed-over for use by our team.
Taking a glance at the small foyer by the entrance, you can immediately identify the problems that are apparently the most pressing for our home team.
Two notices are hanging at the front desk: a printed one, ‘Please, do not throw paper in the toilet!’, and a hand-written one, ‘I will accept pins as gifts’.
The front desk itself is buried under pamphlets.
The inside text is, generally speaking, reassuring.
Next to the door, there is an inspirational poster: ‘In spite of everything, we shall prevail!’.
They are only believed by those who are afraid.
With the blessing of his Holiness Patriarch Kirill of Moscow and All Russia, Archpriest Andrei Vladimirovich Alexeev will perform spiritual care for the athletes of the Russian Olympic Team.
While Russians, it turns out, are given special treatment: they have their own chapel.
And, in the darkness, I stumbled over bodies laying down on them.
By all accounts, it was the staff from the new cleaning company sleeping.
On the ready, I dare say, at any moment to rush to wash the innovative floors, they had decided to arrange a naptime for themselves directly on the cold steps.
On the fourth floor, I had a meeting with a long-time acquaintance, Vitaly Fedorovich Dubko, the coach for our trampolinists, who led them to Olympic gold, 16 years ago already, in Sydney.
By and large, there is nothing to complain about, the honoured coach of Russia shares his impressions. We live two to a room, the beds, of course, are almost right up against each other, but it's not critical.
There is one bathroom for four people, but at least it's spacious.
Of course, the wardrobe is laughable; it's made of cloth and doesn't inspire a lot of confidence, but things can be put in it.
‘No, well, can you imagine it? They've run out of tea!’, tennis player, Svetlana Kuznetsova, who met me in the main dining room, says while throwing her hands up in dismay.
It's called the main dining room if for no other reason than the fact that it provides 2,7 thousand square meters of space and is ready to accommodate 5 thousand visitors at one time.
Who cares about soup?, Kuznetsova says in astonishment, There's no tea!
It's a good thing I brought some Chinese tea to brew with me.
Here, there is at least something to choose, despite the unbearable monotony.
I personally chose the steamed cod and meatballs in tomato sauce.
The well-fed, relaxed, and, in a manner of speaking, ‘food drunk’ athletes are awaited at the restaurant exit by our best friends: representatives from the World Anti-Doping Agency (WADA).
They cleverly entice with a quiz, the winner of which will receive a tee-shirt.
They're luring them in, you could say!
A girl from WADA ambushed me with ‘There are questions in Russian!’.
But she didn't ambush the right person.
That is to say, I harnessed my patriotic impulse, of course.
The situation already took a turn for the worse by the second question: ‘If I received a notification to report to doping control, should I report immediately to the doping control centre?’
I settled on option B: ‘No, I have one hour’.
I forgot that there's no sense in waiting for a break from WADA.
Essentially, you need to report immediately.
To be more precise, the answer is formulated in such a way that they don't outright forbid it, but rather, in a few sentences, strongly advise against it.
That WADA doesn't play fair!
‘So, how's it going, Russia?’, the presenter of the quiz mockingly questions.
There was nowhere to hide: behind me were Efimova, Isinbayeva, and the rest of our depleted team.
So I buckled down and, using my last ounce of strength, won that pitiful tee-shirt.
As the saying goes, let them see what we're made of!
I got caught up with counting the fitness machines.
I lost track at 250.
I noted with surprise that there was not a single Russian athlete to be found among this mass of treadmills.
Let those who don't know how to play be the ones who train!
However, one of our boys was sitting at the medical clinic located nearby.
In line to see the optometrist.
At the clinic, and for that matter, as with everywhere else you look throughout the village, hangs a device for distributing condoms.
It is inscribed with an inspiring appeal: ‘Celebrate with a condom!’
Then, you just have to turn a piece of metal resembling the knob of a door lock, and a condom, made of natural latex from the Amazon, readily falls from the device.
The athletes won't miss it; they brought in 450 thousand of these for them.
Beside it, for good measure, there is an informative plaque, reminding that the International Olympic Committee, in various ways, is spending $3.25 million on the athletes per day.
The centre is inundated with video games, billiards, ping-pong tables, foosball and air hockey tables, and some odd equipment that looks like video training simulators.
‘What is that?’, I ask a comrade in a Ukrainian team uniform, who is actively using the strange toy.
Of course, he could have just said that he didn't want to talk to someone in a Team Russia uniform, and that would have been that.
Here, incidentally, by some sort of strange set of circumstances, my eyes are sore from all these boys in yellow and blue.
A team that never stops playing around, it turns out.
It takes no less than three hours to walk around the whole village, exploring every nook and cranny.
But, if you walk and don't get a ride in the electric cars, you will discover Team Canada House with a moose at the entrance and a pavilion with a restorative bath, and a ticket office, and a laundromat, and a dry cleaners, and a hair salon, and a flower shop, and a shop with everyday goods, and a post office with unique stamps (only you won't be able to wait out the queue of Chinese stamp collectors anyways), and a bank, and a lost and found, and a photo booth.
And you, to the accompaniment of a device randomly spraying a liquid to kill insects, will think about eternity.
Which, in this village, doesn't stop even for a minute.
While the rest of the Russian world watched with bated breath as the Australians came close to trouncing the American Dream Team, the real fans went online.
I may even be the only Muscovite who saw how it unfolded, except, of course, for those who were watching the competition that night in Carioca.
Only a true fan could understand.
The neighbours downstairs, as per usual, wake up by 1 a.m. and start amicably, but very loudly, shouting at each other.
In the kitchen, the faucet is leaking: there hasn't been time to drive to the market and buy a new one like the plumber requested.
The TV schedule makes no sense, so I just kept an eye on the channels, Match, First, and, just in case, Russia, although that's almost pointless.
Russia channel is the birthplace of reruns: all the sports on there are prerecorded for some reason.
I, of course, was counting on Match: the whole evening the young man on the news broadcasts had been shouting first about the great semi-final between Deriglazova and Shanaeva, and then about the impending battle for the gold.
By the way, I can't say anything bad about this decision.
The Australians were an equal match, and, as a matter of fact, they won the first half.
They put the Americans, deluded by grandeur, in their place.
They still lost in the end, but, like they're now saying, the Olympic basketball tournament will never be the same again.
I start flipping through the channels in a slight panic.
It feels like they are playing it for the second time in a row.
There is no fencing on any of the specialty Match channels.
I'm not interested in settling for the text and twitter broadcasts of some sports websites.
The spastic channel surfing produces an unexpected but brilliant result.
It turns out that the First Channel website broadcasts the technical videostream of all events in real time.
I click on fencing and get the battle for the gold.
Deriglazova mounts a terrific counterattack, moves ahead in points, and, quite obviously, starts to run out the clock.
The Italian claws back almost all of the lead.
Our girl is one point ahead with just a little more than two seconds to go.
Di Francisca lunges at Deriglazova and the latter retreats; time is running out and the Italian makes a play.
My crazy, loyal, involved eyes.
Several of the mosques in Kazan have complained that the Tatar language is not understood by up to 60% of worshippers, such as foreign students, migrants, and even Tatars themselves.
The imams fear that their sermons in Tatar ‘won't reach the entire audience’.
Yesterday, a plenum of the MRB of Tatarstan unanimously adopted a decision to hold Friday sermons in the Republic's mosques in the Tatar language only.
‘For those who will say that it is “difficult”, we intend to organise absolutely free Tatar language lessons at each of the large mosques’, Mr Samigullin promised.
He added that ‘the decision has already come into force’, and, today, sermons in all mosques ‘should already be in the Tatar language’.
He reminded that the MRB of Tatarstan publishes the journal, ‘Shura’, with typical sermons in the Tatar language.
An imam, who does not speak Tatar well enough, ‘can use them to thoroughly prepare’.
The MRB of Tatarstan unites more than a thousand congregations throughout all the municipalities of the Republic.
In particular, as indicated by the mufti, this was the practice at Burnaevskaya Mosque, Zakabannaya Mosque, and at ‘Eniler’.
‘This has absolutely nothing to do with infringing on the rights of non-Tatar Muslims’, emphasised Mr Mukhametshin, explaining that the sermon itself ‘is not a mandatory main part of namaz’.
The decision by the MRB was actively supported by the Executive Committee of the World Congress of Tatars (WCT).
Chairman of the Executive Committee of the WCT, Rinat Zakirov, told Kommersant: ‘the mosque is an important part of our national life’.
He noted that conducting sermons in the Tatar language only, ‘is the will of the imams themselves’, but that the Executive Committee of the WCT ‘considers this to be the right decision’.
The imams interviewed by Kommersant who were conducting sermons in Russian, are ready to follow the decision by MRB, however, they believe that the congregation will have difficulty understanding the clerics.
Both Tatars and Russians attend mosque.
Of course, it's going to be a bit difficult for them.
According to him, even many Tatars have a closer affinity to sermons in the Russian language, since ‘Russian is what is in schools and in child care facilities, on the radio, and everywhere, from the very beginning’.
However, he is under the impression that the mosque will be able to continue lessons and lectures in the Russian language, which are held on other days.
‘That is why we switched to the Russian language four years ago’, the imam says.
The former head of the prison service, Alexander Reimer, and his deputy, will appear before the court, having inflicted damages to the FSIN in an amount of more than 2.7 billion roubles.
According to the Investigative Committee of the Russian Federation, between 2010 and 2012, the indicated persons fraudulently stole budgetary funds from the state treasury that were allocated to the FSIN to provide the agency with electronic monitoring systems for controlled individuals, otherwise known as electronic ankle bracelets.
As suggested by the investigation, more than 140 million roubles of the cashed money was personally received by Mr Reimer in his official office from one of the accomplices, whose criminal case was severed.
Ammunition, obtained from an unknown source for a special service award gun, was found in the possession of Nikolai Krivolapov, who was involved in the fraud, which resulted in the laying of additional charges against him.
In regards to this case, the size of which amounted to 133 tomes, FSIN has filed a lawsuit against the accused for compensation of material damages in the amount of 2.7 billion roubles.
Turkish authorities have issued an arrest warrant for Hakan Şükür, a former football player and then a member of parliament, and have carried out searches at his family's two houses.
A star of Turkish football in the 1990s and early 2000s, striker Hakan Şükür is wanted by authorities in connection with the coup attempt that took place last month.
This is in reference to the Hizmet Movement: a society associated with the well-known Turkish religious and opposition leader, Fethullah Gülen.
This is whom President Erdogan considers to be the organiser of the military coup attempt that occurred on 15 July.
In 2013, Hakan Şükür resigned from his parliamentary post as a result of the initiation of corruption investigations surrounding Erdogan's party and his inner circle.
‘I would create a chain of cinemas that are exclusively for Russian films, and the tickets would cost 2-3 times less than for foreign-produced films’, he said.
‘And it's even very difficult for them to compete with “Transformers” and “Iron Man”, the promotion of which are pumped up with huge budgets’, the film director said.
The British women, Helen Glover and Heather Stanning, won Olympic gold in pairs rowing.
New Zealanders, Rebecca Scone and Genevieve Beren, took silver, and Anne Andersen and Hedvig Rasmussen from Denmark came in third place.
This is a high-profile Saint Petersburg company that never misses a deadline.
For more information about the choice of the new general contractor, read the following Kommersant material: ‘Metrostroy has been let onto the pitch’.
Another lawyer for the accused, Sergei Kolosovsky, told Kommersant-South Ural that Konstantin Akulich was summoned to the Miass branch of the Investigative Committee of Russia today for arraignment on a year-old battery case.
‘Initially, it was filed against unidentified persons. Then, after he began to defend Nikolai Sandakov, it turned out that it was Akulich’, says Sergei Kolosovsky.
Moreover, half an hour before calling the lawyer into the Investigative Committee of Russia in Miass, the defence was notified that the deadline for familiarisation with materials in the case of fraud against Nikolai Sandakov was on Monday.
The second criminal case concerns bribes that Nikolai Sandakov allegedly received from Igor Kalugin, the director of the private security company, Python, in the form of property-related services worth no less than 1.3 million roubles, which were provided illegally at no charge.
This is evidenced, for example, by the fact that RMK took on the modernisation of one of the country’s oldest and most ecologically ‘dirty’ enterprises: the Karabash copper smelter.
This was recently noted by Boris Dubrovsky, Governor of Chelyabinsk Region, who visited Karabashmed in the first days of July.
In recent years, the flagship modernisation effort at Karabashmed became the construction of a new sulphuric acid plant that allows for the capture of up to 99.9% of metallurgical gases.
The next stage of modernisation at ZAO Karabashmed is the reconstruction of converter processing.
Over the entire duration of the Tominskiy Mining and Processing Plant project, from the start of construction up until the commissioning of the second phase of the project, the Federal Treasury will receive 8.9 billion roubles.
Once the mining and processing plant is in operation, tax revenues for budgets at all levels could amount to 80.9 billion roubles.
‘The longer the enterprise successfully operates, the more money it can contribute’, added Valery Ulanovsky.
RMK confirmed that, in 2015, the tax paid by the Mikheevsky Mining and Processing Plant was close to 1 billion roubles.
A front-row seat to the stunning architecture of the Los Angeles Central Library
Learn more about the history of downtown's Central Library as the Society of Architectural Historians/Southern California Chapter hosts a salon with Arnold Schwartzman and Stephen Gee, authors of the new book "Los Angeles Central Library: A History of its Art and Architecture" .
An open, industrial loft in DTLA gets a cozy makeover
Celebrating L.A.'s Central Library's 90th birthday with - what else? - a new book
As the publication notes, shelter employees started becoming suspicious after the Swedish newspaper, Sydsvenkan, reported similar stories in Malmö.
Denmark has accepted more than 20 thousand of them into country.
A fisherman caught a rare blue lobster off the coast of the Cape Cod peninsula (USA).
The man found the crustacean amongst others caught in his underwater trap, ABC News reports.
It should be noted that Wayne Nickerson has been catching lobsters for the past 35 years.
According to his spouse, the first time in his career that the man caught a blue lobster was in 1990.
According to ABC News, the crustacean acquires a dark blue or light blue colour as a result of genetic variations.
In April 2016, news broke that fishermen had caught a rare specimen of a deep-water shark, a Megachasma pelagios (a megamouth shark), off the coast of Japan.
Black Sea Fleet personnel carried out training operations to counter threats of underwater sabotage in areas of the Black Sea.
‘Military personnel from underwater anti-sabotage units completed work on countering underwater sabotage threats at a naval base on the coast and in the contiguous waters of the Black Sea’, Dygalo clarified.
During the naval manoeuvres, guard ships using sonar located hypothetical special forces units and repelled an attack from the sea by ‘underwater saboteurs’ against a Black Sea Fleet naval base.
A Ka-27 helicopter was used to land an airborne assault group, which blocked and eliminated the special forces of the hypothetical enemy.
Afterwards, Black Sea Fleet minesweeping vessels went out to sea to search for mines.
A Moscow Region court has arrested a father for the murder of his foster daughter: Investigation and trial: Law enforcement agencies: Lenta.ru
‘The court has granted a request by investigative authorities for a pre-trial restraining order against Chernikov in the form of detention for two months’, she said.
Specifically, Roman Chernikov said that he committed the child's murder at home on a day in April 2016, as a result of personal enmity and under the influence of alcohol.
Then, in an effort to conceal the child's body, he burned it and, together with his wife, scattered the remains over a large area.
On the evening of 9 August, in an interrogation with an investigator, the foster parents reported that, in April 2016, the six-year-old child had drowned in the bathtub.
They were able to hide the girl's disappearance from everyone for a long time; however, in August, knowing that staff from child protection services would soon be paying them a home visit, they decided to tell everyone that the child had gone missing.
The migrants arrived from the Greek island of Lesbos at the invitation of the Pontiff.
The lunch was held at the Vatican's Saint Martha's House, where Francis' private quarters are located.
It is noted that the meal was attended by two groups of Syrian refugees whom the Pontiff visited in Greece on 16 April.
According to Greek authorities, in 2015, a total of 800 thousand people crossed over from Turkey to the island belonging to Greece in the Aegean Sea.
A traffic jam, stretching over 40 kilometres, developed in Japan on the first day of the short summer holidays.
The country's traffic information centre reported this on Thursday, 11 August, RIA Novosti reports.
In Japan, it is considered bad form to take a full vacation.
The flagship boutique of Frame Moscow's chain of stores for luxury men's clothing and accessories opened following renovations, with a completely revamped design and range of products, a representative from the chain told Lenta.ru.
Only natural materials – walnut, brass, ceramic granite, and glass tinted in a wood tone – were used in the design of the space, said the representative for Frame.
The multimedia window displays play on the balance between tradition and cutting-edge technology.
The multi-brand Frame Moscow stores feature Marol shirts, bags and briefcases from Serapian, Jacob Cohen designer jeans, cufflinks and bracelets from Tateossian, Moorer jackets, and Barrett shoes.
Furthermore, the chain is the exclusive distributor of Atelier Portofino in Russia, a company specialising in individually tailored men's suits, and owns the mono-brand boutiques, Barrett and Jacob Cohen.
It will replace the fashion house's first store, which opened in this city in 2007.
Customers can personalise their purchases using hot stamping technology: in honour of the opening, plates with a view of Saint Petersburg were produced that complement the initials of the client.
A pensioner turns a stepladder into a ‘budget-friendly beach diving platform’.
Online users laughed at photos of an older man setting up a stepladder on the beach and turning it into a diving board.
In the comments, the ‘innovation’ was dubbed a ‘budget-friendly diving platform’ and a ‘mobile diving board’.
Many praised the man for his creativity and ‘resourcefulness’, while others drew attention to the fact that the man runs a serious risk of injury by jumping from his platform, given that he placed it at an insufficient depth.
‘First of all, we don't know how deep it is there: the beach could be scattered with sharp drop-offs just a metre in front of the ladder; and, secondly, even if it's only one metre deep there, with the right skills, it's possible to jump from a couple of metres’, wrote a user using the nickname, C0JIbAMDJZ
As reported by RIA Novosti, the Russian leader made a corresponding statement at a meeting with Vaino and his predecessor, Sergei Ivanov.
Putin praised the latter for the work accomplished.
The authorities of the French city of Cannes have banned visiting local beaches in a burkini: a special bathing suit for women that completely covers the body from the head to the ankles.
Wearing a burkini will result in a fine in the amount of 38 euros (approximately 42 dollars).
Migulya was found guilty of committing crimes established under Articles 286 ('Excess of power'), 285.1 ('Misappropriation of budgetary funds'), and 285 ('Abuse of official powers') of the Criminal Code of the Russian Federation.
The investigation established that, in December 2008, the official provided his friend with a plot of land in the village of Mukhinka in violation of established land legislation procedures.
In 2006, he unlawfully issued an ordinance for procurement of a road bridge over the Chigiri River for the city, at an over-inflated price, and without tendering procedures or signing a municipal contract, Interfax clarifies.
As a result, the regional budget was short-changed more than 5 million roubles and the city treasury was out by about 21 million roubles.
The Russian Ministry of Foreign Affairs has denied reports about the release of a Russian helicopter pilot held captive by the Taliban.
Details about the negotiations were shared by Russian Presidential Envoy to Afghanistan and Director of the Second Asia Department of the Russian Ministry of Foreign Affairs, Zamir Kabulov, in an interview with Interfax on Friday, 12 August.
Crimean Bridge construction workers have acquired the anthem, ‘I am driving a pile’.
A video called, ‘I am driving a pile’, has appeared on the YouTube channel of the Crimean Bridge project.
The writer, in particular, sings about how he is ‘driving a pile’.
According to the primary theory, their organisers were attempting to disrupt tourist season.
Another explosive device that was planted on the beach was defused by bomb disposal specialists.
The watchcase is decorated with loose diamonds.
To accomplish this, the jewellers used not only classic round stones, but also baguettes, as well as bespoke-cut trapezoidal and emerald-cut diamonds.
This watch, with quartz movement and the dark blue hands characteristic of the Graff design, was created in a single copy and is on display at the Mercury boutique in the Moscow Four Seasons Hotel.
It is a four-time winner of the Queen's Award for Enterprise in the field of international trade (1977, 1994, 2006, 2014).
JK Rowling's new book, ‘Harry Potter and the Cursed Child’, has become the best-selling in Great Britain, The Daily Mail reports.
The book, ‘Harry Potter and the Cursed Child’, has brought in 8.76 million pound sterling.
The play takes place 19 years after the events described in the book, ‘Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows’.
They stipulate that any ‘organiser of information disseminated on the internet, which enables the exchange of electronic messages’, is obliged to identify users based on information contained in the service provider's databases, having previously entered into agreements with them.
The celestial body is very dim and its diameter is about 200 kilometres, the publication, ‘New Scientist’, writes.
According to reports, in order to impose sanctions, the administration of President Barack Obama will need to officially accuse Russia of attacking the servers or hackers supported by the Russian authorities.
The WSJ notes that, generally, the United States prefers not to specifically name those who carry out cyberattacks.
They will need to determine if the incident is serious enough for them to exacerbate tensions in bilateral relations.
The media reported that hackers working with the Russian authorities might be involved in the hack.
The Russian company argued that Google grants manufacturers of smartphones access to Android components on terms that prohibited the pre-installation of applications from other developers, and, in particular, Yandex.
The FAS has confirmed these claims and found that the company abused its dominant position in the market and forced manufacturers of mobile devices to install other apps alongside the Google Play store.
This is the view expressed to Echo of Moscow by Eldar Murtazin, a leading analyst with Mobile Research Group.
A Volga Region resident leased a flat and then plundered it to the tune of 84 thousand roubles.
The 30-year-old thief managed to sell the stolen household appliances.
The press service of the regional Main Directorate of the Ministry of the Interior of Russia told a correspondent from MK in Volgograd that, yesterday evening, a resident of a satellite town contacted the police department with a statement about the robbery.
The man told the guardians of the law that an unknown man was leasing a flat from him.
When the owner went to check on his dwelling, he found it completely empty: no washing machine, no television, no fridge, not even the tenant.
Soon thereafter, the guardians of order were hot on the thief’s trail.
It turned out to be a 30-year-old unemployed Volga Region resident.
Now he will have to answer for the theft to the fullest extent of the law: a criminal case has been opened in relation to the man in custody.
So far, the tax agency has counted around 250,000 people owning vehicles.
The State Traffic Safety Inspectorate and the Federal Registration Service will provide information on taxpayers.
Citizens entitled to benefits will be granted discounts on the payment of property taxes; first and foremost this concerns the category of pensioners.
Also, there is a system of deductions on land tax, depending on the entitlement category of the taxpayer, but according to the head of the Federal Tax Service, it's too early to talk about this before 2017.
According to investigators, on the night of 16 June 2016, in an area of garages on Main Street in Balakhna, the accused saw that the cohabitants, whom he had visited the night before, were fighting.
The man repeatedly hurt his common-law wife, and then threw the woman over his shoulder and carried her home.
A terrible accident occurred yesterday evening, in the area of the Kiziltash tract on the Crimean Peninsula.
The press service for EMERCOM of Russia in Volgograd Region reported to MK in Volgograd that the commuter bus carrying passengers was travelling along the P-29 Sudak-Feodosia route at 5:05 p.m.
All of a sudden, the vehicle veered into a ditch and fell over a cliff.
The injured were taken from the scene of the accident by ambulance service vehicles to medical facilities, where doctors provided them with necessary care.
Four residents from Volgograd Region were seriously injured on that ill-fated journey.
When calling emergency medical services, we hope that the team will arrive quickly and the medics will provide all the necessary professional assistance.
The time it takes for emergency medical services to arrive at an emergency call is up to 20 minutes.
There are no official regulations on the time it takes for emergency medical services to arrive in response to a pronouncement of death.
This is the highest value in years (since June 2012) and the first one above zero since October of last year when a positive 0.2% was posted.
In July 2016, compared to the previous month, an increase was observed in the price of the following groups of consumer goods: food and non-alcoholic beverages (1.7%); transport (1.8%); recreation and culture (6.3%); restaurants and hotels (1.2%); miscellaneous goods and services (0.3%).
Prices decreased in clothing and footwear (2.2%); furnishings, household equipment and routine maintenance (0.5%); health (0.1%).
Prices remained at the same level as in the previous month in alcoholic beverages and tobacco; housing, water, electricity, gas and other fuels; communications; and education.
Snapchat says this filter is inspired by anime, but some observers say it's racially insensitive.
With its lens tool, Snapchat allows some 150 million daily users to alter reality and play with identity in ways that border on the absurd.
You can turn yourself into a pineapple, a dog or a character befitting a Roy Lichtenstein painting.
The lenses are blunt, feature-warping tools that generate more than 30 million enhanced selfies a day.
Any missteps quickly enter the public record.
So when it pushed a lens to some users this week that gave them slanted eyes, distorted teeth and puffy cheeks, some critics called it a racist caricature of Asian people - "yellowface."
And they wondered if these repeated controversies pointed to a larger problem that the company has with diversity.
The news and the outrage went wide on Wednesday, with reports by The Verge and Motherboard, a day after Snapchat said it had dismantled the feature.
The company offered an explanation: The lens was meant as homage to anime characters, not as a caricature of Asian people.
But for observers who have experienced racism, the lens reminded them of hurtful stereotypes in action.
In an email, Grace Sparapani, a Korean American art student whose tweet about the photos was widely shared, said that the lens was "hurtful and uncomfortable to say the least."
She added that "it's hard to argue with the side by side comparison of the very gross Asian caricature and the filter's effects.
It shows that the filter isn't just yellowface, but yellowface taken to its derogatory extreme.
Snapchat is not the only company to cross these cultural tripwires.
American culture seems involved in an endless struggle over diversity and inclusion, from corporate boardrooms to Hollywood and the devices we all carry in our hands.
And Snapchat's huge audience of younger people - who are more racially diverse than their older counterparts - might mean that they are even more likely to expect sensitivity.
When one of Snapchat's lenses creates an image that is insulting to a user, 25-year-old Katie Zhu said in an interview on Thursday, "it's much harder for these types of things to go unnoticed like they did before."
Ms. Zhu criticized the company's mostly white, all-male leadership and ended her essay with a hashtag: #DeleteSnapchat.
"It's either that they had no diverse representation of people of color on their staff to the point where they're able to make decisions like this," Ms. Zhu, who is Chinese-American, said, "or they do have some people of color who are working there, but they're not on positions where they feel safe or comfortable to speak up."
Other observers share her view, a complaint that Snapchat has left largely unanswered.
For her part, Ms. Zhu said she would keep her Snapchat account closed, adding, "I wonder if they actually need more users like us to be able to say that this is not O.K."
The interim report, from a task force established by the Republican chairmen of the House Armed Services Committee, Intelligence Committee and Defense Appropriations Subcommittee, found "widespread dissatisfaction" among Central Command intelligence analysts, who said superiors were doctoring their assessments of American efforts to defeat the Islamic State.
"What happened at Centcom is unacceptable - our war fighters suffer when bad analysis is presented to senior policy makers," said Representative Ken Calvert, Republican of California.
The 10-page report detailed persistent problems in 2014 and 2015 in Central Command's description and analysis of American efforts to train Iraqi forces.
From the middle of 2014 to the middle of 2015, the United States Central Command's most senior intelligence leaders manipulated the command's intelligence products to downplay the threat from ISIS in Iraq.
There is an additional, ongoing investigation of Centcom intelligence by the Department of Defense inspector general.
This process, Mr. Schiff said, "stalled the release of intelligence products," hurt morale among analysts and "insufficiently accommodated dissenting views."
But last year's allegations called into question how much President Obama could rely on Central Command for honest assessments of military operations in Iraq, Afghanistan, Libya and other crisis spots.
The critiques on the Islamic State intelligence mirror disputes of more than a decade ago, when a Centcom intelligence analyst, Gregory Hooker, wrote a research paper saying that the administration of President George W. Bush, over many analysts" objections, advocated a small force in Iraq and spent little time thinking about what would follow the 2003 invasion.
Mr. Hooker also played a key part in the insurrection over the Islamic State intelligence.
Last year, officials said, Mr. Hooker's team concluded that despite public statements to the contrary, airstrikes against Islamic State-held refineries had not significantly weakened the terrorist group's finances because it had built makeshift refineries to sell oil on the black market.
But the finding was not distributed outside Central Command, The Times reported in September.
Centcom's commander then, Gen. Lloyd J. Austin III, came under criticism last year after Senate testimony viewed by many lawmakers as being an overly positive assessment of the war.
General Austin retired in April and was replaced at Central Command by Gen. Joseph L. Votel.
U.S. Wins 4th Straight in Women's Field Hockey, Setting Up Showdown With Britain
One day after scoring three goals in a 6-1 victory over Japan, Katie Bam scored the first two goals for the United States women's field hockey team on Thursday as the Americans defeated India, 3-0.
Five goals in two games should be a memorable feat, but Bam, 27, said she was not sure if she had ever done the same thing.
I'm not really one of those people who keeps track of their goals.
Both teams have qualified for the quarter finals, and the game will decide who finishes first in their six-team bracket and who finishes second.
The first-place finisher will avoid the powerful Dutch, the leaders of the other bracket, for a bit longer when the quarter finals begin.
However Saturday's game turns out, the Americans have created a stir with their surprising run here, four years after finishing last among 12 teams at the London Games.
She grew up in Blue Bell, Pa., first picked up a field hockey stick when she was 3 (her twin older sisters played the sport at Drexel) and joined the national team when she was 16, becoming its youngest player ever.
The next year, Craig Parnham, an Englishman, was named the coach, and things began to change.
We didn't have the work rate in London that we have now.
We've made a complete turnaround.
On Thursday night, Bam opened the scoring in the first half with a backhand shot from close in.
India had come into the game without a victory in the tournament, but the team proved surprisingly tough and kept the score 1-0 until late in the third period, when Bam took charge.
She made a long run with the ball down the left side of the field, then curled into the middle and whipped the ball into the goal to give the Americans a 2-0 lead.
Melissa Gonzalez added the final goal midway through the fourth period.
The shutout was the first of the tournament for the United States goalie, Jackie Briggs, who had allowed one goal in each of the first three victories.
She is on a roll.
So is Bam.
Amid the Fury of the Olympics, the Zen of the Trampoline
Wherever you are, whatever time it is, it is the Olympics.
The events in Rio de Janeiro feel constant and inescapable, a furious relay of competition and striving.
It is as if the Olympic torch itself were a flaming baton, passed from archer to swimmer to gymnast to triathlete.
Mr. Dooley, a first-time Olympian and a dimpled heartthrob in the making, may well be among those household names being showcased in prime time, buoyed by sponsorships and feel-good TV commercials, if he were a swimmer, a gymnast or even a fencer.
But Mr. Dooley, 28, of Lake Forest, Calif., is competing for the gold in Olympic trampoline.
The Olympic flame does not illuminate each event equally.
We will always have the breaststroke, and long may it reign.
But if I may make a modest case for my particular favorite, let me call attention to the discreet charm of the trampoline.
Though trampoline has been an Olympic event since 2000, when it debuted at the Sydney Games, it has spent the intervening 16 years so barely acknowledged that many I surveyed did not realize it was an Olympic sport at all.
Despite sending athletes to compete, the United States has never won a medal in trampoline and did not have an athlete advance to the finals until 2012.
The Chinese and the Russians tend to split the prizes for the men, and the Chinese and the Canadians for the women.
But there is an underdog charm to trampoline, in part because it sounds, to the unenlightened ear, fitter for clown college than the Olympics.
Here I should confess that I am no expert, just an earthbound enthusiast.
It does have comic potential - the cartoon quaver of its never-ending bounce - but also the grace of gymnastics and diving, the two sports it essentially combines.
The word "trampoline" derives from the Spanish el trampolín, meaning "diving board."
Aspiring champions jump on a giant trampoline, shooting up to nearly 30 feet in the air, and are called upon to perform a series of tumbling moves (twists, pikes and somersaults) before eventually landing on their feet.
The most common Olympic vector is straight ahead.
Medal hopefuls must go farther, faster, up and over, in their quest for gold, sometimes to the finish, other times back and forth up and down the court.
They are chasing not only the finish line or the starting wall but also, in the televised coverage, another taunting line: that of the world, or Olympic, record.
This single-minded pursuit is noble, admirable, even fanatic - and it is enough to bring even a spectator to tears.
But it is also what I find slightly exhausting about even watching the Games.
From this, trampoline offers a respite.
The trampoliner's vector is up.
He or she rebounds, seeming weightless as an astronaut, going up, then down, then effortlessly up again.
It is not without competition, of course, nor without difficulty, but for the duration of a routine, there is no frantic charge toward the end, no vaulting into the distance, just the dreamy, graceful suspension of time and gravity.
It is as close to Zen as Olympic competition gets.
The women's qualifiers and then finals will take place on Friday afternoon, streaming at 1 p.m. Eastern time; the men's on Saturday, also at 1.
In the midst of Olympic mania, they promise a quiet, lovely moment, one likely to be overlooked in the general melee.
And if consciousness raising is to be achieved only by offering up male athletes for ogling and objectification - as the United States men's gymnasts recently proposed, according to The Wall Street Journal - Mr. Dooley only awaits his gasping new fan base.
"A Generation Is Protesting" in Ethiopia, Long a U.S. Ally
But in recent months, anti-government protests have convulsed the country, spreading into more and more areas.
Videos circulating from protests thought to be from late last year or earlier this year show security officers whipping young people with sticks as they were forced to perform handstands against a wall.
"It was always difficult holding this country together, and moving forward, it will be even harder," said Rashid Abdi, the Horn of Africa project director for the International Crisis Group, a research group.
American military and intelligence services work closely with the Ethiopians to combat terrorist threats across the region, especially in Somalia, and few if any countries in Africa receive as much Western aid.
Though Ethiopia has hardly been a paragon of democracy - human rights groups have constantly cited the government's repressiveness - opposition within the country had been limited, with dissidents effectively silenced.
"If you suffocate people and they don't have any other options but to protest, it breaks out," said Seyoum Teshome, a university lecturer in central Ethiopia.
The complaints are many, covering everything from land use to the governing coalition's stranglehold on power.
After a widely criticized election last year, the governing party and its allies got the last seat the opposition had held and now control 100 percent of the Parliament.
At the same time, tensions are rising along the border with Eritrea; a battle along that jagged, disputed line claimed hundreds of lives in June.
Several factors explain why bitter feelings, after years of simmering beneath the surface, are exploding now.
Several young Ethiopians said this was how they gathered for protests.
For eons, Amharas from Ethiopia's predominantly Christian highlands flourished in politics and business, exploiting the Oromos, many of whom are Muslim and live in lowland areas.
"We are on the way to coordinate under one umbrella," said Mulatu Gemechu, an Oromo leader.
Many Amharas and Oromos feel Ethiopia is unfairly dominated by members of the Tigrayan ethnic group, which makes up about 6 percent of the population and dominates the military, the intelligence services, commerce and politics.
The third reason behind the unrest is the loss of Meles Zenawi.
He was considered a tactical genius, a man who could see around corners.
Analysts say he was especially adept at detecting early signals of discontent and using emissaries to massage and defang opponents.
"The current regime lacks that ground savvy," Mr. Abdi, the conflict analyst, said.
Ethiopia's new prime minister, Hailemariam Desalegn, was plucked from relative obscurity to fill Mr. Meles's shoes.
Unlike Mr. Meles, who came from the Tigray region of northern Ethiopia, Mr. Hailemariam is a southerner.
Analysts say he does not have the trust of the Tigrayan-controlled security services.
The last time Ethiopia experienced such turmoil was in 2005, after thousands protested over what analysts have said appeared to be an election the government bungled and then stole.
In the ensuing crackdown, many protesters were killed, though fewer than in recent months, and that period of unrest passed relatively quickly.
But clearly that has not stopped the internal resentment of Ethiopia's government from intensifying.
And it is taking a dangerous ethnic shape.
Last month, protesters in Gondar, an Amhara town, attacked businesses owned by Tigrayans, and anti-Tigrayan hatred is becoming more common in social media.
"That," Mr. Abdi said, "is a very tight rope to walk."
Donald Trump Explains His Obama-Founded-ISIS Claim as "Sarcasm"
Donald J. Trump tried to quash the latest controversy engulfing his campaign on Friday by claiming that he was not serious when he insisted several times this week that President Obama and Hillary Clinton were the "founders" of the Islamic State terrorist group.
The post was a reversal from just a day ago, when Mr. Trump said in a number of interviews that he was indeed serious about the charge.
The latest firestorm comes as Mr. Trump has been trying to refocus his campaign on the economy amid declining poll numbers.
Taking again to Twitter, he warned that Mrs. Clinton's proposals would come with higher taxes and he said that he found her speech boring.
Mr. Trump has used the sarcasm defense before.
In late July, after he drew widespread criticism by appearing to suggest that the Russians should hack Mrs. Clinton's emails, he later explained his remarks by saying, "Of course I'm being sarcastic."
"I think it's a pattern of him testing certain messages that resonate with his fans, seeing how they play, and then "clarifying" one way or another depending on the reaction," said Ruth Sherman, a communications expert who has been monitoring the language used by both candidates.
Instead of toning things down for a general election audience, Mr. Trump has taken an even more caustic tone in recent days as his poll numbers have continued to tumble.
A new NBC/Wall Street Journal/Marist poll released on Friday showed Mr. Trump trailing Mrs. Clinton by large margins in North Carolina, Virginia and Colorado and locked in a tight race in Florida.
But as he faces heightened scrutiny during the final months of the presidential campaign, Mr. Trump's jokes have put his loyal allies in the uncomfortable position of having to publicly stand up for him no matter how provocative his remarks.
"I think what he's saying there is legitimate, political commentary," Mr. Giuliani said when questioned about the veracity of Mr. Trump's assertion about Mr. Obama and Mrs. Clinton having founded the Islamic State.
It is true in a sense that before Obama, ISIS was an almost unknown, small little organization, he who called it the jayvee, totally wrong, and here's why it happened, because he withdrew the troops from Iraq.
Ahead of rallies in Pennsylvania on Friday, Mr. Trump continued to lash out on Twitter at the news media for harping on his every word and for being biased against him.
Once Priced Out, a Cafe Returns in Greenpoint
Verb Cafe was a shabby, cash-only space in Williamsburg that had no Wi-Fi but served good coffee for 15 years.
Naturally, it got priced out of its Bedford Avenue storefront.
The store that replaced the Verb in the summer of 2014, Soap Cherie, sells soaps in the shape of cupcakes.
Locals bemoaned it as the latest loss in a gentrifying city.
The artist Molly Crabapple wrote on Twitter, "New York is change, I know, but still, can't believe CBGB's is dead and the Chelsea Hotel is gutted and Verb is now a soap shop."
But if New York is change, it is also reinvention.
Leading the new Verb is Cisco Rodriguez, a longtime employee at the old cafe who is an owner and the general manager at the new place.
When a customer offered to bankroll him in a new outpost, he said he was excited to do it.
Verb uses the same distributor for the bagels and bought the same model of espresso machine.
It even reused the lights from the old Verb.
Bacon-egg-and-cheese sandwiches are on the menu, and toppings like capers and sautéed onions are available.
There are brown-rice bowls.
Nine months in, Mr. Rodriguez said he had noticed a steady stream of old regulars.
"A lot of former customers got priced out of Williamsburg too," he said.
Even after she moved to Greenpoint, she would still make the trek.
"I realized it was the coffee and the culture at Verb that I liked," she said.
Now she's back on coffee, although that day, instead of her usual iced coffee, she went with a blended chai drink, another new addition.
He'd go before work and order the same thing without fail.
"Quarter past seven, every day, like clockwork, I'd come in and they were making my everything bagel with butter," he said.
These days, Mr. Rosenthal still gets his regular order, but sometimes he'll switch things up with the bacon, egg and cheese on an everything bagel.
Mr. Rodriguez said he had no hard feelings about the soap shop taking over the old space.
In fact, the Soap Cherie owners offered to make special soap for Verb, using the cafe's cold-brewed coffee as an ingredient.
"I think we still might take them up on it," Mr. Rodriguez said.
And Greenpoint's traditional Polish residents have embraced the cafe as well.
One of these new customers translated the menu into Polish, and Mr. Rodriguez said he planned to find a spot to display it soon to make his new neighbors feel welcome.
A local juice spot wants to bottle and sell the cold-brewed coffee.
For many customers, a new Verb to get their old favorites is enough.
Joseph Whitt was a regular and said he was heartbroken when they closed.
When the new space opened, Mr. Whitt said, walking in and getting a coffee felt like a homecoming.
The Depressing Food of the Depression, in "A Square Meal"
In March 1933, shortly after ascending to the presidency, Franklin Delano Roosevelt sat down to lunch in the Oval Office.
A gourmand, President Roosevelt had a taste for fancy Fifth Avenue foods like pâté de foie gras and Maryland terrapin soup.
His menu that day was more humble: deviled eggs in tomato sauce, mashed potatoes and, for dessert, prune pudding.
Mr. Coe's last book, "Chop Suey," was about Chinese cuisine in America, while Ms. Ziegelman told the story of life in a Lower East Side tenement through food in her book "97 Orchard."
Their new, collaborative work, "A Square Meal," which will be published Tuesday by Harper, is a history of American food in the Great Depression.
Showing some culinary solidarity of their own, they met a reporter for dinner at Eisenberg's Sandwich Shop, a tiny no-frills lunch counter in the Flatiron district that has been in business since the year of the crash, 1929.
Ms. Ziegelman, 54, ordered a cream cheese and chopped olive sandwich, while Mr. Coe, 57, had the turkey, mashed potatoes and vegetable medley.
When a reporter ordered meatloaf, the couple deemed it fitting for a discussion of Depression-era eating.
"Loaves were very popular," Ms. Ziegelman said.
There was peanut loaf, liver loaf, bean loaf.
They were made from an ingredient and a cheap thing that stretches the ingredient out.
Imagine eating enough peanuts to serve as your dinner.
In the years before the Depression, the American table, especially in rural areas, was an all-you-can-eat buffet.
Teams of women cooked for male farmworkers, and fresh-baked pie was served at breakfast, lunch and dinner.
It was Americans who had sent food to starving Europeans during World War I. "A Square Meal" chronicles the ways the nation coped with suddenly not being the land of plenty.
Equally fraught was the new budget diet: Mystery dishes like loaves and casseroles became staples, the casserole a "wonderful way to repurpose leftovers," Ms. Ziegelman noted, because cooks could hide unappetizing ingredients under a creamy coating of sauce.
Meat, for years the center of the American meal, became a sparingly apportioned luxury.
Strange mashups were tried as caloric and nutritional fulfillment took precedent over taste or even common kitchen sense.
In researching the book, which includes recipes, Ms. Ziegelman prepared a period dish of baked onion stuffed with peanut butter.
Ms. Ziegelman amplified: "It was surreal."
Peanut butter has nothing to say to a baked onion.
It was characteristic of a lot of the home-ec recipes.
As never before or since, home economists - among them Louise Stanley, chief of the federal Bureau of Home Economics from 1923 to 1943 - drove the country's eating habits.
Publishing recipes and articles in newspapers and magazines, they encouraged women to become "budgeteers" and rise to the challenge of transforming glop like creamed spaghetti with carrots into tasty dishes.
"A Square Meal" is a feast of historical tidbits.
Especially savory are the accounts of the government's response to its hungry citizenry, like President Herbert Hoover's let-me-eat-cake attitude.
While he publicly praised the simple Iowa farmhouse cooking of his childhood, he dined like the millionaire sophisticate he had become.
"He liked to eat Continental cuisine, like fish with cucumber sauce," Mr. Coe said.
He ate in almost a gold-plated dining room, wearing a dinner jacket.
He was fabulously out of touch.
President Roosevelt may have committed the same error if his wife, Eleanor, had not encouraged him to set an example with his stomach.
As the book tells it, Mrs. Roosevelt's hiring of a housekeeper with no interest in flavor resulted in a White House that "put out not only some of the dreariest food in Washington but also some of the most dismally prepared."
Many of the Depression-era food ways were abandoned as soon as the country got back on its feet.
"She had a real fear of food waste," Mr. Coe said.
Ms. Ziegelman recalled: "She actually got people sick."
There was the cream-puff incident.
After the plates were cleared at Eisenberg's, she and Mr. Coe pulled out a dessert they had prepared at home: the prune dessert that President Roosevelt ate for lunch.
"It's called prune whip," Ms. Ziegelman said, adding that a common trick was to give modest recipes a snazzy name.
There was no whipped cream, just prunes, a little bit of flour, sugar, water and cinnamon.
Everyone reluctantly dipped a spoon into the viscous brown goo.
Surprisingly, it wasn't bad.
Mr. Coe went back for seconds, and thirds.
Sounding like a can-do budgeter, he told his wife, "Some chopped walnuts would help."
Presnensky Court is keeping defendants in the case of a mass brawl at Khovanskoye Cemetery in detention until 14 November, having granted a corresponding request from investigators.
Recall that, on 14 May, there was a mass brawl at Khovanskoye Cemetery between hundreds of immigrants from Central Asia and the North Caucasus, which involved the use of weapons and resulted in the deaths of three people.
We have put in place specific parameters as to how much pensions should be increased in order to cancel-out the inflation that exists in the country.
All the calculations have been made.
Commenting on the plan to increase the retirement age by six months each year, proposed by the head of the Centre for Strategic Research, Alexei Kudrin, the deputy prime minister announced that the cabinet is not considering this subject.
At the end of July, news broke that the government had agreed on a policy to fully index pension benefits in 2017.
Kamensky and Grigoryan made it into the final of the smallbore rifle shooting competition.
Kamensky is the world record holder in this discipline (633).
Earlier, the Istanbul Court issued an in absentia arrest warrant for the oppositionist Islamic preacher, Fethullah Gülen.
Gilead to get attorney fees in hepatitis C patent fight with Merck
Gilead Sciences Inc is entitled to receive the attorney fees it incurred related to hepatitis C patent litigation with drugmaker Merck & Co Inc, a U.S. district judge has ruled.
In June, Gilead was freed from paying up $200 million in damages for infringing two Merck patents related to Gilead's blockbuster drugs Sovaldi and Harvoni, after a U.S. judge found a pattern of misconduct by Merck including lying under oath and other unethical practices.
Merck is trying to catch up to Gilead, which dominates the market on a new generation of hepatitis C drugs that can cure well over 90 percent of patients with the liver disease.
The case dates back to 2013 when Gilead and Merck sued each other, claiming ownership of laboratory work underlying sofosbuvir, the active ingredient in Gilead's drugs.
Syria Democratic Forces (SDF) were now sweeping the city after the departure of a remaining group of militants who had been holed up in the city.
Clintons earned $10.75 million in 2015, paid 34.2 percent federal tax rate
Clinton's running mate, U.S. Senator Tim Kaine of Virginia, along with his wife, Anne Holton, released 10 years of tax returns.
They paid a federal effective tax rate of 20.3 percent in 2015.
In stark contrast, Donald Trump is hiding behind fake excuses and backtracking on his previous promises to release his tax returns.
Trump, a New York businessman, and his lawyers have cited an audit by the Internal Revenue Service as a reason for his refusal to release his returns.
"Your move," Clinton campaign aide Ian Sams said on Twitter, linking to the Democratic nominee's returns.
Clinton has pounced on the issue, releasing an online video on Friday highlighting high-profile Republicans urging Trump to release his taxes.
Federal tax rates have become an issue in the presidential election.
The Clintons, who now live in Chappaqua, New York, paid an average effective federal tax rate of about 32 percent from 2007 to 2014 and an effective combined tax rate of approximately 40.5 percent.
The Clintons' 2015 return showed that, unlike most Americans, just $100 of their income came from wages.
Their main investment was a low-cost index mutual fund, and the Clintons reported dividend and interest income of $109,000.
Additional reporting by Kevin Drawbaugh; Editing by Jonathan Oatis
Chilli-powder condoms, firecrackers boost Tanzania elephant protection
Conservationists in Tanzania are using an unorthodox way of keeping elephants from wandering into human settlements - by throwing condoms filled with chilli powder at them.
The method has proved effective and Honeyguide Foundation, which hit upon the idea several years ago, with U.S.-based Nature Conservancy has stepped up its promotion, training volunteers in villages in north Tanzania to use a non-violent four-step way of protecting their homes and crops without hurting the animals.
"Since we developed the ... toolkit, we have seen an attitude change within these communities whereby they are much more confident that they can keep elephants out of their fields without harming the elephants," Honeyguide executive director Damian Bell said in a statement.
The first two steps involve shining a torch at the trespassing elephant and sounding a horn.
If it is not deterred, a so-called "chilli cloud" is thrown.
Chilli powder mixed with soil is packed with a firecracker into a condom, its end is twisted shut with just the fuse exposed.
One whiff is usually enough to send an elephant the other way.
A last resort is a launcher that shoots a Roman candle firework into the air, producing a loud, bright explosion.
Jewish filmmaker slams Berlin hotel for removing Israel dial code after Arab "request" - RT News
A French filmmaker of Jewish origin unleashed a media furor after he revealed that the Kempinski Bristol hotel in Berlin does not list Israel's dial code, with employee citing "requests" from Arabic customers.
During his recent stay, Lanzmann tried to find Israel in the list of dial codes provided by the hotel.
The country however was not mentioned among the states one can call directly from the room.
How is it possible, in 2016 in Berlin, the capital of the new Germany, that Israel was eliminated and eradicated?
Seeking explanation, the filmmaker addressed the issue at the hotel's reception.
The answer he got there, Lanzmann wrote "shocked him."
The reason behind the move triggered even more outrage by the filmmaker.
"The majority of our guests are Arabs and they demanded Israel's code to be deleted," the employee was quoted as saying by Lanzmann.
It is in itself a great shame.
The fact that it has occurred in Germany and at that very hotel chain, is an even greater disgrace.
That needs no explanation.
The incident triggered quite a response online, with people calling it a scandal.
"Shame on you," another post stated, pointing out that the hotel, located in the noble Kurfurstendamm street stands near a synagogue.
"There was never a direct order" not to include Israel in the fast dial list," Suddeutsche Zeitung quoted a Kempinski representative as saying.
The trouble started when law enforcement officers tried to disperse the students, which led to the police using rubber bullets and tear gas.
Several hundred students took part in the demonstration to express their dismay at the plans.
Some of those taking part in the protest could be seen writing graffiti on the walls against the interim President Michel Temer.
This latest protest comes just days after protesters took to the streets en masse to support suspended President Dilma Rousseff as the country's senate voted for her impeachment.
Dzhagaryan is also expecting a record number of Iranian tourists to visit Russia this year.
It's safe to say that last year's record number of Iranian tourists visiting Russia will be broken," he said.
At the same time, relatively few Russians are visiting Iran, something the ambassador hopes will change.
The state continues to tighten the screws on the military-industrial complex.
‘Systematic failure to implement’ the orders of the director general of Almaz-Antey Concern, ‘shortcomings in work’, and ‘a loss of trust’ were the grounds for the dismissal.
Gennady Bendersky has been appointed head of the scientific production association for the next three years.
Information about Neskorodov's dismissal only appeared on Thursday evening and didn't evoke a wide response in the media.
How can such silence in the face of a major rearmament of the military be explained?
This, once again, confirms that there are many problems within the military-industrial complex (MIC), and the government does not want to attract the public's attention to them.
The removal of Neskorodov is undoubtedly an important event from the perspective of restoring order in the industry.
The Almaz Scientific Production Association is the concern's principal enterprise, which specialises in the production of sea and land-based air defence missile systems (ADMS).
Currently, Almaz is working on the development of the Poliment-Redut and Morpheus ADMSs, which are slated to be installed on new corvettes, frigates, destroyers, and cruisers.
Poliment-Redut is set to be the main antiaircraft defence system on the Navy's newest vessels.
Granted, as far as I can gather, Almaz is not entirely to blame for this, Kornev said.
The expert fears that a delay could also occur in the commissioning of the S-500 ADMS.
As a rule, directors of defence companies resign from a post of their own accord, according to an agreement of mutual understanding between the parties, or are transferred to another job.
This suggests that the head of Almaz was, perhaps, an obstinate figure, and resisted an ‘order’ issued from above.
At the same time, the Russian leadership is aiming to punish managers who have been caught stealing (fraud at the Zvezda shipyard).
Vladimir Putin heads the Military-Industrial Commission and periodically holds meetings on rearmament.
The Kremlin defends a number of managers in the military-industrial complex, with the aim of having a loyal group of directors on hand, who will implement orders received from above.
Of course, the current situation in the defence industry isn't catastrophic, but the present geopolitical environment is galvanising the Kremlin to whip the Armed Forces into shape as quickly as possible.
During the Cold War, the military might of the USSR and nuclear parity reached in the 1970s, led to the signing of the Helsinki Pact, which cemented Moscow's sphere of influence on the continent.
For all of the shortcomings of the bipolar system, it worked quite effectively.
Scot Callum Skinner storms home as Brits grab cycling gold
Scotland's Callum Skinner raced to glory in the men's team sprint at the Rio velodrome last night as the Team GB trio defended the title from London 2012.
The Glaswegian 23-year-old was in the anchor role that his fellow Scotsman Sir Chris Hoy made his own and the youngster did the legend proud as he stormed home to snatch victory from the favoured New Zealand outfit.
Britain claimed a shock victory four years ago to win as Hoy claimed the fifth of his six Olympic golds.
And they repeated the trick after finishing a lowly sixth at March's Track World Championships in London, despite Hoy having since retired.
The issue between Beijing and London was replacing specialist starter Jamie Staff.
They did so just in time as Hindes emerged.
Skinner was the man Britain's coaches stuck with, seeing potential in the Scot which has now been realised.
Hindes, Kenny - champions with Hoy four years ago - and Skinner set an Olympic record in qualifying, but the standard was overtaken by New Zealand in the first round.
And the British trio won the duel for gold.
Hindes was narrowly behind after his lap, but Kenny pushed the team in front and Skinner held on.
A change of strategy was a big part of the transformation, with Hindes riding a bigger gear to slow him down and allow Kenny and, in particular, Skinner to keep pace.
The 23-year-old Skinner, from Glasgow, said: "It's a flattering comparison."
It was just incredible.
After triumphing at London 2012 alongside Kenny and Hoy, Hindes admitted to deliberately falling to the track following a poor start.
He later retracted the comment and there was no method of appeal from Britain's rivals.
There was no such issue this time around in a supreme victory.
Hindes said: "It felt like London, with all the GB flags in the stand."
We all as a team came together in the last three months.
We've been losing out on so many world titles, so to win the Olympics again is just amazing.
That is one event, one gold medal for the nation which won seven out of 10 track titles in both Beijing and London.
If that is a barometer of the progress made in the last five months, then a successful five days in the velodrome awaits.
That would see Kenny - who is exactly 12 years younger than Hoy, who is also born on 23 March (that seemingly sacred date in British sport which is also the birthday of Steve Redgrave, Mo Farah and Roger Bannister) - take his tally to six gold medals and one silver.
That would be the same as Hoy's.
The 28-year-old from Bolton said: "I'm just enjoying this one for now.
The team event is always the best.
You get to win it with your mates.
It's a bit lonely winning on your own to be honest.
It was the day's only medal event, but there was further good news for Britain.
Sir Bradley Wiggins, Ed Clancy, Steven Burke and Owain Doull qualified fastest in the four-man, four-kilometres team pursuit.
The world record, set in winning gold at London 2012, is 3:51.659.
The first round and final (10.42pm) take place on today's second day of action, where Wiggins is sure to be the focus.
In the corresponding women's event, which resumes and concludes tomorrow, Laura Trott, Joanna Rowsell Shand, Elinor Barker and Katie Archibald of Milngavie advanced in a world record time, clocking 4:13.260.
Team GB have come to rely on its mighty track cycling squad to take ownership of the middle period of an Olympic Games and deliver a host of medals.
There have been dramas in the background, not least the resignation of technical director Shane Sutton in April amid sexism and bullying allegations, and the retirements of giant figures like Hoy and Victoria Pendleton.
However, on the evidence of the first night's racing in the velodrome, it looks like GB's now legendary reputation for peaking at the perfect time could be about to be repeated once again.
The future of the Portland aluminium smelter in Victoria - and the jobs of hundreds of workers - is in doubt with the power company which supplies the plant disclosing one of the plant's owners is to terminate a supply contract, with all supply contracts expected to be axed.
The move follows the decision of the Victoria government earlier this year to not extend subsidies provided to keep the plant in operation.
A 20-year fixed subsidy expires in November.
As many as 2000 jobs - direct and indirect - could be at risk with any closure.
In 2014, Alcoa closed the Point Henry smelter which led to the closure last year of the Anglesea power plant.
Alcoa's Portland smelter is losing money and risks closure.
The moves follows speculation about the future of the plant for several years now, initially in the wake of the strong Australian dollar and more recently due to the price for the output from the plant.
AGL, which supplies the big aluminium smelter with electricity from its Loy Yang A power plant in the Latrobe Valley, said it expects the other three owners will also move to terminate their agreements.
"AGL expects the Portland facility to continue to operate, meaning physical demand for electricity from the smelter will continue," it said.
"As such, AGL continues to expect the contracts to contribute to earnings in fiscal year 17," the power company said.
Any potential earnings impact on AGL from FY18 onwards is currently limited by the strong futures market outlook for wholesale electricity prices.
AGL said it had already written down the value of the contracts in its accounts by $187 million in "anticipation of a termination event."
Analysts have been wary of the possible closure of both of the Portland smelter in Victoria and also the Tomago plant near Newcastle due to the poor economics of the industry.
Addressing analysts earlier in the week, AGL's head of operations, Stephen Mikkelsen said Portland uses around 600 megawatts of power annually and Tomago around 900 megawatts.
If both of those plants go from the market that's a significant reduction in demand in the [electricity] market.
And as a generator that wouldn't be good for us," he said.
Kendall Jenner, 20, model and fourth daughter of mother-manager Kris's Kardashian-Jenner clan, is on the cover of US Vogue's coveted September issue.
"In a room with a bunch of people I love, looking at this cover made me cry," Kendall wrote.
The cover revelation was followed by a bizarre (or simply Keeping Up with the Kardashians-esque?), scripted reality video that featured the entire Kardashian-Jenner family (bar troublemakers Rob and Caitlyn, and joined by everyone's favourite showbiz uncle, Keeping Up producer Ryan Seacrest) forgetting about their sister's cover, only to end with the classic twist: they were all planning a surprise party.
It's the cliche plot line of nearly every "birthday" episode of a children's television show (Seacrest delivers the line, "You thought we forgot about you?," with the sincerity of a cartoon rabbit in an 8am timeslot), but Kris had to get her other girls in on this publicity somehow.
Kendall's big sister Kim may have beaten her to the cover of Vogue (she shared it with husband Kanye West in April 2014), but the magazine's September cover is a league unto itself.
The September Issue is Vogue's highest selling edition of the year.
With a thickness more closely resembling a coffee table book than a fashion magazine, the issue attracts a huge number of advertisers (Fashionista counted 615 of last year's 832-page tome as advertising content).
The revelation of its cover star is so hotly anticipated that, in the past two years, pictures of the magazine have been leaked before the official announcement.
Previous women to feature on the cover include Naomi Campbell, Linda Evangelista and Kate Moss.
In recent years, the cover has certainly featured more "celebrities who model" than "models who are celebrities."
Oscar winner and Dior ambassador Jennifer Lawrence was featured in 2013, the year after Lady Gaga had the honour.
But, even on the off-chance that Ms Jenner - who is described by the magazine as the "breakout model" of her generation - falls into the former category, she is in pretty good company.
These celebrities are not relatives of famous people, or reality stars, or kids these days who know how to make a good Snapchat video (although Jenner is all of these things).
Beyonce, who appeared on last year's cover, has had one of the strongest years of her career with the release of Lemonade.
With her reality television history, Jenner's position within the fashion world was always going to be fraught.
In June, original Victoria's Secret model Stephanie Seymour criticised Jenner and her colleague Gigi Hadid, calling them the "bitches of the moment."
She's walking for Marc Jacobs.
She's selling you Estee Lauder foundation.
She, and all of her sisters, are selling you pictures of themselves on their respective paywalled apps.
And, in her downtime, possibly just as a way still to see sister Kourtney and her kids, she's on reality television.
Community legal centres turn away 160,000 people a year
More than 160,000 of the nation's most vulnerable are turned away from community legal centres every year, with the sector bracing itself for the impact further funding cuts will have on already-stretched operations.
Community legal services, already stretched beyond limits, are bracing for further cuts.
Director of Community Legal Centres Queensland James Farrell said the latest National Association of Community Legal Centres Census Report found thousands of people were already being turned away each year.
"Queensland's community legal centres are chronically underfunded, meaning thousands of people are turned away from the vital services they need," he said.
People leaving violent relationships, people with unmanageable and crippling debts, families going through separation, workers who are unfairly sacked - all of these people have problems with legal dimensions, and this report shows that they're not able to get the help they need.
It's now time to look at the needs of community legal centres and their client communities, and for the Palaszczuk government to invest in this important work.
Donald Trump campaign sued after staffer allegedly pulled a gun
New York: Donald Trump's campaign was sued for allegedly doing nothing after being told that the director of its North Carolina operations pulled a gun on a staffer as they drove in a Jeep in February.
The incident was described in a lawsuit filed on Wednesday in state court in Charlotte by Vincent Bordini, a former software trainer for the state campaign.
Bordini said he waited for months for the situation to be handled internally before realising "this was not going to happen."
The director, Earl Phillip, "produced a pistol, put his right index finger on the trigger, and drove the barrel into Vincent's knee cap," Bordini said in the complaint.
After complaining to local and regional campaign leadership, Bordini learned that at least four other people had experience the same thing with Phillip, according to the filing.
"Guns don't have to fire to inflict damage," Bordini said in the complaint.
The suit comes just two days after the Republican presidential nominee caused a furore when telling a crowd in North Carolina that the "Second Amendment people" -- understood to be gun owners and gun enthusiasts -- could take action if his rival Hillary Clinton were elected and gets her pick of judges.
Trump's campaign said the media had taken his words out of context and that he wasn't advocating violence.
Bordini's complaint seeks compensation from the campaign for negligent supervision, and from Phillip for assault, battery and infliction of emotional distress.
Trump spokeswoman Hope Hicks didn't immediately return a message seeking comment.
A call left at his consulting firm, Innovative Consulting Services, wasn't immediately returned.
Britain must channel the Olympic spirit and expand Heathrow
Heathrow will also deliver regeneration and prosperity not just in our local communities and across London, but across the country.
For me, this was the great attraction of Heathrow, just as it was with London 2012, where we made enormous efforts to ensure that all our nations and regions benefited from the Games.
For our local communities alone we'll create 10,000 new apprenticeships, 40,000 new jobs and bring an end to youth unemployment around the airport.
Just as there were ahead of London 2012, there will be those that think the challenge of Heathrow expansion is too great.
I was told that Britain would be never be ready for the Games and that we would be embarrassed on the world stage.
The doubters were wrong on 2012 and they will be proved wrong on Heathrow.
There are always obstacles to be overcome, but Heathrow is answering every question asked of it.
Now they stand ready to deliver a third runway, backed by £16 billion of private investment.
It is time for us to channel that Olympic spirit and expand Heathrow, securing our trading future and creating a legacy of skills and employment that Britain can be proud of.
Adblock Plus, Facebook in "cat-and-mouse game" over ad blocking
For companies that make money from online advertising, attempts to circumvent ad-blocking software amount to a "cat-and-mouse game," according to one of the companies that makes that software.
On Thursday, just two days after Facebook announced it would be blocking ad blockers on its desktop site, Adblock Plus published a blog post saying that users could update their filters in its program to block ads on the social network once again.
On Tuesday, Facebook said that its desktop website would change the coding around its ads in order to make it more difficult for ad blockers to detect which parts of a page are ads.
But Adblock now says it has gotten around the new codes.
In a blog post, Adblock spokesperson Ben Williams wrote that "this sort of back-and-forth battle between the open source ad-blocking community and circumventers has been going on since ad blocking was invented," and that it is possible Facebook would come up with its own fix soon.
The fact that the world's largest social media company has entered the fight is a strong indication of just how big a concern ad blockers have become for the industry.
With 1.03 billion daily active users accessing Facebook via mobile devices, mobile advertising now accounts for 84 per cent of Facebook's advertising revenue.
The company is going after ad blockers on desktop however, because mobile ad blockers are not effective in Facebook's mobile apps for the social network and Instagram, a spokesperson said.
Ad blockers are a blunt instrument, which is why we've instead focused on building tools like Ad Preferences to put control in people's hands.
Woman run over on Swiss motorway in apparent suicide
Police are appealing for witnesses after a woman was run over by several vehicles on a motorway in the early hours of Thursday in an apparent act of suicide.
The incident happened on the A1 near Morges in the canton of Vaud just after midnight on Thursday.
A woman lay down in the dark on the road "in a desperate act" and was hit by several vehicles, Vaud police said in a statement.
However it remains to be seen if any of the drivers involved will face charges.
In each case - both of which involved a person walking on the motorway in the dark - it was judged that motorists cannot expect to come across a pedestrian on the motorway in the middle of the night, said the paper.
Last year a police officer was acquitted of causing death by negligence after she hit and killed a man who was lying on the A1 near Paynerne one night in August 2014.
The 22-year-old victim had been drinking and had passed out on the road, the court heard.
The court found that the policewoman -- who was responding to an emergency call -- was driving in a manner that was justified and that the presence of a man on the road was a "completely exceptional and unpredictable situation," the judge said.
NASA climate model: Venus was once habitable
The model was designed to determine whether or not Venus, with its hot, water-less surface and CO2-chocked atmosphere, might have once hosted Earth-like conditions.
The model also looked at the topography of early Venus.
The planet likely featured more dry regions than Earth, but once had enough water and geographical variability to host life and guard against rapid evaporation.
"In the GISS model's simulation, Venus' slow spin exposes its dayside to the sun for almost two months at a time," GISS scientist Anthony Del Genio explained in a news release.
The model produced a story of Venus similar to the evolution previously hypothesized by planetary scientists.
Roy was named the Jack Adams Award winner as the league's best coach during his rookie season with the Avalanche in 2013-14.
The Avalanche posted a 39-39-4 mark in 2015-16 and fell five points shy of the Wild for the second wild-card spot in the Western Conference.
A Hall of Fame goaltender, Roy won four Stanley Cups -- two apiece with the Montreal Canadiens and the Avalanche.
Strikes against oilfield services company Wood Group have been staged sporadically on platforms in the North Sea operated by Royal Dutch Shell.
The company's rate reduction follows a 10 percent decrease for onshore contractors in 2014.
Shell, for its part, has trimmed thousands of people from its payroll and announced plans to leave oil and gas operations in up to 10 countries as it streamlines its operations in the wake of its mega-merger with British energy company BG Group.
Scottish Member of Parliament Dave Anderson met with labor leaders earlier this week to discuss one of the biggest labor disputes to strike the North Sea in a generation.
The Pleiades cluster is situated 445 light-years from Earth.
Many of the stars in the cluster are just now reaching adulthood, having been born roughly 125 million years ago.
They're spinning as fast as they ever will.
At their peak spin rates, these maturing stars eject large amounts of stellar wind.
Kepler measures each star's spin rate by tracking the time between the appearance of recognizable starspots -- like sunspots.
Rebull likens the stars to dancers, larger ones pirouetting more slowly than smaller ones.
"In the 'ballet' of the Pleiades, we see that slow rotators tend to be more massive, whereas the fastest rotators tend to be very light stars," said Rebull.
"The Pleiades star cluster provides an anchor for theoretical models of stellar rotation going both directions, younger and older," said Rebull.
We still have a lot we want to learn about how, when and why stars slow their spin rates and hang up their 'dance shoes,' so to speak.
He is a well-known footballer, who formerly played for Spartak Moscow in the position of goalkeeper, and is also a coach with solid experience, who was the trainer for such Russian teams as the one and very same Spartak, Zhemchuzhina-Sochi, Terek, Amkar, Dynamo, and also Legia Warsaw, which won the national championship and the country's cup.
According to media sources, the leadership of the RFU has set a goal for Stanislav Cherchesov to get the Russian national team to the semi-finals and to win medals.
Meanwhile, the debt-to-GDP ratio is around 25%, which is less than a 1/3 of the level of debt in the United States and in the majority of European countries.
Namibia, of course, faces some difficulties that are typical of underdeveloped economies.
The state has to develop a very big and arid country with a small population.
It is even more difficult for Namibia: like every other country in the world, it is being faced with the consequences of climate change.
However, Namibia never thought of giving up; the country is dealing with the problems it faces.
Namibians understand that you can't choose your neighbours, and, as such, decided not to pick a fight with them, but to cooperate instead: to share scarce water resources, to participate in regional health projects, to promote investments and the exchange of students.
In addition to this, the Namibian government rightly decided that rich natural resources can just as easily become a curse, contributing to the enrichment of a few at the expense of many.
The authorities understand that the profits from Namibia's natural resources need to be invested in infrastructure and production capacity.
They also realise that it would be irresponsible not to try and maximise profits from the sale of the country's resources, and are revising investment laws and production contracts to make sure that this is being done.
Transparency is critical to this process, and that is why the government's strong support for freedom of speech is so important.
As the head of state, Hage Geingob, noted, the media often says things he doesn't like.
990 gold objects, weighing more than 1.5 kg, were recovered from just one burial site, known as ‘Grave No. 43’.
However, the official title of oldest gold in the world may soon be handed over to a rather insignificant-looking bead found by archaeologists in July of this year.
The bead is made from a gold band rolled into a ring.
Currently, no technology exists that makes it possible to date metal with perfect accuracy.
So, where is the certainty about which gold is more ancient coming from?
Obviously, Professor Boyadzhiev knows more than he told Reuters news agency: ‘I am absolutely sure that the Yunatsite gold is older than the Varna gold’.
Tell Yunatsite is a well-known settlement, even if you've never heard of it.
Currently, Tell Yunatsite is considered to be the most ancient ‘city’ in Europe.
Tell Yunatsite is quite possibly the most ancient of them all, given that artefacts from 4900 BC have been found here.
I would call Tell Yunatsite a prototype of the modern city, despite the fact that it is a very ancient settlement, even compared to Mesopotamia.
That is where the first cities, in the usual sense of the word, arose.
Little has survived from the houses and workshops, but archaeologists can distinctly make out streets, public buildings, dense urban housing, a ‘business centre’, and residential suburbs.
Tell Yunatsite is often called the ‘Bird City’: dozens of clay bird figurines were found here.
The ‘Bird City’ was destroyed around 4100 BC, possibly by Indo-European tribes that came from the northeast.
The three-metre-high fortress walls didn't stop them.
Archaeologists have discovered obvious signs of a brutal massacre: the remains of elderly people, women, and children, with evidence of wounds inflicted by battle-axes, were found inside of the houses.
It is logical that something had to precede the golden luxury of Varna: something like a tiny gold bead created in Tell Yunatsite.
It has been officially announced that the 911 Targa 4S Exclusive Design is being hand-finished by experts from the division that works with production vehicles.
The ‘retro look’ is achieved, for example, by using the special Blue Etna colour on the body, which was developed back in 1960 for the Porsche 356B model; even the logo of this model is painted in this colour.
The retro feel is considerably less noticeable in the interior: essentially, it is distinguished by its grey-blue tones, the new power seats with extended range, and finishes like the black anodised steel door sill guards with the logo of the division.
To top it off, when purchasing this limited edition, each buyer will receive a free vehicle cover and a richly decorated album containing photographs of the production process.
The experts at Porsche Exclusive didn't even lay their hands on the powertrain: the characteristics of the retro Targa are exactly the same as the standard production model.
AdBlock Plus has released an ‘antidote’, but Facebook plans on making even this useless before long.
So, AdBlock Plus advertised their new technology, which is unlikely to remain effective for long
In this way, the social network and blockers unleashed a kind of ‘arms race’, trying to one-up each other: the aggrieved party turned out to be the users, who missed interesting posts from their friends or saw advertisements where they weren't used to seeing them.
A rapist will stand trial in Murmansk · Vecherniy Murmansk.
The charges filed against the 54-year-old man are very serious: the commission of sexual battery.
The investigation established that, at the end of November 2015, the accused committed sexual battery against a 20-year-old young woman in the vicinity of Pavlov Street in Murmansk. A criminal case, with an approved indictment, has been submitted for consideration on merits.
The Dongfeng Fengguang 370 is representative of a class of automobiles, combining the advantages of a minivan and a crossover, which is gaining popularity in China.
Many Western companies decided to ignore the Moscow International Motor Show this year, so Chinese companies will fill up the empty spaces at Crocus Expo's exhibition halls.
One of them will be the Dongfeng Fengguang 370 crossvan, which went on sale in China this spring at a price of 55,900 yuan (slightly less than 550 thousand roubles at the current exchange rate).
It's doubtful that Russian citizens will every see it at that price, and the issue of delivery into our country is still in the discussion stage.
In China, by the way, the Fengguang 370 managed to take 11th place on the list of best-selling minivans according to June sales, even though, given its high ground clearance (175 mm) and protective, plastic lower-body moulding, it could also be classified as a crossover.
The crossvan is built on the front-wheel drive platform of the older Fengguang 360 model: the 370 has the same wheelbase, 2,725 mm, but its body is slightly longer (4,565 mm to 4,510 mm), it has a more solid design, and is better equipped.
The interior is decorated with wood panelling, but a photo showing a large vertical touch screen, ‘like a Tesla’, in the centre console was only included in the early exhibition models of the crossvan, whereas the ‘sound system’ in vehicles for sale is more basic.
The manufacturer is coyly silent about the performance qualities of the car, but promises to be merciful on the owner's budget with an appetite of just 6.7 L/100 km.
The Rich New pickup truck is familiar to Russians as the previous generation Nissan NP300 Navara, but with a design that has been slightly refined by Chinese stylists.
In spite of the outdated design, this model still enjoys a steady demand among Chinese consumers as a reliable and low-maintenance ‘workhorse’.
At a similar price, the Rich New will surely be of interest to Russians, because modern Japanese pickups have become prohibitively expensive.
It only comes in a standard transmission with rear-wheel drive, but there are upgrades and an option of part-time 4WD.
The new flagship A9 sedan will also be at the Dongfeng booth; a representative from the Chinese company announced its Russian premiere back in June.
Transport tax notices will no longer be sent by mail – Za Rulem website www.zr.ru
The tax inspectorate has changed the procedure for sending tax assessment notices.
However, this year, many of them will be waiting for nothing.
The inspectorate automatically considered those Russians citizens as online users and deleted them from the standard ‘paper’ mailing list.
This new way of doing things will affect all owners of vehicles and real estate.
Everyone else will receive the same familiar letters as before.
A notification will appear on the ‘personal account’ right after it is prepared, whereas a letter will have to travel several days and can even be lost altogether.
On top of that, the number of users of the tax inspectorate's internet service has grown to more than 18 million people, which enables the agency to save substantially on postage.
On the other hand, the meagre news on the inspectorate's website is clearly insufficient to inform citizens about the changed process.
Some people could have registered for a ‘personal account’ for a one-time service and have long since forgotten about it.
The souped-up Mercedes-Benz G class, whose improvements are aimed at achieving very high performance, is a thing in itself.
But the controversial concept did not confound the experts at the company, G-Power, who tackled the redesign of the sport version of the Mercedes-AMG G 63.
G-Power is known for its proclivity for BMW vehicles, but, at the end of the day, to their experts, a vehicle is a vehicle.
Indeed, why not improve the G 63: a 571-hp flying sledgehammer, with the aerodynamics of a tank, that goes from zero to a hundred in 5.4 seconds?
To beef up the ‘muscles’ of this crazy ‘Gelik’, the experts took advantage of the benefits offered by the 5.5-litre supercharged V8 engine.
Well, the speed at which it accelerates from zero to a hundred improved by an indiscernible 0.1 second: now the flying ‘brick’ is capable of hitting 100 in 5.3 seconds.
Mind you, acceleration at average speeds is, for sure, discernibly easier for it.
The top speed is terrifying: while the standard G 63 can't go faster than 210 km/h, the souped-up SUV, with a deactivated electronic ‘collar’, is capable of hitting 250 km/h.
In the coming years, the debut of at least four new eco-friendly models is expected.
After all, businessmen couldn’t deal on their own with dishonest customers who signed agreements without financial backing, tried their best to get out of assumed payment commitments, and included illegal conditions in agreements.
The problem was systemic throughout the entire country.
Numerous systematic delays in payment for services to business owners for considerably more modest amounts led to these jaw-dropping debts.
The person invested all of their working capital, fully satisfied their commitments, but didn’t receive the allotted money when it was due.
The result is an escalating financial snowball comprised of payroll, tax, and loan liabilities, which would have led to bankruptcy if the business owner hadn’t approached the prosecutor’s office for assistance.
In the regions where debt indicators continue to climb to critical levels, the prosecutor’s office has adopted a hands-on approach to crisis management.
The prosecutor general is personally holding on-site meetings with local officials, during which they substantively examine all of the violations uncovered by the prosecutors and the measures aimed at their immediate rectification.
However, if the official has already been subject to administrative punishment for a similar offense, then they will be suspended for a period of between one to two years.
"The NAACP Travel Advisory for the state of Missouri, effective through August 28th, 2017, calls for African American travelers, visitors and Missourians to pay special attention and exercise extreme caution when traveling throughout the state given the series of questionable, race-based incidents occurring statewide recently, and noted therein," the group's statement reads.
A recent Missouri law making it harder for people to win discrimination lawsuits, as well as the state's law enforcement disproportionately targeting minorities prompted the group to issue the travel alert, the NAACP said.
They're being pulled over because of their skin color, they're being beaten up or killed," the president of the Missouri NAACP, Rod Chapel, told The Kansas City Star.
"We are hearing complaints at a rate we haven't heard before."
The group cited incidents such as racial slurs against black students at the University of Missouri and the death of Tory Sanders, 28, a black man from Tennessee.
Sanders died under questionable circumstances earlier this year after he ran out of gas while traveling through the state, and was taken into custody by Missouri police without being accused of a crime.
The advisory also points to a recent report by the Missouri Attorney General's Office showing that black drivers in the state were 75 percent more likely to be pulled over than whites.
"People need to be ready, whether it's bringing bail money with them, or letting relatives know they are traveling through the state."
Missouri recorded 100 hate crimes in 2015, according to the latest figures from the FBI's hate crime reporting program, ranking the state at 16th in the country in terms of the number of such violations.
The travel warning is also a response to a new Missouri law that would make it more difficult to sue a business for housing or employment discrimination.
Previously, the American Civil Liberties Union (ACLU) had issued travel advisories for Texas and Arizona after the states passed immigration enforcement laws requiring local law enforcement to detain people on immigration violations which the ACLU said would increase racial profiling.
Two people have died as a result of a shooting of a police patrol in Egypt
The unidentified individuals shot at a police patrol in the Egyptian city of Esna, Reuters reports with reference to Egypt’s Ministry of Internal Affairs.
The Russian Federal Tourism Agency supports the law eliminating the free baggage allowance for non-refundable airline tickets
The head of the Russian Federal Tourism Agency, Oleg Safonov, said in an interview with RBK television channel that he is “in favor” of adopting a law eliminating the free baggage allowance for non-refundable airline tickets.
In addition to this, Mr. Safonov noted that, in spite of the concerns of citizens, there would be no need to pay for outerwear or mobile phones in carry-on baggage.
“It would be right to reassure all our citizens and tourists and to make an announcement about this, to say that this will have nothing to do with outerwear, umbrellas, mobile phones, iPads, or even some computers”, the head of the Russian Federal Tourism Agency said.
The point of the issue is that airline companies are free to determine the number of seats and weight of baggage at the non-refundable rate.
“It is also necessary to deal with the facilities that continue to operate here; the sewage treatment plants, the majority of them are worn-out”, RIA Novosti quotes the president as saying.
He also added that the Office of the Prosecutor General of the Russian Federation should conduct an inquiry to identify environmentally destructive activities.
According to him, there are problems connected to illegal dumping and a range of environmental violations by recreation operators in the area around the lake.
“I would like to emphasize this: there’s no need to inspect everything in sight – we also need to know where to draw the line – but specifically illegal and environmentally destructive activities and then take appropriate measures”, he stressed.
You will recall that on June 15, during the direct line, Vladimir Putin spoke about the necessity of changing legislation to ensure the protection of the rights of citizens living in natural areas under the special protection regime.
Residents of Olkhon Island, which is part of the Baikal Natural Territory, let him know about problems with conducting business activities.
In the village of Sosva, members of the Rakhtynya community of indigenous peoples of the North, along with residents of Berezovsky District, will take part in the construction of an orthodox church in honor of Saint Nicholas the Wonderworker.
Its location will be on the riverbank: the church will be easily visible from far away, so it will serve as a steering landmark for fishermen.
According to members of the community, construction work will already be completed this year: so far the dome has been installed, and the church bell is on hand.
The Igrimsk Fleet Repair and Operational Base provided transport services.
After all, in Sosva, the fishing industry provides settlers with work and feeds them.
Local residents are waiting for the day the church opens its doors, and children are even writing school compositions about it as a local attraction.
I am talking with a local businessman, Chang, while sitting in an open-air eatery.
Commenting on the situation in Singapore, Chang smokes one cigarette after another, while carefully placing the butts into a small iron box he brought with him from the office.
After finishing our conversation, the businessman heads toward the nearest trashcan (it’s about 100 meters away) and dumps the butts into it.
You know, it’s a simple reflex I developed in my childhood: it’s forbidden to throw a candy wrapper onto the pavement; they will fine you instantly.
Chang says that, three months ago, his neighbor’s 18-year-old son wrote graffiti on the wall of an old colonial building.
He received ten lashings with a wooden cane to his buttocks and spent a week in jail.
AiF’s staff writer understood, right then and there, how exceptionally high living standards and unbelievably harsh laws go together in Singapore.
Here, no one is concerned with abolishing the death penalty, explains lawyer Victor Lee Hong.
And the government stopped caring a long time ago about the opinion of both the European Union and the United States on this matter.
If a person smuggles in a large shipment of drugs or sells them, then they are sent to the gallows.
Nevertheless, the boy still ended up being hanged.
Since then, drug traffickers carefully bypass our country.
Here’s the deal: in Singapore, the rule is that absolutely EVERYONE must obey the laws, not just simple people and those of modest means.
When you’re walking around Singapore and come across signs with lots of warnings everywhere, you’re simply astonished by just how many bans there are in this city-state!
They won’t confiscate a tourist’s gum upon arrival, but should you stick your gum in the metro, they will slap you with a fine of 1,000 local dollars.
In the span of four days, I ran into two people with white signs around their necks that said, “I littered”.
For cigarette butts tossed beside a garbage can, in addition to a fine, they often impose a sentence of “grounds cleaning exile”: cleaning parks and beaches for a week.
A “criminal” who forgets to flush a public toilet after themselves pays 6,000 rubles, while a special detector is activated in the event of an attempt to relieve oneself in the elevator of a residential apartment building: the doors are locked and a signal is sent to the police.
Basically, you get the feeling that no matter how hard you try, you will inevitably break something.
That’s far from the case, says Mohammed Kabir-Kajaria, the owner of a local travel agency, in an attempt to change my mind.
Then why do they remain in place?
So that citizens don’t become complacent.
For example, if a minor is sold cigarettes at a kiosk, then everyone down the line will be punished: the storeowner will pay a huge fine, the actual offender will receive a caning to their “backside”, and the salesperson will also be given a thrashing and put in jail.
Nowadays, a driver, having drunk a jigger of whiskey, knows that if they are pulled over, the police officer won’t let them go for a bribe; they will impose a fine in an amount equivalent to the cost of an apartment and will put them behind bars for years.
To many foreigners, the city-state in Southeast Asia seems like a type of detention camp.
In 1993, the American writer, William Gibson, dubbed Singapore, “Disneyland with the death penalty”: the visitor from the United States was terrified by the universal wealth of residents, the “frighteningly clean airport”, and the “cultivated nature”.
The first few days in Singapore, you truly fear tossing a piece of paper onto the sidewalk, and change your mind if you’ve entered the metro with ice cream.
But then you arrive in the “Little India” district and, suddenly, “the mold is broken”: plastic cups lay strewn across a bus stop.
They don’t nab you on the spot for every such “crime”; however, you should know that if they track you down, you won’t be able to talk your way out of it, after all, you broke the law.
I walked around in Vietnam’s Ho Chi Minh City very cautiously: motorcyclists often snatch smartphones and cameras right out of tourists’ hands.
The center of Paris is full of dirty transients and panhandlers.
Not everyone tries to throw their garbage into the cans on our streets either.
It’s just human nature: remember, no one buckled-up behind the wheel in Russia either, until they started to issue fines.
And chances are that people here, in Russia, would also be delighted with clean streets, an absence of litter in the metro, and would support the arrest of those who mistake the elevator for a public toilet.
As far as corporal punishment goes: thanks, but no thanks.
Is nothing sacred?
Now Trump's White House is targeting the Statue of Liberty
Americans appreciate this as well as anyone - hence the carefully stage-manged toppling of Saddam Hussein in Firdos square in Baghdad in 2003.
Stephen Miller, one of the key ideologues of the Trump regime, surely knew what he was doing when he took a symbolic axe to the Statue of Liberty in a heated argument with CNN's Jim Acosta over the president's proposals to drastically limit legal immigration.
A horde of boat-trip owners and Liberty impersonators would have lynched him if he did.
But he did attack its meaning, and in particular the meaning ascribed to it when Emma Lazarus's famous poem was added to its base in 1903, 17 years after the monument itself was completed.
As Miller scolded Acosta: "I don't want to get off into a whole thing about history here, but the Statue of Liberty is ... a symbol of American liberty lighting the world.
It is about the contemporary resonance of Lazarus's startling words, the only ones in which a state has appeared to invite not just any old immigrants, but the poorest of the poor: "Your tired, your poor, / Your huddled masses yearning to breathe free, / The wretched refuse of your teeming shore."
There has never been a time when the "wretched refuse" has been more visible on our screens.
Miller was not engaging in literary criticism - he was making it clear that these people are not welcome in Trump's USA.
Lazarus - and her friends who campaigned to place her words at the base after her death - knew very well that they were engaging in a highly political act.
The sculpture was intended to mark the connections between French and American republicanism by representing in a well-worn classical trope, the female embodiment of Liberty.
Lazarus changed that meaning: in her poem the female figure is no longer abstract - she has a voice.
And just as Lazarus changed the meaning of the statue, rightwingers have long wanted to change it back.
The great loudmouth Rush Limbaugh, a kind of John the Baptist for the coming of Trump, argued in 2010 that Liberty is not inviting anyone in, but is rather an early neocon, taking the American flame out to the benighted world: "Lady Liberty is stepping forward.
The torch is not to light the way to the United States."
Rather unusually, Limbaugh actually hit on something.
Lazarus's great imaginative act was to see it as it would be seen by exhausted, wretched but hopeful people on the decks of ships after long and often dreadful journeys.
And of course, this is not the perspective Miller and Trump want ever to recognise.
UK Athletics' performance director Neil Black says the 16-strong Scottish contingent in the World Championships squad will make "a massive contribution to the team."
A record number of Scottish athletes have been selected for London 2017, which starts on Friday.
Black believes "there's something special evolving" in Scotland and UK athletics must learn from that.
"We embrace it and we're trying to understand it and we'll push on that until we work it out," Black said.
Scottish Athletics think it's something to do with what they've done.
British athletics: it's something to do with what they've done.
Her captain's speech was incredible," says Black.
"A number of athletes, whether they were Scottish or wherever they live or train, walked out of that room feeling hugely proud and really motivated.
The passion and real feeling that Eilidh naturally put into it were great."
Scotland's previous best total of athletes at the worlds was seven, achieved in 1983 and 2015.
Middle-distance runner Muir is leading the way, having set five British and two European records in the past year.
Chris O'Hare, who runs in the 1500m, is another Scot to watch, following a great season that included victory at the British Team trials and the Anniversary Games.
Doyle remembers her first world championships, when the only other Scot in the team was Lee McConnell.
The team captain says she's "hugely proud" of the fact so many of her compatriots have not only made the team, but, in some cases, will be challenging for medals and competing to make finals.
"The special thing about being team captain is that it was voted for by the other members of the team, so that it was such a huge honour anyway but to know that your teammates have voted for you and chosen you made it extra-special for me," she added.
As for my captain's speech?
So it's really just the importance of drawing on that home support and thriving on the fact that we're back at the Olympic Stadium.
Blocking critics from Facebook: Don't run for public office, if you can't take heat from voters
The father of our country knew something about bad press.
Americans loved George Washington, but it didn't take long for newspapers to start slamming him on everything from domestic policy to his political principles.
He chafed at the criticism, sure.
But he did not silence his critics.
Because back in 1783, Washington said, "the freedom of Speech may be taken away - and, dumb & silent we may be led, like sheep, to the Slaughter."
And the American Civil Liberties Union sued him for that earlier this week.
The governor's staff dismissed the lawsuit as frivolous, and the online commentary was rich with a "who cares?" backlash.
And it especially matters when it's a guy like Hogan.
Hogan is not a reactionary hothead.
He's shown a steady hand in leading his state and a stern adherence to principles.
He's also been pretty deft at using Facebook as a primary means to connect with his constituents, playfully debuting his hairless head after chemo treatments on his page.
So blocking people who come to the governor's page - which is a public forum, labeled as official and administered by staff members paid public tax dollars - is unnecessary and ultimately dangerous.
But it's too easy to use the image of trolls or spammers or hateful folks lashing out online.
The Post talked to some of the real people blocked by Hogan.
Attorney Lakshmi Sarma Ramani of Bowie, Md., wasn't hateful, but she asked about hate crimes.
"I also do not appreciate that idea that when a number of people comment on the same topic, they are immediately disregarded by some as a so-called collective effort, rather than recognized as a large group of concerned citizens."
What the governor's staff called a "concentrated spam attack" others would probably call "advocacy."
The Facebook era makes it easy to tailor a message by simply blocking a critic or deleting a negative comment.
It's a lot cleaner than the old days, when doing the same would have required sending staff out to collect and burn newspapers with critical editorials or arresting and silencing protesters.
But that's exactly what's happening, only digitally.
President Trump is being sued by Twitter users who were blocked from his Twitter feed.
One of the first landmark rulings on this issue came down last week in Virginia.
The chair of the Loudoun County Board of Supervisors violated the First Amendment, according to U.S. District Judge James C. Cacheris in Alexandria, when she banned a constituent from her Facebook page.
And in Kentucky, Gov. Matt Bevin (R) also got a visit from the ACLU over his use of Facebook and Twitter.
This shouldn't be so hard.
Petitions criticizing his stand on the Treaty of Amity, Commerce, and Navigation with Britain overwhelmed his office, according to the historical documents collected by the online Papers of George Washington Project.
But he did not silence them.
Ronan Rafferty hopes for home comforts at Renaissance Club
Former European No 1 Ronan Rafferty will be hoping for home comforts over the next three days as the Renaissance Club in East Lothian hosts the 25th edition of the Scottish Senior Open.
The Northern Irishman, who led next door at Archerfield Links heading into the final round last year before losing out to Paul Eales, is attached to the new venue and is acting as tournament ambassador on behalf of the club's founder and CEO Jerry Sarvadi.
"I watched Renaissance Club being built, and we're seeing it come to its glory with this event," said Rafferty.
"The players will see this course at its finest, it is in fabulous condition.
Jerry has done a fabulous job setting this place up.
This is a great showcase for this course."
Englishman Eales is looking forward to defending a championship for the first time despite winning on both the European Tour and European Challenge Tour in his 32-year career.
Making his return to action on home soil is Gary Orr, who joined the European Senior Tour after turning 50 earlier this year.
This event will be his first Scottish appearance since the Aberdeen Asset Management Scottish Open in 2013.
"It always means a little bit more when you're playing at home," said Helensburgh man Orr.
I've really enjoyed playing again and I've played some solid golf.
I'm happy with how it's going so far."
The country’s transportation agency, as the Autocar publication reports, has reported positive results from the trial run of the 100-meter tunnel installed on one of the highways in the north of the country.
However, establishing an entire network of similar tunnels is just a part of the extensive measures that the government of Great Britain is planning to take to improve the atmosphere.
28-year-old Anton Mamayev was sentenced to four and a half years imprisonment, to be served in a standard regime penal colony, for a robbery, the victim of which was a former special forces soldier.
On July 19, the court released the man from custody at an off-site session in the pretrial detention facility.
When Bardina Degei cooks dinner, she doesn't use a stove.
She rarely even uses a pot.
After half-an-hour, the charred tuber is retrieved and devoured with eager, unwashed hands.
Degei sits on the mud floor - she has no furniture - which is where she also performs her daily chores, such as washing clothes with murky water from the nearby swamp.
Polygamy is common here.
It's a rare glimpse of daily life in the highlands of Papua, a former Dutch colony that was absorbed into Indonesia in 1969 following a controversial referendum, when just 1,026 elders were forced to vote through a public show of hands before occupying troops.
Enarotali is as remote as it is desolate; the journey here involves a 90-minute flight from the provincial capital Jayapura to Nabire, and then a stomach-churning five-hour drive by hire car.
There is no public transport.
The town of some 19,000 people consists of wooden houses ringed by bamboo fencing, corrugated iron roofs transformed by rust into varying tawny shades.
Very few Indonesians have made the journey here, let alone journalists, and practically no foreigners.
"We were not used to wearing these clothes," says Degei, indicating her vividly colored, hand-woven turban, dark shirt and a bright skirt.
"Before, we only wore leaves on our bodies."
The world's largest and most profitable gold mine, Grasberg, owned by Phoenix-based Freeport McMoran, lies just 60 miles from Paniai, a highland province around the size of New Jersey and home to 153,000 people.
These riches are, however, a source of misery for Papuans, ensuring Indonesia's powerful military maintains a suffocating presence.
Papuan calls for greater autonomy threaten this golden goose, and are dealt with mercilessly.
Mass killings in Papua's tribal highlands during the 1970s amounted to genocide, according to the Asia Human Rights Commission.
The screws have tightened as Papua's resources bring an influx of settlers from elsewhere in Indonesia.
The province's 3.5 million population is 83% Christian, but the demographic is changing as Muslim economic migrants arrive from Indonesia's populous islands of Java, Borneo, Sumatra and Sulawesi.
Javanese warung canteens sell fried chicken and gado-gado mixed-vegetables served with peanut sauce.
Local people struggle to compete.
"It made the native Papuans - the mama-mama [the women] of Papua - lose their market."
The former carpenter secured 27 of Papua's total 29 districts - including Paniai - on the way to the Presidential Palace in Jakarta.
"Our hearts have been broken because in 2014 we voted for Jokowi, with the expectation that he would fulfill our hopes for justice to be restored," You says.
In fact, Paniai suffered a nadir just two months after Jokowi's October inauguration.
On Dec. 7, 2014 a group of 11 children were outside singing Christmas carols in front of a bonfire in Enarotali when two Indonesian soldiers on a motorbike broke through the gloom.
One of the soldiers took umbrage at their tone and later returned with four soldiers, according to local Pastor Yavedt Tebai.
The soldiers, who had been drinking, chased and beat the group with their rifle butts, said victims and witnesses.
One child, 16-year-old Yulianus Yeimo, was beaten so badly he fell into a coma.
A couple of hours later, the nearby government Election Commission building was set ablaze, and things escalated the following day.
They carried ceremonial hunting bows and performed the waita dance - running in circles and simulating birdsong - of Papua's Mee Pago tribe.
Nobody was in the mood to listen.
"When I turned around I suddenly got shot in my left wrist," he told TIME on the porch of his brightly painted wooden house.
Local man Alfius Youw was hit three times, according to his cousin who witnessed the shootings.
"I ran to him and examined his body to make sure it was him," Yohanes, who like many Indonesians only goes by one name, told TIME somberly.
Three weeks later, Jokowi gave an impassioned speech in Jayapura, where he expressed sympathies with the victims' families and vowed to address the historic abuses in Papua.
Security Minister Wiranto said in October 2016 that he was setting up a non-judicial mechanism to settle historic human-rights violations.
Families of the Paniai victims greeted such claims with grim incredulity.
"I've been interviewed four times for the past three years, but there has been no progress at all," Yohanes says.
One person died and 17 others were wounded, including children, during a confrontation between villagers and the manager of a construction company who refused to help transport an unconscious man to hospital.
The man, 24-year-old Ravianus Douw who drowned while he was fishing in a nearby river, died on the way to hospital.
Police said the villagers threw rocks at officers, who responded by firing warning shots.
"We were so panicked, we are afraid there will be revenge," 29-year-old Dominggu Badii, who lives near the hospital and witnessed the injured being hurried in, tells TIME.
The lack of meaningful development feeds the discontent of the tribal Mee, Moni, Dani, and Damal peoples, who live sprawled across Papua's verdant central highlands.
In response, thousands of people in Paniai have been arrested and arbitrarily detained by the military in recent years, under the guise of "safeguarding national sovereignty."
Some never reappear.
Among the people of Papua, Paniai is known as "a tragic, forgotten place."
Bread is just as out of reach.
People here grow everything they eat: mainly nota plus some fruit and leafy vegetables.
Ten pieces of nota cost only 10,000 Indonesian rupiah (75 cents).
What few jobs exist typically go to the better-educated and wealthier migrants.
In addition, reporting restrictions for international media remain tight.
"There are new hazards for foreign journalists attempting to report from Indonesia's restive easternmost provinces of Papua and West Papua: visa denial and blacklisting," he said in a statement.
The lack of press scrutiny means international pressure on the Indonesian government has been largely limited to Papua's immediate neighbors.
In March, six Pacific nations - Tonga, Nauru, Palau, Tuvalu, the Marshall Islands, and the Solomon Islands - urged the U.N. Human Rights Council to investigate the "various and widespread violations" in Papua, including the Paniai shooting.
These same countries have historically backed the OPM.
He wants Jokowi to know that the Paniai people, aside from living under the looming threat of a rapacious military, wallow in destitution, with paltry education and health services.
Knowing that justice may never be served, at least they won't let those responsible forget their crimes.
"A member of our family has been killed," says Yacobus, head bowed.
Fire engulfs Dubai's 'Torch' skyscraper for second time
A fire ripped through one of the world's tallest residential towers in Dubai on Friday, forcing hundreds of occupants to flee the 337 metre-tall, 79-storey structure.
It's the second blaze to sweep through the high-rise - which happens to be called the Torch tower - in just two years.
The building was evacuated, no injuries were reported, and there was no immediate word on the cause of the blaze.
Dubai's civil defence authorities said firefighting squads put out the blaze at around 4.00 am local time (0000 GMT) and were cooling the building.
The government said it was working on providing shelter for those affected.
An investigation by the management of the Torch after its 2015 fire found that most of the damage was to the cladding, exterior panelling used for decoration or insulation.
Malakhov captioned the picture with the tag: “baby boss”.
The article was about how to prevent employee “burnout” and pay attention to their state of being.
If we recall the numerous reports about the host not being able to find common ground with the recently arrived producer, who set out to reformat “Let Them Talk”, it becomes clear what he was dropping such strong hints about, KP writes.
It has been reported that television host Andrey Malakhov is currently on leave and hasn’t signed a letter of resignation from First Channel.
Five soldiers were killed by a car bomb in Afghanistan
The shootout between the attackers and security forces continues.
A diver has recorded a video of a shark biting his camera
Diver and researcher Greg Skomal captured on video a shark that bit his GoPro action camera.
The researcher added that the shark could have easily destroyed the device.
The cause of a massive fight at the Ural Military Center has been revealed
According to the Mash public page, which appeared on the VKontakte site, contract soldiers from Ural Military Unit No. 31612 got into a brutal fight over an untucked bed.
It all started when a soldier by the name of Sayan deliberately ignored an officer’s order to tuck in a protruding bed sheet.
The first company supported Sayan.
In the span of a half hour, the 140 young men trashed the beds and sinks in the barracks and smashed glass.
A survey of airline passengers found that more than 20 per cent had knowingly or unknowingly smuggled prohibited items past the US Transportation Security Administration checkpoints onto the aircraft, including at least 6 per cent who boarded the plane while unintentionally carrying prohibited knives or other bladed objects.
Less than 1 per cent claimed that they discovered belatedly that they had mistakenly travelled with firearms, ammunition or explosives.
Of the respondents who admitted knowingly trying to fly with something banned by the TSA, 19.7 per cent were millennials, compared with less than 15 per cent who were members of Generation X.
The most common items whisked past TSA agents on purpose were food and liquids.
More than 3 per cent admitted knowingly carrying bladed items past security, while 2.2 per cent of female respondents and 3.7 per cent of male respondents also acknowledged intentionally carrying prohibited drugs onto the aircraft.
It's no surprise that the people most likely to haul contraband past security - knowingly or unknowingly - were those who fly the most.
As the company points out, however, the TSA guidelines are somewhat complicated and confusing.
So it's no surprise that the largest amount of stuff seized by the TSA happens to be forbidden liquids.
EPA Chief Pruitt Backtracks on Delaying Obama-Era Rules to Reduce Emissions
One day after getting sued by 15 states, Environmental Protection Agency chief Scott Pruitt reversed his earlier decision to delay implementation of Obama-era rules reducing emissions of smog-causing air pollutants.
Pruitt presented the change as his agency being more responsive than past administrations to the needs of state environmental regulators.
He made no mention of the legal challenge filed against his prior position in a federal appeals court.
At issue is an Oct. 1 deadline for states to begin meeting 2015 standards for ground-level ozone.
Pruitt, who was Oklahoma's state attorney general prior to his appointment by President Donald Trump, has long served as a reliable opponent of stricter environmental regulations.
Since arriving in Washington, Pruitt has repeatedly moved to block or delay regulations opposed by the chemical and fossil-fuel industries.
Wednesday's sudden reversal is the latest legal setback for Pruitt's regulatory rollback agenda.
"Under previous administrations, EPA would often fail to meet designation deadlines, and then wait to be sued by activist groups and others, agreeing in a settlement to set schedules for designation," said Pruitt, who sued EPA more than a dozen times in his prior job.
Still, the EPA's statement said Pruitt may at some point once again use his "delay authority and all other authority legally available" to ensure regulations "are founded on sound policy and the best available information."
"The EPA's reversal - following our lawsuits - is an important win for the health and safety of those 6.7 million New Yorkers, and the over 115 million Americans directly impacted by smog pouring into their communities," Schneiderman said.
Ground-level ozone is created when common pollutants emitted by cars, power plants, oil refineries, chemical plants and other sources react in the atmosphere to sunlight.
The resulting smog can cause serious breathing problems among sensitive groups of people, contributing to thousands of premature deaths each year.
"It's disturbing how much pressure it took to get this commonsense step from the guy in charge of protecting the air we breathe," said Lori Ann Burd of the Center for Biological Diversity.
"We've got to keep fighting the Trump administration's ideological crusade to pander to polluters and special interests."
The Congress of the IAAF has extended the suspension of the All-Russia Athletic Federation
As such, the congress supported the IAAF Council (which released a report on Monday that recommended keeping the suspension in place) concerning the reinstatement of the ARAF.
Khimik Novomoskovsk played an away game against FC Kaluga as part of the 3rd round of the FONBET Russian Championship between teams of the Premier Football League.
A little more than 10 days ago, the rivals played against each other in the Russia Cup, this time, however, the look of the game was decidedly different.
Khimik was in no way inferior to its opponent, but a moment of inattentiveness at the end of the match led to the bitter goal and a fiasco.
However, from the start of the game, the Novomoskovsk players were a force to be reckoned with and played a defensive game, but from a position of strength.
In the 1st half, the Kalugans were more active and had the advantage in terms of possession of the ball.
Aleksei Sirotin, who deflected several dangerous shots and gave his teammates confidence with his performance, had another very good match.
Unfortunately, Khimik’s offensive game didn’t have enough force and luck to stymie Kaluga’s defense and score the first goal of the away game.
After the half time interval, the game turned into an offensive slugfest.
The Novomoskovsk players started playing more actively on the attack.
The death knell for our team turned out to be defensive mistakes that enabled the Kalugans to make a series of critical plays.
But the experience of the Kalugans played its role: they finished off the last minutes with more skill and composure, waiting for their chance to score.
Following a dangerous attack, Khimik moved the ball to corner area, which the home team kicked into the net without opposition.
There is still another away game coming up for our team: on August 11 at 7 p.m. in Moscow at the Eduard Streltsov “Torpedo” Stadium, the Novomoskovsk players will take on the favorites of the Center Group, FC Ararat, whose lineup includes, Roman Pavlyuchenko, Marat Izmailov, Igor Lebedenko, Aleksei Rebko.
Trump pressured Mexico on border wall payment according to leaked phone call transcripts
Mr Trump told Mr Turnbull a deal for the US to take on refugees headed for Australia was "ridiculous," "rotten" and "stupid," insisting the deal, brokered under the Obama administration, would make him look like "a dope" after he had proposed a ban on refugee resettlement in the US.
Mr Trump ended the call after telling Mr Turnbull "this is the most unpleasant call all day."
On August 2, at approximately 4:20 p.m. (Moscow Time), two explosions went off at a missile and artillery depot of the republic’s Ministry of Defense in the village of Primorskoye in Gudautsky District, after which the large caliber shells and other munitions stored there started to detonate.
A grand jury is a group of ordinary citizens that collects evidence of possible criminal offenses and has the right to question witnesses under oath.
The special prosecutor will examine the collected material and will decide if it is sufficient to file charges.
The convening of a grand jury gives Mueller additional powers to collect testimonial evidence.
One of the topics of inquiry for the panel of jurors, which started working several weeks ago, will be the details of the meeting between the son of then presidential candidate, Donald Trump, with the Russian lawyer Natalia Veselnitskaya.
They have already been examined by the FBI.
Previously, Trump Jr. said that he was expecting to get dirt on the headquarters of the Democratic Party’s candidate, Hillary Clinton, but that no such incriminating documents were presented, and the conversation ended up being about adoption.
At the beginning of August, information appeared in some media sources that Trump Jr.’s statement about the meeting with Veselnitskaya was practically dictated by Trump Sr.
The deputy head of the administration for Penza, Irina Shirshina, was detained for 48 hours at her place of work by order of the Investigative Committee, RIA Novosti reports.
Official announcements from law enforcement agencies concerning this matter haven’t come in yet, but the press service for the Criminal Investigation Department of the Investigative Committee has assured that they will soon follow.
The mayor’s office for Penza has not yet commented on what has happened.
Irina Shirshina is one of five deputy heads of administration for Penza.
Irina Shirshina is raising three minor children, and it is significant to note that, after becoming a mother once again a year ago, she chose not to take maternity leave and returned to work.
Of course, there is neither a spaceport, nor launch vehicles in Mexico.
However, there is a space agency, established in 2010, and a desire to develop their own space program.
In the year of Gagarin’s 70th birthday, a monument to Yurius Gagarins appeared in Riga.
This is how the given name and surname of the first cosmonaut sound in Latvian, and he looks as though he has reached the age of 70.
Moore's Ford Massacre: Activists Reenact Racist Lynching as a Call for Justice
A 1948 Ford Mercury passed through a group of onlookers in rural Monroe, Georgia, and rumbled toward the small Moore's Ford Bridge.
Before the car, which had four black passengers and a white driver, could reach the bridge, a group of white men with guns stepped forward to block its path.
The leader of the mob - a middle aged man in a pinstriped suit - took a long drag on his cigar and peered through the windshield.
Inside, the occupants reeled in fear.
"We want that n----r Roger!" the man barked.
"Get him out of the car!"
But when a noose is thrown around the neck of "Roger," nearly everyone in the audience let out very real gasps.
Since 2005, civil rights activists have returned to the Moore's Ford Bridge to recreate the night two black couples - Roger and Dorothy Malcom, and George and Mae Murray Dorsey - were lynched by the Ku Klux Klan in 1946.
"It's mind boggling that all of these years, not a single person has been arrested - even though we see them in our communities; even though we know who they are," said Tyrone Brooks, who helps organize the reenactment.
For him, the reenactment serves as a dramatic call to action and an annual reminder to the Monroe community that an injustice has never been corrected.
A coroner places a sheet over the body of one of the victims of the Moore's Ford lynching on July 27, 1946.
Brooks said the town rumor was that Hester had been sleeping with Malcom's wife, Dorothy, and that the baby she was carrying was not her husband's.
On July 25, 1946, Loy Harrison, a prominent white landowner, paid $600 to bail Malcom out of jail, according to the FBI.
He was accompanied to the prison by Dorothy, and their cousins, Mae Murray and George Dorsey.
But, driving away from the jail, as they approached Moore's Ford Bridge, a lynch mob surrounded the car.
"It is also apparent that there was a conspiracy among state and local law enforcement, who not only took part in the murders, disposed of evidence and concealed the identity of witnesses."
For nearly a decade, Cassandra Greene has directed the annual reenactment of the Moore's Ford Bridge lynchings.
Her performance is graphic, gripping and grounded in a kind of deep racism that many would like to believe no longer exists in America.
It's difficult to watch, and even more difficult to look away, but Greene said that's the point.
"We don't want to talk about the lynching because it makes us face the ugliness in all of us," she said.
Rehearsals for this year's production began in June, and on the first day nearly 30 actors - a dozen white and the rest black - crowded into a room and listened as Greene launched into a well-rehearsed overview of the play.
Wade Marbaugh serves as Greene's co-director.
"I feel dirty because this is not who I am," said Marbaugh.
Across the room, actors Darrius Bradshaw and Nick Rascona, who play Roger Malcom and Barnett Hester, rehearsed their lines.
The play begins with Malcom shouting and shoving Hester, livid that he's been sleeping with his wife, Dorothy.
"I said n---a, get off my property!"
Rascona fires back.
There's a beat.
And then everyone (at least all the black actors) bursts into laughter.
Greene laughs the hardest.
Did I go too hard?
"No," Greene said through chuckles.
"I just don't think white people back then said 'n---a.'"
"Yea," one of the other black cast members quipped.
"You have to hit the hard 'R.'"
This time, when Rascona says the N-word, it's sharp and emphatic.
Absolutely no one laughs.
The reenactment ends violently and quickly.
There's screams, gunfire and then, silence.
A woman dressed in funeral black, stands over the actors bodies and performs Billie Holiday's mournful eulogy, "Strange Fruit."
Her voice breaks on every other word.
A hundred yards back, a group of about four dozen spectators wipe sweat and tears away from their eyes.
The audience is almost evenly split between black and white.
One couple has traveled from Ithaca, New York, to see the performance, many are from just down the road.
Up until this point, the murders have remained an anecdote, but now, standing on the same land where the lynchings took place, the air feels haunted.
As the final notes of the song fade, Greene invites the crowd to move closer and inspect the bodies.
Children crouch by their heads, take in the fake blood and still bodies, and whisper to each other.
"They're not really dead," one little boy mutters, as if to remind himself.
After a few minutes Greene thanks the crowd, and suddenly it's over.
The actors throw off the lynching rope and wipe away tears.
Bradshaw hugs Marbaugh, the man in the suit who played the head Klansman.
Nick Rascona hugs two of his castmates, and then breaks down crying in their arms; the emotional toll of the performance finally getting to him.
At one table, a white couple from Atlanta chats animatedly about the reenactment with a black couple they just met.
Denise Duplinski struggled to find words for how the performance made her feel.
"It's hard to hear those horrible awful words, and deeds ... come out of people that look like you and who do it because they look like you," she said.
"What this really does to me is make me think that lynchings are still going on," she added, "they're just called police shootings now."
Across the room, Tyrone Brooks holds court at his table, eating and reminiscing about civil rights.
He said he's already begun planning for next year's performance.
"The reenactment is inspirational in a way because it describes the horror of what we endured, but it also is a teaching moment," he said.
"It's like, if you don't learn from this, it can happen again.
A court has fined Navalny for violations at a “campaign subbotnik”
The opposition figure was found guilty of committing an administrative offence specified in part 8 of Article 20.2 of the Code of Administrative Offenses of the Russian Federation, “Repeat violation of the procedure for organizing a rally”.
This is the amount that Judge Mussakaev assessed for the distribution of leaflets at a “campaign subbotnik” that Navalny’s supporters held in Moscow on July 8-9.
Volkov wasn’t detained at the actual “campaign subbotnik”, but he received a summons obliging him to appear at the police station to give a statement about the event, which was held with his active participation.
Navalny himself and another colleague of the opposition figure, Nikolai Lyaskin, also received summons.
A court in Mordovia arrested a local resident who shot four people at a wedding, including the bride.
The republic’s directorate of the Investigative Committee reported this.
Criminal charges have been filed under paragraph “a” of part 1 of Article 213 of the Criminal Code of the Russian Federation (Hooliganism), part 3 of Article 30, and paragraphs “a”, “f”, and “i” of part 2 of Article 105 of the Criminal Code of the Russian Federation (Attempted murder of two or more persons, committed using a generally dangerous method, based on malicious motives).
The Ministry of Energy of the Russian Federation will update the rules for reporting information for suppliers of critically important equipment, in particular, turbines for electric power plants.
When launching gas turbines, turbines for hydroelectric plants, and oil pumping and extraction facilities, equipment suppliers will be obligated to share information about access to them with the Ministry of Energy and the Federal Service for Technology and Export Control.
British education group Pearson said on Friday it would cut another 3,000 jobs and slash its interim dividend by 72 per cent as it started another restructuring programme to tackle the pressures facing its business.
The job cuts, which Chief Executive John Fallon said will mostly come late in 2018 and in early 2019, are in addition to 4,000 roles lost in its previous restructuring.
Kabul convoy attack: Nato soldier killed in suicide blast
A suicide bomber has attacked a military convoy in the Afghan capital, Kabul, killing a Nato soldier and wounding several others, officials say.
A Nato statement said that Thursday evening's blast happened when a joint patrol with the Afghan army was attacked by a "personnel-borne improvised explosive device."
At the end of July, a suicide car bomb killed at least 30 people in a mainly Shia district of Kabul.
EPA reverses decision to delay smog rule after lawsuits
The EPA announced the decision to go ahead with the so-called "2015 Ozone Designations" late on Wednesday, saying it showed the agency's commitment to working with states.
"We believe in dialogue with, and being responsive to, our state partners," EPA Chief Scott Pruitt said in a statement.
Pruitt in June had announced the EPA's intention to delay the ozone designations - in which existing smog pollution is measured in parts of the country to determine where cuts must be made to meet tougher air quality standard - by one year to October 2018.
The EPA's website says breathing air containing ozone "can reduce lung function and increase respiratory symptoms" like asthma.
The Association of European Businesses unites more than 500 companies from European Union countries and the European Free Trade Association.
The chosen representatives of the people in Pskov issued a request to the chief of the city’s regional office of the Ministry of Internal Affairs, Sergei Surin, regarding the issue of traffic along the waterfront of the Velikaya River.
City duma deputies, Konstantin Bolotin, Grigory Storonenkov, and Valery Lesnikov, believe that motorists hinder people from taking walks and relaxing in this area.
As the Pskov Information Agency notes, members of the Patrol and Checkpoint Service and neighborhood watch volunteers are patrolling the central waterfront in the evenings.
Thanks to them, the number of vehicles passing through is declining, but not all the traffic is going away.
Putin has demanded investigative agencies not to seize hard drives
The head of state added that one must not “create conditions that prevent an enterprise from continuing its activities, to the extent of not being able to pay taxes”.
Olga Buzova spoke about how badly she wanted to call her ex-husband
Currently, the celebrity is in the United States, where he is dealing with work issues.
She stated that she hadn’t gotten married, hadn’t gotten any new tattoos, and also hadn’t repeatedly called her ex-spouse to tell him that he had ruined her life, even though she had really wanted to do this.
Buzova stated that she would remember this trip forever, since she had had such a great time.
His relatives spoke about his death.
He was awarded the British Academy of Film and Television Arts (BAFTA) award for his performance in the same role of Churchill in the BBC television drama series, “Winston Churchill: The Wilderness Years” (1981).
Something is rotten in the state of Denmark: Prince Henrik, or in actual fact, Henri Marie Jean André Graf of Laborde, has refused to be buried together with his crowned spouse, Queen Margrethe.
This year is the couple’s “golden” wedding anniversary; however, the order of the day isn’t preparations for the celebration, but rather a grave dispute.
His Highness renounced the title of Prince Consort, and also made stinging remarks in the queen’s address about her never getting around to granting him the title of King Consort.
The Russian Ministry of Foreign Affairs has urged Washington to stop defaming Moscow
Vasyl Lomachenko and Mikey Garcia, who should be on a collision course to stage the most compelling boxing match under 147 pounds in the near future, met each other for the first time Thursday.
They were in separate rooms at ESPN offices in Los Angeles until Garcia, the unbeaten World Boxing Council lightweight champion, walked down the hallway to greet Lomachenko, the World Boxing Organization super-featherweight champion.
After Garcia's victory by unanimous decision over former four-division world champion Adrien Broner on Saturday on Showtime, both fighters are members of the top-five pound-for-pound list.
As the pair posed for photos, Lomachenko manager Egis Klimas noted that a potential showdown between the fighters would be "perfect sizing."
"I'm a former featherweight," Garcia reminded.
"I moved up for Broner [at 140 pounds], but I'm not that big.
I'm small for 140.
I want to come down to lightweight.
Klimas asked if it should be on pay-per-view, part of a strategy he has to have Lomachenko fight a 135-pound debut bout later this year to set up a date next summer with Garcia (37-0, 30 knockouts), who also has interest in fighting the Jorge Linares-Luke Campbell winner following their Sept. 23 lightweight title bout at the Forum.
"We're the main names.
No other names can generate that kind of attention.
But Lomachenko paused at lavish praise for Garcia, saying he thought the three-division champion from Riverside looked "very slow, sorry Mikey ... you wanted the knockout."
Garcia said the focus was to show punching strength, then box.
They both said they can feel the momentum building for their own bout.
"This is the fight to be made.
I'm more than happy to work at it," Garcia said.
Said Lomachenko: "I've waited for the top fighters, and this is Mikey.
This weekend, August 5 and 6, traffic in the capital will be restricted in the area of Tverskaya Street between Nastasinsky Lane and Triumphal Square; traffic will also be restricted along 1st Tverskaya-Yamskaya Street.
Closures in all of these areas will apply to traffic in both directions, reports the information center for Moscow’s Department of Transport.
The streets will be closed from midnight on August 5 until 5 a.m. on August 7, in connection with their improvement.
Construction of Zaryadye Park is still underway there.
Russian President Vladimir Putin has instructed the Office of the Prosecutor General of the Russian Federation to conduct an inspection of Baikal territory for evidence of illegal and environmentally destructive activities.
New results of Sweden's asylum age assessment tests released
Eighty percent (2002) were judged to be 18 or over, while in a further 25 cases the Forensic Medicine Agency judged that the subject was "possibly 18 or over."
In 432 cases the conclusion was that the person is "possibly under 18."
The high proportion of cases judged to be over 18 does not necessarily mean that the asylum seeker lied about their age.
When newspaper Svenska Dagbladet investigated the 581 results released however it found that in 243 of the cases the person had openly stated that they turn 18 this year.
"I've had reason to think about this, and I don't think the type of measurement being used should be.
I’ll think about whether to run for the presidency
“So far there is no headquarters: it will be quite some time before a headquarters is established and the election campaign is still a long way off”, Peskov said.
The Democratic governor of West Virginia, Jim Justice, announced Thursday night at a rally with President Trump that he's switching parties.
The rally erupted in cheers.
"So tomorrow, I will be changing my registration to Republican," Justice added.
"As a coach, I would tell you it's time to run another play."
Forbes notes that he owns coal mines in five states, having inherited a coal business from his father.
He's worth about $1.59 billion.
"With only 15 governorships and control of the fewest state legislatures in history, Governor Justice's announcement is just the latest rejection of a party that is leaderless from top to bottom and unable to find a positive, unifying message," RNC chairwoman Ronna McDaniel said in a statement to CBS News.
A heavyweight cat that goes by the nickname of Mr. Handsome has found a home thanks to social media
A shelter in the city of Pittsboro (North Carolina, United States) has placed a cat by the name of Mr. Handsome, weighing more than 14 kilograms, after he became famous thanks to the internet.
At the end of June, a picture of the cat, with a request to find his owner, was published on the shelter’s Facebook account, because “it’s clear someone used to feed him”.
In the comments, dozens of people expressed a desire to take in Mr. Handsome.
In the end, he was placed in the care of Angela Frazee, who promised to deal with his excess weight.
In an interview with WNCN radio station, the American woman said that she already had a similar experience: she brought home a cat weighing 10 kilograms and now he weighs just a little more than five.
"The whole Council and the whole Congress was pleased ... that the Russian federation recognized themselves that they have been through some pretty torrid times and are doing everything possible to make sure the federation is reengineered."
Coe said he was also "pleased" that Russia accepted the criteria for its reintroduction.
The guiding principle has always been that we wanted to separate the clean athletes from the tainted system," he added
Nineteen Russian athletes will be competing as neutrals at the World Athletics Championships which start in London on Friday, having met strict IAAF criteria.
Drug-testing was still insufficient and banned coaches were still operating freely, he told reporters in London after a presentation to the IAAF Council.
The employee of the online media outlet, Zhitomir Journal, is suspected of treason on the basis of posting his publications on Russian websites and of violating the territorial integrity of Ukraine.
Rome obtained approval for it from the internationally recognized government of Libya, which, it must be said, is not in control of a large part of the country’s territory.
In Rome, however, it was announced that they do not believe these threats and intend to deploy yet another naval vessel to Libya’s territorial waters.
The situation was discussed last week during negotiations between Italian Prime Minister Paolo Gentiloni and Fayez al-Sarraj, head of the Cabinet of Libya, which is recognized by Europe.
Italian authorities settled on establishing a naval mission to combat illegal migration in July, when statistics for the number of illegals who have sailed to the country from Libya were made public: 95,000 people since the beginning of the year.
Today, a worldwide glitch in Skype service was recorded at the same time in several countries.
On Thursday, August 3, users started to send complaints en masse to the program developers.
You will recall that, in June of this year, a glitch also occurred with Skype.
Zemlyak’s coach, Sergey Basenko, was also excluded from the Ukrainian delegation’s roster.
Rules aimed at preventing unfettered spending by European soccer clubs will not disrupt Neymar's world-record transfer from Spain's Barcelona to France's Paris-Saint Germain.
Any consequences will come further down the line for Paris Saint-Germain from UEFA, the governing body overseeing the European game which has the power to ban teams from the prestigious Champions League tournament.
Financial Fair Play rules launched by UEFA in 2011 mean that PSG will eventually have to show that Neymar's transfer was funded without incurring huge losses.
Barcelona has been paid 222 million euros ($262 million) just to buy the Brazilian out of his contract and Neymar will command a salary that will run to tens of millions of dollars a year.
FFP was conceived by Michel Platini after his election as UEFA president in 2007.
The former France player believed that clubs who ran up huge debts in their pursuit of success were effectively cheating and risking ruin if banks or owners withdrew their support.
During the current three-year FFP assessment period that runs through 2018, clubs can incur losses of 30 million euros.
And despite Platini being ousted in disgrace from the presidency in 2015, his UEFA successor Aleksander Ceferin is still committed to deterring excessive spending.
"Certainly FFP is not dead and we will, for sure, reinforce the rules going forward," Andrea Traverso, who oversees FFP at UEFA, told The Associated Press last week.
Although PSG will have paid Neymar's buyout clause in one lump sum, it can spread the amount for accounting purposes over the length of his contract.
The first wave of FFP sanctions in 2014 saw PSG, along with Abu Dhabi-owned Manchester City, hit with the heaviest sanctions.
PSG was handed a fine of 60 million euros (then $82 million) - that was later reduced to 20 million euros - and ordered to limit its Champions League squads to 21 players for the 2014-15 season instead of the normal 25.
UEFA is on the lookout for clubs who might try to outwit its financial regulators by inflating their income through companies linked to a club's owners.
While a Qatari company could sponsor PSG, if the value of the sponsorship was deemed to exceed standard market rates UEFA would not allow it to count as legitimate income.
But PSG and Qatar 2022 have denied that Neymar will become a World Cup ambassador and such a maneuver would be easy for UEFA's regulators to expose.
PSG expects Neymar's arrival to be a boon for sponsorship deals, merchandising and jersey sales.
"It is a clear case of 'financial doping', with the club and the state," La Liga President Javier Tebas told Spanish newspaper AS, referring to Qatar's ultimate ownership of PSG.
"It is the consequence of the ownerships and that has completely changed the whole landscape of football in the last 15 years," Wenger said Thursday.
"Once a country owns a club, everything is possible.
It becomes very difficult to respect the Financial Fair Play because you can have different ways or different interests for a country to have such a big player to represent a country."
The president will determine the procedure and location of the oath-taking ceremony
Where and how new Russian citizens will swear allegiance to the Russian Federation will be determined by the president: the State Duma Committee on State-Building and Legislation has prepared such amendments to the second reading of the corresponding law.
Children under the age of 18, as well as the legally incapacitated, will be exempt from taking the solemn oath, it appears from a revised text of amendments to the proposed law “On Citizenship of the Russian Federation” (Izvestia has a copy at its disposal), which the committee will consider before the second reading at its meeting on July 11.
Previously, parliamentarians were going to define the procedures for the law “On Citizenship of the Russian Federation” themselves, specifying that the ceremony should take place in a solemn atmosphere, in front of the state emblem and the Russian flag, and in the presence of a representative of the Ministry of Internal Affairs.
In all likelihood, it could even be the civil registry offices.
A week ago, the draft mentioned that the oath must precede the signing of the decree.
In the updated text, it mentions that swearing allegiance to Russia will be for those 18 years of age and older, rather than starting at 14 years of age.
The rule, according to which the legally incapacitated or partially incapacitated, as well as those who are unable to say, read, or independently sign the text of the oath, are exempt from taking the oath, was retained.
As such, a whole lot of people are awaiting a decision on their fate in terms of Russian citizenship, the head of the Duma Committee on State-Building and Legislation, Pavel Krasheninnikov (UR), explained the other day.
Nostalgia Goes Niche in "Wet Hot American Summer" and "Comrade Detective"
So this iteration of the story is simultaneously nostalgic for the characters' '80s glory days; for the '90s grunge era (around when the masterminds David Wain and Michael Showalter made the sketch comedy "The State" for MTV); and for itself - that is, for 2001, before its stars, like Elizabeth Banks, Amy Poehler and Paul Rudd, went on to bigger things.
As a cultural artifact, it's both a sendup and embodiment of our Facebook-enabled era of permanent reminiscence.
But as a franchise, it feels like it's running out of time.
"First Day of Camp" worked surprisingly well, not just because of its absurdist humor (it included an origin story for a talking can of vegetables, voiced by H. Jon Benjamin).
By doubling down on the core gag - middle-age actors playing horny kids coming of age - it made the impossibility of recapturing the past part of the joke.
"Ten Years Later," with its adults now playing adults, is less emotionally rooted and its parody more scattershot, including a riff on '90s stalker flicks like "The Hand That Rocks the Cradle."
At one point a character rummages through an Apple Powerbook, some in-line skates and "a bunch of other things from 1991."
Sweet-hearted Coop (Mr. Showalter), now a novelist, still hasn't gotten over Katie (Marguerite Moreau).
And there's another battily villainous plot involving Ronald Reagan (also Mr. Showalter), now abetted by George H. W. Bush (a well-inhabited impression by Michael Ian Black).
As always, the best part of the franchise is the digressions.
It's especially fun to see the forever-young Mr. Rudd, sporting Matt Dillon's soul patch from "Singles," whose former big-man-on-camp Andy now feels like a geezer.
It's the moments of random lunacy that might power this franchise on, like a kind of recursive "Seven Up!" series, until it reaches what I assume will be its logical conclusion: "Wet Hot American Summer: Twenty Years Later," whose last scene will have the gang going to see the movie premiere of "Wet Hot American Summer."
"Comrade Detective" on Amazon, meanwhile, appeals to a different brand of nostalgia: the Cold War revivalism of "The Americans," the film "Atomic Blonde" and even "GLOW," with its East versus West wrestling iconography.
The comedy, created by Brian Gatewood and Alessandro Tanaka, with Rhys Thomas directing, purports to be found TV: a Romanian 1980s buddy-cop drama about two Bucharest officers fighting for truth, atheism and the Marxist-Leninist way.
The lead roles - hard-boiled Gregor and idealistic Iosef - are played by Florin Piersic Jr. and Corneliu Ulici, their dialogue dubbed in English by Channing Tatum (also an executive producer) and Joseph Gordon-Levitt.
But it's not much more than an idea.
There are some fine sight gags (the police pass the time watching chess on TV as Americans might football).
And the roster of famous voice-over actors - among them Jenny Slate, Nick Offerman, Mahershala Ali and Chloë Sevigny - makes for a decent game of spot-the-voice.
But "Comrade Detective" is so committed to the verisimilitude of a hamfisted propaganda drama - a killer wearing a Reagan mask is involved - that it often plays like one.
At six long episodes, it drags, and the comedy isn't fast or frequent enough.
Edited to a tighter length, "Comrade Detective" might deliver better on its agitprop satire, as when Gregor and Iosef repeatedly visit the American Embassy, whose lobby is always occupied by two fat men wolfing down a pile of hamburgers.
The message, for the imagined communist audience, is that Western culture can turn anything into fodder to binge.
The fictional Romanian creators were not wrong: We even do it with our own recent history, and theirs.
He also added that, by now, there are hardly any tickets left for the match.
Two young residents of Ufa fleeced a furniture workshop of 200,000 rubles
The young thieves’ loot consisted of tools worth a total of almost 200,000 rubles: two welding units, a perforating machine, a hydraulic system, and a lift.
Law enforcement officers set out in search of the criminals and, shortly thereafter, found the residents of Bashkortostan’s Blagoveshchensky District: 23-year-old and 24-year-old buddies.
According to the press service for the republic’s Ministry of Internal Affairs, the criminal associates entered the grounds of the business, forced open the front door, and carried out the tools.
A criminal case for theft has already been initiated against them, while law enforcement officers were able to return just some of the stolen tools to their rightful owner.
Commenting on these remarks, Nauert admitted that Russian-American relations are at a “low point”, however, she noted that it was necessary to look for “areas for cooperation”.
“Take a look at the ceasefire in southwest Syria, which has held firm for almost a month already”.
However, he acknowledged that the document was flawed and contradicted the American Constitution.
Dior has “grown” roses made of amethysts and quartz
The jewelry division of the French fashion house Dior – Dior Joaillerie – has added to the Rose Dior Bagatelle and Bois de Rose collections.
Five new rings and three choker necklaces on velvet ribbons have been added to them.
Two new rings and a pendant made from amethysts, rose quartz, and diamonds, created using glyptic (engraving of gemstones by hand) and pavé setting techniques, were released in the Rose Dior Pré Catelan line to mark the house’s 70th anniversary.
The head of Dior Joaillerie, Victoire de Castellane, was inspired by the roses that fashion designer Christian Dior grew at his estate in Granville and by the Bagatelle and Pré-Catelan gardens in Paris.
“You can thank Congress: the same people that can’t even give us healthcare”, the president wrote on Twitter.
They, in particular, affect Russian banks and energy companies.
Subsequently, the White House released a statement by the president, in which he pointed out that the law would prevent the US from concluding lucrative deals and would bring Russia, China, and North Korea even closer together.
An entrepreneur from Belarus, Viktor Prokopenya, has withdrawn a bid from the National Bank of Ukraine (NBU) to purchase a subsidiary of Sberbank.
Mr. Prokopenya became the prime contender for the buy-out of the division of the Russian bank in Ukraine after the NBU declined a consortium bid by Grigory Guselnikov’s NorvikBank and Said Gutseriev’s Belorussian company in July.
A truck involved in the accident hit power lines, which led to an outage of the Kuban and connected Crimean power grids.
Policymakers on the Bank's Monetary Policy Committee (MPC) voted 6-2 to keep rates at 0.25%, with fewer members this month calling for a rise as lacklustre economic growth has weakened support for a hike.
But it signalled rate hikes will be needed over the next few years to rein in Brexit-fuelled inflation and said borrowing costs may need to rise by more than expected in financial markets.
It will call time on the Term Funding Scheme to offer cheap-finance to banks from next February, although it said it was now expected to offer £15 billion more under the scheme - at £115 billion.
In minutes of the rates decision, the Bank said: "In the MPC's central forecast, gross domestic product (GDP) remains sluggish in the near-term as the squeeze on households' real incomes continues to weigh on consumption."
The Bank's downgraded growth forecasts for this year and next compare with the 1.9% and 1.7% predicted in May.
The no-change decision comes after recent disappointing growth figures have dampened mounting expectations of a hike, with GDP edging up to 0.3% in the second quarter from 0.2% in the previous three months.
Its latest inflation report offered little cheer for households being hit by soaring inflation and paltry pay rises as it said the squeeze will get worse before it gets better.
It added that monetary policy "cannot prevent" the hit to incomes over the next few years, but expects wages will recover "significantly" towards the end of its three-year forecast.
The economy is also set for a boost from surging demand for British goods thanks to the weak pound, which will offset some of the lower consumer spending.
The decision comes a year after rates were cut to 0.25% last August following the shock EU referendum vote, which sent the pound slumping.
The Bank estimates it will likely take four years to fully feed through to prices and the economy.
Prior to the Bank's latest rates verdict, there had been growing clamour for a rate rise as inflation ramped up pressure on hard-pressed households, with three policymakers calling for an increase to 0.5% in July.
The Bank said the overshoot relative to its 2% target was "entirely" down to the weak pound.
The market looks particularly good for those who may be coming to the end of their existing deals as re-mortgages, many with fee-free options as well as low rates, become ever more popular."
NHS to prescribe controversial HIV drug to 10,000
Patients will be able to access a 'transformative' HIV prevention treatment from September following a High Court battle over funding the drug on the NHS.
NHS England announced that pre-exposure prophylaxis (PrEP), a pill taken before sex which has been shown to reduce the risk of infection in high-risk individuals by around 86 per cent, will now be provided by the health service through an initial three-year trial to an estimated 10,000 people.
It agreed to fund the trial after the Court of Appeal upheld a High Court ruling last year, which said the NHS had the power to pay for PrEP despite its claims that local authorities should fund it.
Sexual health clinics in London, Brighton, Manchester, Liverpool and Sheffield will be among the first to start enrolling people, with more clinics joining in October before full implementation across England by April 2018.
Pre-exposure prophylaxis (PrEP) is a course of HIV drugs taken before sex to reduce the risk of getting HIV.
Taking PrEP before sex means there is just enough of certain drugs in a person's body to prevent an HIV infection taking hold.
Those eligible for the treatment include gay or bisexual men, transgender people and those with HIV-positive partners who are not successfully receiving treatment.
Clinics will identify eligible participants who consent to the trial, including men, women, transgender people, and individuals who have a partner whose HIV status is not known to be controlled by anti-retroviral treatment.
People living and registered with a GP in England will also be able to enrol for potential participation at their local participating sexual health clinic.
The programme will cost £10 million and NHS England signed a contract to source the drugs this week following an international competitive procurement.
The trial is designed to assess the full potential of PrEP by gathering clinical evidence on how it is targeted, taken up, and implemented on a large scale.
PrEP, if targeted properly at those in need and at risk, offers the possibility of transforming the English HIV epidemic.
From September, people at high risk of HIV will have access via this NHS-funded trial in England to an empowering new tool that is truly individually controlled and not subject to negotiation with a partner, leading to the improvement of many, many lives.
We warmly welcome this announcement.'
Ian Green, chief executive of the Terrence Higgins Trust, said: 'The priority must now be to make sure that the trial is rolled out speedily across the country, and that no-one at risk of HIV is left behind.
Now that the PrEP trial drug has been procured, we're well on the way to protecting over 10,000 people at risk of HIV.'
Shadow public health minister Sharon Hodgson said: 'The start of the PrEP trial is welcome and long overdue after months of delays and heel-dragging by the Government.
The evidence shows just how transformative this drug can be as part of our approach to HIV prevention and ending the transmission of this life-changing infection.
State Traffic Safety Inspectorate departments are experiencing a shortage of international driving permits (IDP).
It’s worth mentioning that the situation with international driving permits remains contradictory.
However, in actual fact, everything depends on specific police officers or the rental agency: some require the IDP, while a national permit is enough for others.
To be on the safe side, drivers still get international permits, but it should be kept in mind that in countries that haven’t ratified the convention, for example, the United States, Spain, Mexico, and Indonesia, the authorities have the right to refuse both national permits and the IDP.
Currently, there is a problem with the forms at almost every department of the State Traffic Safety Inspectorate, Kommersant reports, after conducting an investigation in several regions.
For example, at departments of the State Traffic Safety Inspectorate in Moscow, they have simply stopped handing out tickets and there has been a shortage of forms for four months already.
It’s possible to register for an appointment on the state services website, but the waitlist on there already extends into the middle of August.
In Krasnoyarsk, it is impossible to get the IDP “due to technical reasons”, without going into details; in Samara Oblast, to be honest, there are no forms, and it’s a similar situation in other cities.
Irina Burmistrova: “Take a guess, why you can’t get an international permit in Moscow?”
That’s right, because all of the departments of the State Traffic Safety Inspectorate have run out of forms.
Elena Podkolzina: “A question for people in the know!”
In Moscow, everything is always booked up so far in advance, and they aren’t issuing tickets on-site (there is a button, but it can’t issue a ticket).
Apparently, the state service website shows that there are lots of appointments available in Saint Petersburg.
Has anyone tried to get one in a different city?
Over the past few years, all contracts were signed with JSC Goznak: between 2014-2015, almost 200,000 IDP forms were produced; in 2016, 15,000 forms were purchased; in 2017 – 90,000; but, the most recent contract was signed on July 18 with OOO First Print Yard to produce 70,000 forms.
One explanation is that the SDC didn’t hold the tender in time, which resulted in the shortage.
However, there are also other explanations for the scarcity of forms: on account of the crisis, people, of their own volition, have started to travel not to Europe, but to less expensive Asian countries like China, Thailand, and so on.
It is still unclear what types of permits are accepted there, so people are covering all their bases, and that is why there has been overwhelming demand for the international “papers”.
The Ministry of Transport came up with this proposal.
Not a single self-respecting international company would put even a tiny bolt or nut in there, because they would risk losing their business in the EU, USA, Japan – the countries that joined in sanctions against Russia in relation to Crimea.
“In other words, it is my profound belief that this project essentially has no future”, Petrenko declared.
I know that, following the Olympics in Sochi, entire stadiums were already starting to crumble.
“Therefore, I consider the best instrument in this situation to be sanctions against companies who turned out to be shortsighted enough to join this project”, the official noted.
On July 31, construction workers finished installing the vehicle arch of the Crimea Bridge.
On the Kerch shore, preassembly of the road transport arch of the Crimea Bridge has been completed: its arch is capped at a height of 45 meters from the base of the structure.
“At the same time, bridge builders prepared to install the fairway supports for the railway arch”, the project’s information center reported.
The permanent absence spanned a long 10 years.
But not by his direct supervisor.
What doesn’t happen in the world of bureaucracy?
Ordinary people, it seems, have long become accustomed to all the antics of the “servants of the people”.
But, nevertheless, officials always manage to surprise those on whose taxes they live quite well.
This time the “sensation” hails from Spain.
It also came to light that the absentee dedicated all his free time to drawing comics at home.
The HRC proposes limiting the powers of court chairpersons and introducing appointment by election for them.
The Supreme Court must also submit its proposals as part of the presidential mandate.
The HRC conducted this work in accordance with an order by Vladimir Putin from January 3, 2017, which the president issued after a meeting with members of the council.
Individual cases of abuse of judicial power, as well as issues with public oversight of places of imprisonment, were discussed at the meeting with council members on December 8, 2016 (see Kommersant from December 9).
The work of the HRC resulted in 25 proposals, which are concerned both with issues of ensuring judicial independence and uncovering miscarriages of justice, as well as with funding for courts and legal education.
The HRC also believes that the court chairperson shouldn’t have the right “to predetermine the results of a judge’s performance report, initiate disciplinary actions against them, or make decisions about the establishment of additional monetary payments”.
They are part of judicial districts that do not correspond to the administrative division of the Russian Federation, and as a result, guarantee significant independence from regional officials, whose ability to use “telephone justice” is constrained.
The HRC proposes strengthening justices of the peace with people’s assessors, so as to examine certain “categories of civil and administrative cases” with their participation.
The SC (with its coauthors: the Prosecutor General’s Office and the Human Rights Commissioner for the Russian Federation) still has time to fulfill the mandate.
Living the high life: mezzanine floor and clever design tricks have transformed this small Earls Court flat into a spacious home
Joanne Leigh, a former banker with a passion for doing up property, downsized from a large home in Knightsbridge to an Earls Court apartment in 2014.
It is on the first floor of a smart Queen Anne terrace - and it is a testament to the new design that Joanne hasn't packed her bags and sold on.
I was shown this apartment in Earls Court and it had the same high ceilings.
I fell in love with it and put an offer in that day."
Since the first viewing, the 1,000sq ft flat has had a complete overhaul.
Originally a one-bedroom property with a convoluted layout - you had to walk through the kitchen to get to the bedroom - Joanne wanted to add storage space and a mezzanine to make the most of the generous ceiling height.
That was my requirement," she says.
To this end, she employed Erfan Azadi of Notting Hill-based architecture and design studio Duck & Shed to exploit the 12.5ft ceilings and create a home that wasn't only a development but a place for Joanne to live.
The ceiling wasn't quite tall enough to add two spaces on top of each other so the architectural challenge was to create a mezzanine that you could stand up in.
Erfan had to think creatively to resolve the brief.
"The steelwork is quite complicated," he explains.
"We had to arrange the spaces so that they stacked on top of each other without needing to hunch down.
It wasn't just building a simple platform, but cranking the steels so that they were at the right height for the function above or below."
This arrangement allowed Erfan to get two full-height rooms on top of each other in the space - with lots of added drama.
For the mezzanine, a vintage copper light window from Retrouvius looks down over the glamorous living area below.
The use of mirrors plays a part in adding theatre, space and light.
In the kitchen, the mirrored splashback feels like a window to another room.
At the entrance, mirrored units provide storage for all Joanne's cutlery and glassware.
Giving the perception of a more glamorous space, the beauty of the living room is being able to close off the kitchen when it's not in use.
Foldaway kitchens are nothing new.
What's unique about this one is that it's a garage-style lift-up door.
"A bit of engineering went into that," explains Erfan of the steel-reinforced, veneered MDF door.
"It's counter-weighted so that when you push the door up, it glides really easily."
"At the end of the day, floor space is what you are going to sell - or how your property is valued," Erfan says.
"In a rudimentary form, a real estate agent will walk in and do a calculation based on floor size."
"The materials are the things that you touch and therefore help to create an emotional bond in a home," says Erfan.
"You don't fall in love with the electrical feeds in the walls.
These are important but they don't pull the heart strings."
As such, the agency recorded the first week-long deflation in 2017.
The inflation target in Russia, according to the Ministry of Finance’s calculations, is 4.1%.
Putin warns against illegal logging of the Baikal taiga
By the same token, the president said that it is necessary to keep an eye on this plan, so that “not everything in sight is cut down” during the clearing process.
Media: UAF soldiers are negotiating with Donbass rebels in secret from military command
Soldiers from the opposing sides are continuously communicating with each other using mobile phones, and headquarters doesn’t know about this communication.
UAF soldiers and Donbass rebels have established communication via mobile phone in secret from their high commands.
Strana.ua reported this on August 4, citing combatants of the military operation in Donbass.
The communication is anything but ordinary: the commanders are trying to achieve certain “tactical agreements”.
Journalists have learned about instances where one officer or another has received birthday greetings across the frontline from his official enemy.
The ministry recalled how, on August 2, the grounds of the Russian Embassy in Damascus were subjected to mortar fire, for the third time in a month, at the hands of the Hay’at Tahrir al-Sham (the former al-Nusra Front, banned in Russia) and the Faylaq al-Rahman terrorist groups.
Considering that the international community unanimously classifies al-Nursa as a terrorist organization and that UN Security Council resolutions call for opposition against this structure, the Ministry of Foreign Affairs of the Russian Federation noted that “one would think that it would be self-evident that acts of terrorism by al-Nusra should be met with universal, unconditional, and resounding condemnation, and that there should be no ambiguity when it comes to assessing attacks against diplomatic missions”.
However, as the diplomatic service underscored, “for the third time in a month already, the diplomatic envoys of the United States, Great Britain, France, and Ukraine in the UN Security Council have taken turns, while varying the tone of their objections under the guise of an alleged absence of necessary information, blocking the Russian Federation’s proposal to issue a standard short draft press statement by the Security Council condemning the terrorist attacks against the Russian diplomatic mission in the Syrian capital”.
“The most disturbing thing is that the inability of the Security Council to condemn the acts of terrorists encourages them to carry out new provocations and terrorist attacks and makes them feel that they can act with impunity”, the Ministry of Foreign Affairs stated, adding that “we wouldn’t want these barbarians to develop the conviction that someone in the Security Council is at one with them”.
“Unscheduled inspections are conducted, as a rule, without appropriate approval from the prosecutor’s office – only 2-3% are approved with the prosecutor’s office – and all the rest are carried out independently”, TASS quotes the president as saying.
In May, a survey, commissioned by Presidential Business Ombudsman Boris Titov, was conducted that revealed that scheduled inspections had essentially been replaced by: unscheduled inspections (the share faced with them increased from 21.9% in 2015 to 30.8% in 2016), inspections by the prosecutor’s office (from 16.9% to 21.8%), raids (from 7.9% to 13.3%), as well as inspections requested by citizens (grew from 15% to 19.5%) and administrative inspections (10.8% to 15.5%).
More on business inspections in the Kommersant article: “They’re dropping in on small business from the other side”.
Brothers fight over $500 million property empire
Two brothers are at war over one of Victoria's biggest real estate empires, worth more than $500 million, four decades after their Italian family founded the dynasty.
Former Carlton Football Club director and developer Colin De Lutis lives in a Toorak mansion three doors from younger brother Paul, who has taken him to the Supreme Court over how their property and business assets will be sliced up.
Paul has wanted out of the family business since 2014 but an acrimonious argument is playing out in the Supreme Court over the break-up.
It sold in 1999 for $85 million.
